Authors
Akiva Gottlieb
Number of Reviews
119

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
"Three Seasons" is being billed as the most acclaimed film in the
history of the Sundance Film Festival, having won three top awards,
including the prestigious Grand Jury Prize. Writer/director Tony Bui
and his film deserve all the praise that they have gotten for making
this breathtaking, heartbreaking drama.
The film is about dreamers; people with hopes and
aspirations. However, in war-torn Vietnam, the dreamers are
constrained by their poverty-stricken fate. "Three Seasons"
intertwines the stories of a cyclo driver, a prostitute, an American
G.I., a young woman, and a little boy. At first glance, the bunch
would seem to have nothing in common, but "Three Seasons" takes the
time to prove that they all are lost souls.
"Three Seasons'" cast is composed almost entirely of Vietnamese
newcomers, but Harvey Keitel (also one of the film's producers) shines
in a small role as a former American G.I. searching for his long-lost
daughter. The role is a small one, but Keitel's presence and warmth
add an extra layer of heartfelt emotion to an already complex,
multilayered production.
Among the Vietnamese cast, Don Duong radiates as a cyclo driver named
Hai who falls in love with a prostitute, and desires her love in
return. It is such a sweet, quiet performance, but it is one that,
like the rest of the film, is subtly heartbreaking.
Every character in "Three Seasons" has a desire; a hope. Whether it be
love, stability, or family that the character needs, writer/director
Tony Bui makes us feel just the right amount of compassion for each
one. In a way, "Three Seasons" leaves the viewer feeling somewhat
depressed. Each character will indeed fulfill their dream, but not
necessarily in the way in which one would expect.
The thing, however, that makes "Three Seasons" so groundbreaking,
apart from the fact that it's the first American film filmed entirely
in Vietnam, is that the Vietnamese, who, in modern American cinema
have been portrayed as the enemy we know nothing about (in so many
Vietnam War movies), finally get their own movie; a movie that proves
that even they have some heart and soul.
Tony Bui has handcrafted a flawless masterpiece; a gem that deserves
much more than its 3 Sundance Film Festival awards. "Three Seasons" is
a quiet film that will reward multiple viewers with its symbolism and
subtlety, and it will provide an emotional, but unsentimental
experience.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Go (1999)
rated R
starring Desmond Askew, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner, J.E. Freeman,
Katie Holmes, Jane Krakowski, Breckin Meyer, Jay Mohr, Timothy
Olyphant, Sarah Polley, Scott Wolf
written by John August
directed by Doug Liman
Those who know me well know that for the past few weeks I have been
obsessing with GO, the new film from Doug Liman, the director of
SWINGERS. No, it wasn't because I thought SWINGERS was all that great;
infact, I liked it, but I thought it ended too abruptly.
It all started a couple months ago when I picked up my latest issue of
Entertainment Weekly and began reading Owen Gleiberman's thoughts on
the 1999 Sundance Film Festival. In the article, Gleiberman spent a
page writing about GO, which he compared with PULP FICTION, arguably
my favorite film, without showing any signs of flinching.  So needless
to say, the film had caught my attention. Then I read on and found out
that the film starred Katie Holmes, who is one of the most beautiful
young women on television, and Sarah Polley, who should have won an
Oscar for her heartbreaking performance in THE SWEET HEREAFTER(the
best film of 1997).
Then, a few weeks later, I saw the trailer for GO. Wow, I thought,
this movie is gonna be a rush. Yes, a rush. I mean, they showed raves,
gunfights, British guys, beautiful women, and a car driving wildly on
the Las Vegas strip while blasting a newly mixed version of "Magic
Carpet Ride." I guess you could say I was not in any position to be
let down.
Just a few weeks ago, another film was compared by many critics to
PULP FICTION, compelling one critic to say it is the first film to
actually riff on PULP FICTION without feeling derivative. This British
import, called LOCK, STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS, was also being
compared to TRAINSPOTTING, another favorite of mine.  So, like any
diehard movie buff, I saw it opening weekend, and was disappointed out
of my mind. Not derivative? My ass!
So, in conclusion to my introduction, I expected GO to disappoint
me. I didn't let anyone know, as pretended I was still in my rush as I
sat down to see the film. The film had already given me trouble this
rainy day(and the night before, as it was sold out, forcing me to see
the new Drew Barrymore film) ,as I took the bus to an area not too
close to where I live, just to see the film at the matinee
showing. But, no, the clerk wouldn't sell me a ticket, because I'm
well under 17 and he just happened to notice.  Hello?! Mr.  Clerk, do
you know how much I've been obsessing over this film!!! I could hear
the GO gods laughing at me from above. They knew about my obsession,
about how much I needed to see the film before my spring break runs
out on me.
So, the next thing I know, the rain comes pouring down on me out of
nowhere.  I felt like Truman Burbank when he finds out the rain only
falls on him. Yes, the rain was for me, only for me! I went back home,
after waiting outside for the bus for at least half an hour.  My dad
then offered to take me to the 4 o'clock show at a close theatre.
Obviously, I would go.
So we get to the theatre, and the film is sold out. Luckily(haha), we
bought tickets to the 5 o'clock show, and went home to kill time
before the show. So then, I went back to the theatre, suffered through
20 trailers, and finally, the experience began...
If you actually think I can muster up enough strength to spell out the
entire plot of GO for you, then you obviously don't know me. Why don't
you just go see the movie??? If you want the plot, go read another
review. Well, I'll tell you this much. GO's plot is PULP FICTIONesque
to a certain degree, but the plot is basically RASHOMON, with four
people discussing one Christmas eve from each of their points of
view. There is sex, murder, drugs and more.
Needless to say, I was in no way disappointed by GO. The film is a
trip, a rush, an overall blast. I doubt a more entertaining film will
hit theatres this year.  Doug Liman mixes elements of PULP FICTION,
FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS, and TRAINSPOTTING into one big melting
pot. So, it's derivative. And the script by John August isn't witty
enough to be entirely comedic. And there isn't anything in the film
that is close to what I'd call depth, whereas PULP FICTION got depth
out of pure originality. I was a little let down by the fact that I
was hoping GO would be the quintessential film for the 90's, but
actually it kind of is. If nothing else, the 90's were fun and
entertaining.  How's that for depth? So, in conclusion, stop comparing
films to PULP FICTION. It's just not worth disappointing people.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Abre los ojos (1997)
rated R
in Spanish with English subtitles
an Artisan Films release
starring Eduardo Noriega, Penelope Cruz, Chete Lera, Fele Martinez,
Gerard Barray, Pepe Navarro, Najwa Nimri
written by Alejandro Amenabar and Mateo Gil
directed by Alejandro Amenabar
As anyone who has seen The Matrix and eXistenZ knows, this year we
have has an abundance of exceptional science-fiction films. I am not a
very big sci-fi fan, but as the year 2000 approaches, these films have
begun to fascinate me immensely.
The latest entry into the genre, Alejandro Amenabar's psychological
thriller Open Your Eyes, suffers from bad timing. While the film is
indeed very good, I have seen it shortly after two very similar
films(look in the first paragraph), and the originality doesn't strike
me nearly as much as it could have.
Open Your Eyes is the story of Cesar(Eduardo Noriega), a young,
handsome, wealthy Spanish man who finds himself accused of a murder
which he is sure he didn't commit(If you think this sounds like Dark
City, you're not the only one. Infact, the first scene of Open Your
Eyes, a dream sequence, shows Cesar waking up, going outside, and
realizing that there is no one on the streets). As he is interrogated
by a prison psychologist(Chete Lera), we, through the eyes of Cesar,
try to figure out exactly what happened.
Cesar decides to throw a party at his house, and his best friend
Pelayo(Fele Martinez) brings with him Sofia(Penelope Cruz), a
beautiful woman whom he met in the library.  Cesar falls instantly in
love, and he ends up taking her back to her home after the party.
After a night of chatting, they agree to meet again the next day. But
as Cesar walks outside, his lusty mistress, Nuria(Najwa Nimri), drives
by in her car, and begs him to join her for one last rendezvous.  He
gets in the car, and she ends up driving off the side of the road and
hitting a tree, killing herself and completely wrecking Cesar's face.
>From then on, the film goes through many, many twists as Cesar tries
to figure out what the hell is going on. There is a line in this
year's extraordinary The Matrix in which Morpheus(Laurence Fishburne)
asks: "Have you ever had a dream that you're so sure was real?  What
if you were unable to wake from that dream? How would you tell the
difference between the dream world, and the real world?"
Open Your Eyes is essentially about our dreams, and the tricks that
our subconscious plays on us.  While the film is clever and
psychological, it is not as fun or stylish as The Matrix and eXistenZ.
Open Your Eyes is definitely worthy of an audience, as long as they're
not expecting the flash of the others. I'm sure I would have enjoyed
this film more had I seen it earlier, though.
Regardless, Alejandro Amenabar is a smashing new talent, and this film
was a hit in it's native Spain.  Penelope Cruz, who made her American
debut in last year's embarrasing The Hi-Lo Country, shows depth as
well as beauty, and hopefully her appeal will cross over to
America. Open Your Eyes is an incredible movie, and if this is not one
of the new sci/fi genre's best, then the genre's gonna thrive for a
long while. Once again, congrats to Artisan Films, quickly becoming
one of best distributors in film today.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
"The Sixth Sense", the new film from M. Night Shyamalan ("Wide
Awake"), explores themes of death and the afterlife in the form of a
psychological thriller. While the subject matter makes the film seem
more existential that the usual big-budget fare, its entire depth is
summed up in the film's signature line: "I see dead people".
Bruce Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who is more
devoted to his work than to his wife (Olivia Williams). One night,
Malcolm is shot by a psychotic former patient (Donnie Wahlberg), but
three months later, he is back on the job.
His next mission is trying to help a troubled 9-year-old boy named
Cole (Haley Joel Osment), who lives alone with his single mother (Toni
Collette). The mother can't pinpoint exactly what's wrong with the
child, but Malcolm makes it his priority, and spends all his time
working on him. However, it takes half the film for Cole to admit that
he can see dead people, who want to use him as their messenger.
Malcolm believes that Cole is suffering from paranoid schizophrenia,
but through a series of bizarre twists, he begins to understand that
Cole is not hallucinating. However, when "The Sixth Sense" is over,
Cole has still not conquered his inner demons, and Shyamalan's
"brilliant" final twist feels like he's trying to shy away from the
fact that he has not resolved the film's major conflict.
Combine that with a not-so-great script and a slow, dragging pace and
you have an unsatisfying thriller. However, there are more than a few
gripping moments in the film, and the dark tone is set perfectly by
James Newton Howard's chilling score.
But what really saves "The Sixth Sense" is excellent acting,
especially by Toniy Collette and child prodigy Haley Joel
Osment. Anyone who has seen the preview knows that Osment steals the
show from Bruce Willis, and in the film, he proves that child actors
deserve better roles, for infact, they do have talent. M. Night
Shyamalan (who appears in the film)'s movie has struck quite a chord
with summer audiences, and he proves that one day he might make a fine
film. "The Sixth Sense", however, is not quite it.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Lucie Aubrac (1997)
rated R
October/USA Films
116 minutes
in French with English subtitles
starring Carole Bouquet, Daniel Auteuil, Patrice Chereau, Jean-Roger
Milo, Eric Boucher, Heino Ferch, Jean Martin, Marie Pillet, Maxime
Henry, Alain Maratarat, Franck de la Personne, Pascal Greggory
based on the novel "Ils Partiront Dans L'Ivresse" by Lucie Aubrac
written and directed by Claude Berri
At the beginning of "Lucie Aubrac", there is a disclaimer explaining
that this film is based on a true story, but certain dramatic
liberties have been taken. One of the film's problems is that not
enough dramatic liberties were taken, and we're left with a competent
historical drama-romance without much to it. Daniel Auteuil plays
Raymond, a member of the French Resistance in 1943. Recently married
to Lucie(Carole Bouquet), he gets arrested while at a secret
meeting. He is then sentenced to death, and it is up to his
headstrong, confident wife to rescue him.  Their love story is
charming, but not gripping. What is really fascinating is how strong
Lucie is; becoming a member of the Resistance and leading the troop to
save her husband's life. However, while the historical aspects of the
film are slightly interesting, there is so little character
development that you'll be bugging yourself to find out which name
belongs to which face. It doesn't help that the characters change
their names every few days. Writer/director Claude Berri has
undoubtebly used a lot of skill in putting this film together, but the
only ones who will really enjoy it are either foreign history buffs or
people who like a sentimental, slow-moving romance. Regardless of the
film's flaws, Carole Bouquet and Daniel Auteuil are excellent. With a
little more drama and emotion, "Lucie Aubrac" would be a fine film.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
Being a recent junior high graduate, I have not yet studied the work
of Oscar Wilde. It is, however, common knowledge that he was one of
the most influential playwrights of the modern era. "An Ideal
Husband", one of his best known productions, has been effectively put
to screen by Oliver Parker, and it features lots of the scathing,
ambiguous dialogue that Wilde is famous for.
The setting is London. The time is the late 1800's. Lord Arthur
Goring(Rupert Everett), a 36-year-old bachelor, is considered the most
eligible single man in London, but he just can't commit himself to one
person, perhaps because of his own selfishness. "To love oneself," he
remarks, "is the beginning of a lifelong romance." However, an old
flame, Laura Cheveley(Julianne Moore), has arrived in town, and things
begin to get interesting.
She decides to blackmail Sir Robert Chiltern(Jeremy Northam), a
high-ranking government official, into supporting a scheme involving
the Suez Canal. If he declines, then she shall go to the press with
the story of how he "stole" his fortune. Sir Robert's wife, Lady
Gertrud(Cate Blanchett) is beginning to get suspicious. Meanwhile, Sir
Robert's sister, Mabel(Minnie Driver) is looking into getting a
husband.
There are a few reasons why "An Ideal Husband" is such wonderful
fun. First and foremost is the job of the remarkable cast. Rupert
Everett and Julianne Moore are the standouts; each one perfect for
their role. Jeremy Northam has his second fine performance after his
outstanding turn in "The Winslow Boy", and Cate Blanchett is back in
period-piece style after her interesting role in "Pushing Tin". Minnie
Driver gives a more low-key performance, but she is dynamic as always.
Oliver Parker, whose debut was 1995's "Othello", makes "An Ideal
Husband" seem expansive rather than stagy. With an amazing cast and
classic source material, it would seem hard to go wrong, but Parker
adds his own touch in the way certain scenes are set up. There's
nothing too original about this production, but the script is fresh
and funny and the film moves along at a quick pace.
"An Ideal Husband" is an ideal summer diversion for those looking for
a breath of fresh air from the blockbuster flicks headed our
way. Miramax is, once again, doing a fine job marketing the film and
they have once again given us a reason for seeing their movies. "An
Ideal Husband" is a period-piece with style, wit and charm.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
First films are usually clumsy, experimental, and uneven. But
43-year-old Erick Zonca has turned the tables with his first film, THE
DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS. Like many French films, THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS
is slow-paced, but the surplus of emotion makes up for the lack of
plot. The film features two outstanding performances from Elodie
Bouchez and Natacha Regnier, who shared the Best Actress award at last
year's Cannes Film Festival, while Peter Mullan took home Best Actor
for MY NAME IS JOE, a similar emotional experience.
The first character we meet in THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS is Isa(Elodie
Bouchez), an impoverished drifter with a past we never learn much
about. She wanders into a French city, selling homemade postcards
which she says are for the poor. A man whom she meets in a cafe lets
her have a sewing job in his factory. In the factory, she meets
Marie(Natacha Regnier), a shy woman given to fits of rage. Marie
agrees to let Isa stay at her flat, which she is taking care of for a
woman who was in a car crash with her young daughter. Isa and Marie
become friends, and during a night on the town, they meet
Charly(Patrick Mercado) and Fredo(Jo Prestia), a couple of bouncers
from a nearby nightclub. Charly and Marie are involved until she meets
Chris(Gregoire Colin), a rich playboy who owns the club. It is obvious
that Marie is with the wrong man, and it seems to be tearing her
apart, and slowly she is suffering a nervous breakdown.  Meanwhile,
Isa has begun to read the personal diary of the girl who was in the
car crash, and she begins to visit the child in the hospital, day
after day.
THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS doesn't offer much in the way of a plot, and
it takes quite a while to get going, but soon it's not hard to see
that the film is a study of two characters, and since they are
portrayed so realistically, it's hard not to feel emotionally drained
after watching the film. The filmmaking is sometimes raw, and
sometimes graceful, depending on the mood of the scene. Erick Zonca is
amazingly gifted, because it takes many filmmakers a few films to
create such a sense of powerful immediacy. THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS is
a superb, riveting film, and is sure to be among the best first films
of the year.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Desert Blue (1998)
rated R
Samuel Goldwyn Films
90 minutes
starring Brendan Sexton III, Kate Hudson, Christina Ricci, John Heard,
Lucinda Jenney, Casey Affleck, Sara Gilbert, Isidra Vega, Ethan
Suplee, Michael Ironside
written and directed by Morgan J. Freeman
I absolutely love small-town movies. Maybe it's something about the
scenery; maybe it's something about the hopelessness of the
characters; maybe it's because I live in a big city. Whatever it is,
I'm not really sure. But something has drawn me to love films such as
"SubUrbia", "Dancer, Texas Pop.  81" and now "Desert Blue".
"Desert Blue" is the new film from writer-director Morgan J. Freeman
(not to be confused with the actor), whose previous film was the messy
but convincing teenage crime drama "Hurricane Streets".  Freeman, who
was the assistant director on Todd Solondz's "Welcome To The
Dollhouse", doesn't make great films, but he knows enough about teens
to accurately portray their emotions.
"Desert Blue" is set in Baxter, CA; home of the world's largest ice
cream cone. Among the population of 80-something are 5 distinctive
teenagers. There is Cale (Ethan Suplee), who wants to be a sheriff,
Haley (Isidra Vega), who works in her father's market, Pete (Casey
Affleck), who races his A.T.V. all day, and Ely (Christina Ricci), who
is obsessed with blowing stuff up with her homemade bombs. The fifth
teenager is Blue (Brendan Sexton III), who works all day on a waterpark
that his late father tried to build.
Blue's father wanted Baxter to become a tourist attraction, so he
built the ice cream cone and he started on a waterpark called "Baxter
Beach". Since Baxter is located on an aqueduct, water should have been
easy to get. But just then, Empire Cola Company moved in, and their
factory had all the rights to the aqueduct. Blue's father then died in
his sleep when a fire burned down the town's motel.
Some time later, Skye (Kate Hudson), a TV star, passes through town
with her dad (John Heard) who is writing a book about small-town
americana and roadside attractions.  The predictably bitchy Skye is
begging her father to take her back to L.A., but just then, a truck
carrying secret ingredients for Empire Cola crashes on the side of the
road, releasing a toxic gas that may be poisonous. A quarantine is
issued, and Skye is forced to stay in town.
At first, Skye won't go anywhere near the group of teens, but when it
becomes apparent that there is nothing else to do, she begins to hang
out with them. Blue and Skye (mind the pun) especially start to hit it
off. Blue has never seen her TV show, but he is fascinated by her,
since she is from the real world. As it goes in the movies, Skye turns
out to have a heart of gold, and Blue finds himself in love with her.
An interesting aspect of "Desert Blue" is that the citizens don't feel
that they're missing much, but when they are quarantined, they realize
that they don't want to be trapped in town forever. A "Breakfast
Club"-like conversation occurs when the teens ask themselves what they
want to make of their lives.
The main conflict of the film is the kids trying to overthrow the
authority of FBI Agent Bellows, who is trying to keep them from
"infecting" anyone, since they may have come into contact with the
toxic formula.
Morgan J. Freeman has crafted a quirky, engaging and affecting
film. "Desert Blue" is rough around the edges, but Freeman knows how
to write and direct the fine cast of teens.  Brendan Sexton III, who
starred in "Hurricane Streets", has some nice chemistry with Kate
Hudson, Goldie Hawn's daughter who appeared in "200 Cigarettes"(with
Christina Ricci and Casey Affleck). Ricci's character is more of a
caricature, but she brings her wit and cynicism to the role.
"Desert Blue" is a quintessential small town film. It addresses the
issues of small town life, and it looks at a part of America that we
often never encounter. Freeman is a talent to keep an eye on.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
Darren Stein's "Jawbreaker" is a mishmash of a bunch of different
movies, including "Heathers", "Clueless" and "Very Bad Things". So why
can't it add up to the sum of its parts? "Jawbreaker" is the story of
a birthday prank gone wrong, when three girls fatally choke their
friend with a jawbreaker. The three most popualr girls in school must
then try to cover up their murder. However, instead of focusing on the
case at hand, "Jawbreaker" needlessly tries to become a lesson in high
school politics, and the characters carry on a lifestyle of excess(not
unlike the characters in "Very Bad Things"). At times, "Jawbreaker" is
sharp, but mostly it comes off as glib, derivative and
uninviting. Needless to say, Rose McGowan is dead-on as the head bitch
and Pam Grier is forceful as Detective Vera Cruz. "Jawbreaker" didn't
really hit any mass audience in theatres, and no mass audience should
seek it out on video.
Note: I know where Darren Stein went to high school, and it doesn't
seem to me that he could have got many of his ideas from there.
a video capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Adventures of Sebastian Cole, The (1998)
Late in "The Adventures Of Sebastian Cole", there is a prom scene. But
it's not a normal high school movie prom scene. A conversation arises
between the title character and his friends, about how different their
prom is from proms they've seen on film, that it prompts Sebastian to
say, "I hate those high school movies."
But Tod Williams' "The Adventures Of Sebastian Cole" turns Ferris
Bueller flat on his face, bringing us a high-school flick that is
offbeat, unsentimental and dead-on. The structure of "Sebastian Cole"
is set up so that we, the viewer, get to experience the randomness of
adolescence.
Sebastian Cole (Adrian Grenier) is a 17-year-old slacker who lives in
upstate New York with his stepfather (Clark Gregg), his mother (Margaret
Colin) and his sister (Marni Lustig). One day, the father calls a
family meeting to announce that he is going to have surgery in order
to become a woman. Sebastian's sister throws a fit and runs off to
California, while Sebastian leaves with his mother to England.
But after six months in an uptight school, he leaves his neurotic mom
and comes back to New York to start his new life with Hank/Henrietta,
his stepfather/stepmother.  Sebastian continues to do poorly in
school, and announces that he just wants to "live" more, and the movie
becomes his adventures.
His adventures include an up-and-down relationship with a girl (Aleksa
Palladino), riding his bike at top speed through the halls of school,
and seeing what happens when he drinks way too much.
Writer/director Tod Williams has the 80's mood down perfectly, but he
is helped by two amazing performances. As Sebastian, newcomer Adrian
Grenier ("Hurricane Streets") pulls off a more-than-believable
portrayal of teenage angst, but it is Clark Gregg, as Hank/Henrietta
who steals the show. He is exceptional without being over-the-top, and
I can see a starring role for him in the near future.
Since many questions are left unanswered, many will leave "The
Adventures Of Sebastian Cole" baffled. But Tod Williams has infused a
subtle grace to the seemingly shaky structure, and he shows that in
teenage life, the answers aren't always there.
"The Adventures Of Sebastian Cole" is not a great film, but it is one
of the most original portrayals of adolescence that I've ever
seen. Tod Williams has made an excellent first film, a film with the
quirkiness of John Irving, but with a style all his own.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Dîner de cons, Le (1998)
The title of Francis Veber's "The Dinner Game" refers to a cruel game
in which a group of men each have to invite an idiot to dinner and
entertain themselves at the idiot's expense. Pierre(Thierry Lhermitte)
has chosen to bring Francois(Jacques Villeret), because he, who spends
his free time making models out of matches, is definitely an
idiot. But as soon as Francois arrives at Pierre's home, Pierre's back
condition worsens and he cannot leave his home. Francois decides to
stay, and he turns Pierre's life upside down, forcing him to lose his
wife, his mistress, his fortune and his mind.  This throwback to the
days of classic screwball comedy was written and directed by Francis
Veber, who wrote "La Cage Aux Folles"; later remade into the inferior
"The Birdcage". A U.S. remake is also on its way for "The Dinner
Game", which is very funny itself. Although I am no fan of farce or
slapstick comedy, the comic timing in "The Dinner Game" is too superb
to be ignored. Entertaining but slight, "The Dinner Game" is a
pleasant art-house diversion.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Violon rouge, Le (1998)
not rated
Lions Gate Films
in English, Mandarin, Italian, German, and French with English subtitles
starring Samuel L. Jackson, Don McKellar, Carlo Cecchi, Irene Grazioli,
Jean-Luc Bideau, Christoph Koncz, Jason Flemyng, Greta Scacchi, Sylvia Chang
written by Don McKellar with Francois Girard
directed by Francois Girard
In Francois Girard's "Red Violin", the title object changes hands many
times over the course of two centuries, but it is never made clear to
whom, how and why this happens. The journey takes us from a modern
Canadian setting where the flawless violin is being auctioned, to
Vienna, China, Oxford and Italy before returning to the auction. This
foreign-language ensemble piece has some noteworthy moments in each of
its segments but on the whole it's a mess. As I already mentioned, not
much is made clear, so the segments don't have a connection. It seems
to be a different violin in each part.  The standout in a fine cast is
Samuel L. Jackson, taking a different path this time around as a
Canadian violin expert. Don't worry, fans; Jackson shows off his
trademark tenacity yelling at a hotel manager. Director Francois
Girard and writer/actor Don McKellar, who combined their talents on
"Thirty-Two Short Films About Glenn Gould", have crafted a film that
is interesting at times, and dull at times. The main flaw of "The Red
Violin" is that it doesn't use its title object to connect the
stories.  I recommend this film to fans of classical music; all others
steer clear.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Goat on Fire and Smiling Fish (1999)
Los Angeles is the city of angels, where the sun
always shines and the stars walk the streets; where
earthquakes and riots do little to phase the happy
lives of the smiling citizens.  But, according to two
new romantic comedies, the fair city has its share of
lonely young folk.  Whether they're single and looking
or stuck in dating hell, these twenty-somethings are
all searching for something better.
Valerie Breiman's Love & Sex is a
semi-autobiographical story of life in L.A.'s dating
game.  Famke Janssen plays Kate, a tall, attractive
magazine journalist who is forced to write a woman's
guide to love and sex in one day.  So, of course, Kate
turns to her own experiences for inspiration.
She has had her share of men, from a sixth-grade
sweetheart to a married maniac to her high-school
French teacher.  But only one lover ever has a real
impact upon Kate.  His name is Adam (Jon Favreau); an
artist with everyday looks and cozy charm.  Having
slept with only three women, he is intimidated by
Kate's sexual experience, but that is part of what
makes him her ideal man.  Soon, the two settle down
for what is the most genuine, meaningful and tough
relationship of Kate's life.
Love & Sex is not unlike many other recent
romantic-comedies, including the superior High
Fidelity.  But the film has a special charm because it
portrays the everyday moments of the lives people in
love.  For example, Kate isn't above farting in front
of Adam, and Adam doesn't mind making fun of her
abnormally large feet.
Famke Janssen, a former Bond-girl, is terrific as
Kate, proving to be as adept at humor as she is at
action (she also starred in this summer's X-Men).  Jon
Favreau makes an affable love interest, using his
everyman demeanor to its full effect.  And, after
helming a couple calamitous 80's T&A flicks ("Going
Overboard" and "Bikini Squad"), former actress Valerie
Breiman seems to be headed in the right direction. 
Love & Sex isn't quite as witty or insightful as
Favreau's own Swingers, but, thanks to wonderful
performances by two young stars, it's an ideal date
flick.
Smiling Fish and Goat On Fire, on the other hand, is
an ideal movie for anyone, anytime, anywhere.  It was
shot in twelve days for a measly $40,000, but the film
has enough heart to make any low-budget limitations
invisible.  Smiling Fish could be this year's The
Brothers McMullen.
The title refers to the two names given to brothers
Chris and Tony, by their Native American grandmother,
to emphasize their contrasting personalities.  Chris
(Derick Martini) is a moody and often serious
accountant, earning the title Goat on Fire.  Tony
(Steven Martini) is a fun-loving, out-of-work actor;
always a Smiling Fish.
Chris' relationship with a long-time girlfriend is
disintegrating when he meets Anna (Rosemarie Addeo), a
beautiful Italian animal wrangler with whom he is
smitten.  He also befriends his boss' 80-year-old
uncle Clive (Bill Henderson), a retired sound man from
the glory days of the original African-American motion
picture studio.  With his knowledge of romance and
lessons of life, Clive becomes the emotional center of
the film.
Tony can't seem to go a day without attracting new
women, but his string ends when he falls for Kathy
(Christa Miller), his mail-carrier.  A single mother
with an outspoken young daughter, Kathy plans to move
back to Wyoming if her daughter doesn't get the role
on a TV show; a show that Tony is also trying out for.
Of all the relationships in the film, the strongest is
between Chris and Tony.  They live together in a nice
home, and share a strong bond that their romantic
relationships have never seemed to break.  Siblings
Derick and Steve Martini (who also co-wrote the film)
play off their real-life brotherhood wonderfully.
Smiling Fish and Goat On Fire, which is being
"presented" by longtime independent film supporter
Martin Scorsese, won the Discovery Award at the
Toronto Film Festival, and has been riding a wave of
deserving applause ever since.  It's a warm,
life-affirming film, which is more than can be said of
most so-called romantic comedies.    
-Akiva Gottlieb 
http://www.pictureshow.8m.com

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
rated R
starring John Cusack, Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina Jolie,
Jake Weber, Kurt Fuller, Vicki Lewis
based on the article "Something's Got To Give" by Darcy Frey
written by Glen Charles and Les Charles
directed by Mike Newell
According to a character in PUSHING TIN, Mike Newell's very
interesting new comedy, air traffic controllers have a higher risk of
depression, alcoholism, and suicide than workers in any other
profession. When I first heard the remark, I took it as a joke, but
after the film was through, I understood that it was indeed a fact.
John Cusack stars as Nick Falzone, a New York area air traffic
controller who, according to himself, "pushes tin" better than any of
his colleagues. His marriage to Connie(Oscar nominee Cate Blanchett)
is working out fairly nice, and he doesn't let the fact that he has to
make thousands of fateful choices every day bring him down.
But then Russell Bell(Billy Bob Thornton), the Marlboro Man of air
traffic control, gets shipped from his southern post to New York. An
intense rivalry between Nick and Russell begins. Nick begins to crush
on Russell's young, voluptuous, alcoholic wife Mary(Angelina Jolie),
while Russell starts to take a liking to Connie. Nick and Russell's
rivarly ensues during work and at home, with each character trying to
outdo each other so intensely that they end up trying to control not
only planes but their own lives.
John Cusack is fine as always as the protagonist, and PUSHING TIN is a
film in which he can show off his dramatic and comedic chops. It has
been a while since Cusack's sarcasm and charisma totally shine in one
performance.
Billy Bob Thornton stays low-key during most of the film, but he
portrays his villain nicely. Thornton is indeed talented, but I'd like
to see him play more SLING BLADE-type roles instead of being typecast
as a southern devil who just happens to have a certain amount of
grace.
Cate Blanchett's performance, though, is questionable. First of all,
why should this actress of tremendous skill be miscast in her first
American role? She tries hard enough to perfect a New York drawl but
her Australian voice pops through one too many times. Blanchett is a
commanding actress, and she deserves a role with more prowess.
And then there is the great Jolie. Angelina Jolie. There is nothing
that special about her performance in PUSHING TIN(she is very
underused), but she is much different than her characted in PLAYING BY
HEART, so I guess I'll say that she shows some depth. Seriously,
everyone should take notice. Angelina Jolie is going to take over
Hollywood.
Director Mike Newell has shown his knack for drama(DONNIE BRASCO) and
comedy(FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL), and PUSHING TIN gives him the
chance to combine both.  For the most part, it works very well, but
the last 1/3 of the film features a couple plot elements that are too
contrived to take seriously. If nothing else, Newell has provided a
film that works on many levels, both as a drama and a comedy, and also
the film shows us very interestingly a job that many of us have never
seen or even thought about. PUSHING TIN is also partly a romance, but
mostly it's just the kind of film you want to see. That's my
recommedation.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Election (1999)
It is 1999, and America, for the most part, is tired of politics. In
1998, the year of the Clinton/Lewinsky scandal, we had 3 political
comedies: PRIMARY COLORS, WAG THE DOG and BULWORTH. This year, we have
the unlikely teenage political satire ELECTION, which is the first
mildly ambitious film from the folks at MTV Films, but even that
cannot fully save the movie itself.
Matthew Broderick plays Jim McAllister, 3-time Teacher of the Year at
Carver High School. As you may have guessed from the title, it is the
time of year for student council elections. The only presidential
candidate is Tracy Flick(Reese Witherspoon), an ambitious
goody-two-shoes who takes the election quite seriously.
But Mr. McAllister has his second thoughts about Tracy. A couple years
before, Tracy had been carrying on an affair with a teacher at the
school(Mark Harelik), who happened to be McAllister's close family
friend. When the news broke out, the teacher's wife, Linda(Delaney
Driscoll), filed for divorce immediately, and since then,
Mr. McAllister has been constantly with her, helping her run errands
while Mrs. McAllister(Molly Hagan) helps her take care of her son.
Mr. McAllister is just dying to to take his friendship with Linda to
an adulterous level.
So, that seems to be a basic motive for Mr. McAllister to want to
sabotage Tracy's election campaign. And the battle begins. The first
pawn that he throws her way is Paul Metzler(Chris Klein), who was the
school's quarterback until he broke his leg in a skiing accident. He
doesn't really care too much about running, but Mr. McAllister seems
to inspire him enough. Paul has no hard feelings for Tracy, and
infact, he wants her to win. But Tracy feels nothing but genuine rage
for McAllister.
Then, there is Tammy Metzler(Jessica Campbell), Paul's younger sister
who just happens to be a lesbian. After her best friend/lover starts
gettin' jiggy with Paul, Tammy declares all-out war, and becomes a
nominee herself. She feels that people shouldn't vote at all in this
phony election.
Sound familiar? Probably, if you've ever followed a real election
campaign, which ELECTION attemps to satirize. Director Alexander Payne
is no stranger to satire. He made the abortion comedy CITIZEN
RUTH. And ELECTION, his latest film, is a very smart, very funny, very
witty satire itself. But the problem lies in the characters. The only
marginally likable character is Paul Metzler, and this guy's a
dumbass.
Reese Witherspoon, who should remind many of a young Holly Hunter, is
one of the finest young actresses working today, but her character
isn't given any attractive or likable qualities. That is not to say
that this isn't one of her better performances; I just wish she had a
role that would let her do more. And as for Matthew Broderick, why oh
why? Forget FERRIS BUELLER; Matthew Broderick is a bad, bad actor, and
his performance in ELECTION proves my point exactly. And to have to
listen to all this voice-over whining makes the film bad enough.
To all the critics who said Max Fischer in RUSHMORE was unlikable, I
ask you to think a little bit about the characters in ELECTION. But,
needless to say, if ELECTION was trying to prove a point that all
politicians are unlikable, they have got that job done. But after the
presidential scandal of 1998, did we really need any more proof of
that fact?


Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
THE HURRICANE (Universal Pictures)- Norman (`Moonstruck')
Jewison's latest film is a biopic of former boxer Ruben
`Hurricane' Carter, who, in the mid-60's, was framed for the
murder of three white men and sentenced to life in prison.
Carter's story (which Bob Dylan immortalized in his song,
`Hurricane') is an important one, and it involves the topic of
racial injustice, which Norman Jewison depicted to perfection in films
such as `In The Heat Of The Night', `A Soldier's Story'
and even `Fiddler On The Roof' .  But in order to truly express
my disappointment at `The Hurricane', I must quote fellow critic
Roger Ebert.  `Movies aren't about what they're about,' he
says.  `They're about how they're about what they're
about.' Jewison has the story (and the 2 1/2 hour running time) for
an epic, but the script (by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon) and
direction are wildly unfocused, making this `Hurricane' a
near-disaster.
        Luckily, Denzel Washington plays Ruben Carter, and his
performance is riveting throughout.  Carter's jail scenes are more
than watchable, but they do not make up the core of the film.
Instead, `The Hurricane' is about Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon
Shannon), a teenager who is so moved by Carter's biography that he
starts to visit the convict and attempt to free him.  But their
friendship is portrayed in such melodramatic fashion that all feeling
is lost, and we end up with a dull movie about a boy trying to solve a
murder-mystery.  Jewison adds a thick layer of cheese on what could
have been an intense emotional experience.  Not exactly what I
expected from the last film to be released this millennium.
        Supposedly, Universal Pictures is expecting to garner some
Oscars for this `inspirational true story', but Denzel
Washington's intense portrayal is the only reason to see this
otherwise atrocious excuse for a film.  But what do I know?  `The
Hurricane' was praised at this year's Cannes Film Festival,
where it received a standing ovation.  There is a good film somewhere
at the core of this mess, and with some major editing, maybe the
viewers will be able to see it.  Norman Jewison may be an experienced
filmmaker, but to me, real experience is knowing that films are about
more than they're about.(opens December 29 in limited release)


Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
Ever since he stormed on to the indie scene in 1989 with `Sex, Lies
and Videotape', director Steven Soderbergh has made films that
stray from the mainstream (`King Of The Hill' and `Gray's
Anatomy' being two of his better efforts). Last year, `Out Of
Sight', his critically acclaimed dark romantic comedy, tanked
during a busy summer at the box office. It was his first studio film.
Probably because of his disappointment, he has returned to his roots
with `The Limey', a strikingly stylish and elegant film noir
fueled by a tour de force performance by Terence Stamp. `The
Limey', shot at times on a handheld camera, is an excellent,
expertly paced movie which entertains and enlightens.
Terence Stamp and Peter Fonda, two 60's icons from separate
continents, play enemies caught in the midst of a deadly
predicament. Wilson (Stamp) has just finished a nine-year jail term in
England, and flies out to Los Angeles to avenge the death of his
daughter, Jenny. She reportedly died in a car crash, but Wilson senses
that his headstrong daughter would be too smart to fall asleep at the
wheel.
He is helped by Jenny's two former friends (played by Luis Guzman
and Lesley Ann Warren), and his search leads him to Terry Valentine
(Fonda), a wealthy record exec (and former boyfriend of Jenny's)
whose heart is still in the 60's.
As Wilson continues his odyssey, he dives more deeply into a life of
crime and learns about the daughter he was never there for. Stamp's
fiery performance conveys a yearning to start over, and to have
another chance to bring up his neglected daughter. He will never get
that chance, but he seeks vengeance for her sake.
Steven Soderbergh directs `The Limey' with the maturity of an
Orson Welles.  Refreshingly, `The Limey' doesn't waste time
with inconsequential conversation or subplots. The story-telling is
direct, from first frame to last.
Quick cuts and flashbacks are not used pretentiously, but rather to
further the story. Two conversations may be going on at once, but each
one is clear. The juxtapositions save several minutes of screen
time. A predictable trick would have been to have a romantic subplot
involving Stamp and Lesley Ann Warren, but conventionality is not part
of Soderbergh's picture. This is the way films should be made.
Another reason `The Limey' works so well is the way it works the
60's motif into the action. The soundtrack, with songs like
`Magic Carpet Ride' and The Who's `The Seeker', sounds
cool and adds to the mood. Terence Stamp and Peter Fonda may have
seemed past their time, but they end up making tenacious older men.
`The Limey' is not Elmore Leonard `Out Of Sight' material,
because there are no pulp characters and because Lem Dobbs (`Dark
City') gives the actors mature un-Tarantino dialogue. Stamp's
Wilson is driven and mad, recalling many classic noir characters.
The film has more depth than the average thriller, yet the surface
material itself is better than most.  Like in Alexandre Dumas'
`The Count of Monte Cristo', revenge is presented as a noble
deed, despite the crimes involved.
In a bold move, Soderbergh has decided to use real scenes of a younger
Stamp for the flashbacks.  They are taken from `Poor Cow', a
1967 film best known for being the debut of acclaimed British
filmmaker Ken Loach (`My Name Is Joe').
`The Limey' will not be patronized by a large audience (although
Terence Stamp's performance may stir up some buzz), but it is a
satisfying return to form for Steven Soderbergh. It is the kind of
film that can be made only by a veteran, and it may be this
director's finest accomplishment yet.


Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
There is a certain character we've seen many times before in American
cinema. He is the unlikely hero; a boy who perseveres enough to pursue his
dreams. In OCTOBER SKY, that character is Homer Hickam. The movie is based,
however loosely, on Homer's autobiography, "Rocket Boys". It is the story of
a boy from Coalwood, West Virginia, who witnesses the launching of Russia's
Sputnik rocket into the October sky in 1957, and is immediately obsessed
with building one of his own. In an early scene, Homer, not cut out for
football, tries out for the team anyway, and recieves a comment from his
coach who tells him that he just doesn't give up. Homer doesn't make the
team, but we have evidence that he is not an ordinary boy. That is why when
he tells his parents that he wants to build a rocket, it comes as no
surprise. Homer, influenced by a school teacher(Laura Dern), gets 3 friends,
including the school nerd, Quentin(Chris Owen), to help him build this
rocket. Soon, even after a few failed launches, they are the talk of the
town. These nerds have become the new jocks. Cheerleaders skip a football
game in order to cheer the rocket boys. Everyone in town is interested.
Everyone, that is, except for Homer's father, John Hickam.
John is the head of the coal mining corporation that is the sole purpose of
Coalwood. Only the football players get college scholarships; everyone else
goes to work in the mines. John is very disappointed that Homer is
interested in this "dumb rocket business", and wants him to follow in his
footsteps. Homer, of course, wants to do something different, being the boy
that he is. The father-son relationship at the heart of OCTOBER SKY works
very well for most of the film, because of the great performance of Chris
Cooper. Cooper, from John Sayles' LONE STAR, is used to playing roles in
which he is a quiet outsider. His perfromance in OCTOBER SKY is exactly the
opposite. As John, Cooper shows depth and talent rarely seen in big name
actors. Relative newcomer Jake Gyllenhaal, whom I've had the pleasure of
seeing in one of his school musicals, is also quite good, but he is
outshined by Cooper.
>From what you have read above, you are probably under the impression that
OCTOBER SKY is a excellent, moving film. But the sad truth is, OCTOBER SKY
is predictable, melodramatic, and overly sentimental. There are moments in
OCTOBER SKY in which I was thinking about just how much of Hickam's book was
actually put into this film. This film is so predictable and by-the-numbers,
that I kept hoping for some kind of originality to appear. Also, writer
Lewis Colick(GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI) pushes all the wrong emotional buttons
in trying to get us to like OCTOBER SKY. This wouldn't be all that
disappointing in another movie, but watching this one, you can tell that
there is a touch of greatness trying to break out of this sugary-sweet mess.
But I have to give props to the producers of OCTOBER SKY, for showing us the
first '99 film with even a little ambition. 
review by the Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
www.angelfire.com/mo/film.html 


Title
Review for Loss of Sexual Innocence, The (1999)
rated R
Sony Pictures Classics
starring Julian Sands, Saffron Burrows, Stefano Dionisi, Gina McKee, Kelly
MacDonald, Femi Ogumbanjo, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers, Hanne Klintoe
written and directed by Mike Figgis
As much as I hate to say it, Mike Figgis has only made one film worth
seeing. That film was the gritty, heartbreaking drama "Leaving Las
Vegas". And as I look back at it, the performances of Nicolas Cage and
Elisabeth Shue carried a film that was merely above average. His
second post-"Vegas" film(after the awful "One Night Stand") is the
plotless, narcissistic and dull "Loss Of Sexual Innocence".
"The Loss Of Sexual Innocence" is essentially a series of unrelated
moments in the life of Nic, a British filmmaker. The stories are
supposedly autobiographical, and if that's true, then I have learned
things about Figgis that I'm better off not knowing. The moments in
Nic's life are pointlessly intercut with scenes of a modern Adam and
Eve.
The irony of the film is that we see Nic in so many stages of life,
yet at the end we still know almost nothing about him. I happen to
think that Mike Figgis was just being self-important by intercutting
scenes of Adam and Eve and flashing titles across the screen before
each new segment, so if there's any subtlety to be found, I didn't see
it.
If there is anything redeeming about "The Loss Of Sexual Innocence",
it is Benoit Delhomme's lucid cinematography. There is something
subtle about his own work, even though it can't add any depth to a
shallow film. And what is with the title? This is not a term
paper. The best that can be said about the film is that it's
unconventional, but conventionality may have made this an interesting
character study.
There are certain filmmakers who can turn narcissism into a fine art,
as Vincent Gallo did in last year's excellent "Buffalo '66". Mike
Figgis, however, needs to learn that while independent film is about
our own visions, it is also about how we present those visions on
film. If Mike Figgis stares at a house for five minutes, that doesn't
mean it needs to be translated onto a reel. Where "Leaving Las Vegas"
was compassionate, "The Loss Of Sexual Innocence" is selfish. What a
disappointment.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
*ANYWHERE BUT HERE* (rated PG-13, 114 minutes, Twentieth Century Fox)- This
new film by Wayne Wang, director of "Smoke" and "The Joy Luck Club", is
sentimental and mediocre, but the touching performances of Susan Sarandon
and Natalie Portman make it almost worthwhile.  "Anywhere But Here", based
on the novel by Mona Simpson, tells the age-old story of a mother and
daughter who go searching for a better life.  In this film, 14-year-old Ann
August is forced by her outrageous mother to leave Bay City, Wisconsin for
the exciting world of Beverly Hills.  Ann doesn't want to leave the life
she's used to, but her mother, Adele, is a dreamer with hopes and
aspirations.  What follows are two years of role-playing, and the lines
between mother and daughter are often blurred.  Ann is often the mature,
sensible one while Adele is the wild-child.  Their coming-of-age isn't
always convincing, but the actresses each make it seem plausible.  
However, not much can be said about the film beyond their relationship.
The outsiders, such as Benny (Shawn Hatosy), Ann's cousin from back home,
are used mostly for sentimental effect, and no real emotion is evident.  As
a showcase for two wonderful performances, "Anywhere But Here" works to a
certain extent, but I expected a better film from Wang, who knows how to
work with strong female characters.  Expect some Oscar buzz for Natalie
Portman, who really fleshes out her character despite a clunky script, but
don't expect anything special from the film itself.


Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
I remember critics talking about David O. Russell's first two films,
the quirky indies "Spanking The Monkey" and "Flirting With
Disaster". The former is about a coming of age story of a boy in the
midst of an oedipal relationship, and the latter is about a young man
who goes across the country searching for his birth parents. Both are
said to be somewhat autobiographical. Both are comedies.
Russell would seem to be an odd choice to write and direct "Three
Kings", a story about four Gulf War soldiers who go searching for
millions of dollars in gold that Saddam Hussein has stolen from
Kuwait. However, despite a number of flaws, David O. Russell's
Hollywood debut is a solid, successful effort.
"Three Kings" is not really a war movie. It begins just as the Persian
Gulf War has come to an end, and the U.S. army is taking their final
prisoners of war. As we learn through title cards which appear on the
screen, Archie Gates (George Clooney) is a soldier who's retiring in
two weeks, Chief Elgin (Ice Cube) is on an all expenses paid vacation
from Detroit, Troy Barlow (Mark Wahlberg) has a wife and young baby at
home, and Vig (Spike Jonze, director of the upcoming "Being John
Malkovich") would like nothing more than to be Troy Barlow.
The day the war ends, Troy and Vig find a handwritten map while
searching an Iraqi war prisoner (I'm not gonna tell you where they
find it on him). Upon further inspection by Chief Elgin, the three
realize that it is some kind of treasure map, which should lead to the
gold which Saddam is believed to have stolen from Kuwait. Archie, who
is supposed to be helping out ambitious news reporter Adrianna Cruz
(Nora Dunn), gets wind of their little secret, and declares himself
the leader.
The four soldiers go AWOL, take a Humvee and jet out across the
deserts of Iraq. But when they reach the city which has the gold, they
realize they're in for much more than they bargained for. The war is
over, but the Iraqi citizens are still in great danger. President Bush
has told them to rise up against Saddam, but how are they supposed to
do that with no food and few weapons? The soldiers decide to put their
greed aside for a while, and "Three Kings" becomes more dramatic than
comedic.
The morals of these four men catch up with them, and without thinking,
they break the cease fire treaty while trying to save some
villagers. Their new mission is to transport almost 100 Iraqi women
and children over the border to Iran. However, when Desert Storm hears
about this illegal mission, they set out across the desert to find
them.
"Three Kings" has some very powerful moments, and it is the first film
to portray the Persian Gulf War, where many soldiers were bored by the
lack of action. "Three Kings", however, is very, very graphic in its
scenes of violence. Some of the shots are done one frame at a time in
slow motion, and the bullets are seen numerous times inside a
character's stomach. I don't think that was the lesson that filmmakers
should have learned from "Saving Private Ryan".
During some parts of the film, I was thankful that it was a comedy. In
quite a few scenes, such as when Troy has been captured and is being
interrogated by an criminal, it would be very tough to watch if they
weren't intercut with a few comedic riffs involving the other 3
soldiers.
The buzz on "Three Kings" has been great, but it's a slick, satisfying
film rather than a masterpiece.  David O. Russell has done a fine job
with this entertaining and self conciously hip movie, but dont expect
it to win Oscars like some say it will.
"Three Kings" manages to squeeze out fine performances by George
Clooney, Mark Wahlberg and Ice Cube; all three of whom have had their
ups and downs. Up and coming actors Spike Jonze and Jamie Kennedy have
a couple of annoying little characters, but they each have their own
brand of humor and it works.
The ending is a big upper, which should please audiences, but I think
that Russell should have followed this powerful film with something
more real. Unsung heroes are called unsung heroes because they never
are realized for what they are. If these "Three Kings" ended up behind
bars for doing something that everyone else was afraid to do, then we
would be seeing a more interesting and powerful piece of
filmmaking. But, hey, "Three Kings" is a still wonderful entertainment
so I should just shut up. Highly recommended, but not for the
squeamish.


Title
Review for Besieged (1998)
rated R
Fine Line Features
in English and Italian with English subtitles
starring Thandie Newton, David Thewlis, Claudio Santamaria
based on a story by James Landun
written by Bernardo Bertolucci and Clare Peploe
directed by Bernardo Bertolucci
An old African man plucks a tribal instrument and sings in a scratchy
voice.  A woman walks alone down a dirt road, then watches her husband
get taken away to a military prison. A lonely man sits in an enormous
Roman home and plays an intense piece he has just composed on the
piano.
These are but a few of the breathtaking images caught on film in
Bernardo Bertolucci's beautifully made "Besieged". Over many years,
this Italian filmmaker has made a name for himself with exquisite,
emotional films such as "The Last Emperor" and "Last Tango In
Paris". Bertolucci's latest film, "Besieged" is a work of art if I've
ever seen one.
The film stars Thandie Newton, who was robbed of a much-deserved Oscar
nod for her gritty work in the title role of last year's
underappreciated "Beloved", as Shandurai, a beautiful black woman
working as a maid in the home of lonely pianist Mr. Kinsky (David
Thewlis). Shandurai's husband has been imprisoned for unkown reasons,
and she is learning that Mr.  Kinsky is in love with her.
Shandurai tries to shy away from men since she is married (her only
friend is homosexual), and Mr.  Kinsky doesn't push her. The siege
mentioned in the title is a subtle, emotional one. As the film
progresses, Shandurai feels herself falling into Mr. Kinsky's trap.
There is not much plot to speak of in "Besieged", for it is a collage
of incredible images piled on to one another; each one having
ambiguous meaning. The last scene of the film, however, undercuts the
satisying buildup, and will leave most viewers out in the dark.
"Besieged" is a cold film, but an engrossing one. Bertolucci's
attention to detail creates a vivid motion picture.
But as I left the theatre, I couldn't help but want to know more about
each character's background. Shandurai's dark past is barely hinted
at, and Mr. Kinsky has no story at all. There is such a serious
drought of dialogue in this film, that I'm sure Quentin Tarantino
could have made this entire screenplay into a 5 minute film.
But Bernardo Bertolucci's swift hand and Fabio Cianchetti's lucid
camerawork keep "Besieged" real. The very special thing about this
movie is that I'm sure 10 people could walk out of it with entirely
different opinions of each aspect. If you like films that are
unabashedly artsy, then "Besieged" was made just for you.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for My Son the Fanatic (1998)
"My Son The Fanatic", the latest from director Udayan Prasad, is an
occasionally comedic drama that tackles an important subject, but does
so incoherently. Om Puri gives an exceptional performance as Parvez, a
Pakistani cab driver in Northern England whose son has just called off
his wedding to an Englishwoman because of his budding Islam
Fundamentalist beliefs. Parvez, who recieves most of his business by
driving around prostitutes(most notably Bettina, played by Rachel
Griffiths), puts up his argument for British conformity against his
son's Muslim idealism. The interesting thing about "My Son The
Fanatic" is that both arguments are convincing. But while the film's
conflict is a relevant one, the film itself is poorly wrought.
Despite a few powerful scenes, "My Son The Fanatic" is largely dull
and uninviting. The elements of comedy that are worked it seemed
forced and unnecessary, since the theme of the film is decidedly
downbeat.  Director Udayan Prasad has decided to forget about style
and structure and let the actors do their work. Om Puri brings a lot
of emotion to his role as the torn father; while bit players Rachel
Griffiths and Stellan Skarsgard seem merely competent in his
presence. "My Son The Fanatic" presents many moral questions, and in a
better-made film, they would have been answered.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
In the past 5 years, animation has come a long way; or so it
seems. New formats, including high-tech computer animation are
threatening to take the glamour away from Disney's yearly
"masterpiece".  However, it is a film like "The Iron Giant", without
any sidekicks or musical interludes, that I think can make the most
change for the genre. "The Iron Giant" is a wonderful film for adults
and kids that just happens to be animated. It is the story of a boy
named Hogarth(what?)  who, in 1950's Maine, discovers an iron giant
made by a foreign country as a weapon. However, this being the movies,
the iron giant turns out to have a heart of gold, and learns to
triumph over his impulses. Christopher McDonald voices a government
agent who is after the iron giant because he believes he can cause
harm, and Jennifer Aniston is Hogarth's single mother. While the story
is kid-friendly, adults will enjoy the precise reworking of small-town
1950, where people fear the dropping of "the bomb" and learn to "duck
and cover". Despite being a fine film, "The Iron Giant" feels a lot
like a tired rehash of "E.T." But director Brad Bird has a lot of
creative vision, and writer Tim McCanlies("Dancer, Texas Pop. 81")
makes the dialogue sound real; a rare quality in an animated film.
"The Iron Giant" is a successful experiment that might have been
better, but its heart is in the right place, and it truly is a film
that adults will enjoy just as much as the kids. Take a chance and see
this flick.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
"Bowfinger" is one of those comedies that is supposed to entertain at
Hollywood's expense. Albert Brooks' recent "The Muse", made by the
independent October Films, did entertain at Hollywood's
expense. "Bowfinger", however, is made by Universal, a major movie
studio; so exactly how incisive was Steve Martin's script allowed to
be? Judging from my viewing of the film, not at all.
Bobby Bowfinger(Steve Martin) is more than down on his luck. His
company, Bowfinger International Pictures, is run out of a torn-up
little house, and hasn't made a film in what seems like years. But,
when a former secretary submits an original screenplay about aliens,
entitled "Chubby Rain", Bowfinger calls it dramatic genius and sets
out to make a film.
When he pitches it to a big studio exec.(Robert Downey Jr.), he reads
the first and last pages of the script and tells Bowfinger that if he
can get action star Kit Ramsey(Eddie Murphy) to sign on, then it's a
"go" picture. When Ramsey turns him down outright, Bowfinger comes up
with an idea; he wants to film Ramsey's scenes without him knowing it,
by having the actors go up to him, say their lines, and watch his
reaction. It turns out that Ramsey is having delusional problems
anyway.
Bowfinger then holds auditions for the acting roles, and Daisy(Heather
Graham), a young woman from Ohio who arrived with dreams of being a
star, gets the main female role. Daisy is not quite as naive as she
looks, knowing that sleeping around in Hollywood can get you almost
anything. But Bowfinger's real find is Jiff(also Eddie Murphy), a
dimwitted burger-flipper who happens to look exactly like Kit
Ramsey. From there, "Bowfinger" is the story of a group of misfits
trying to make a Hollywood "guerrilla" film.
However, "Bowfinger" is not nearly as clever or funny as it set out to
be.  Being a Hollywood film, it never really takes a stance on today's
Hollywood and never turns into what I'd call a satire. Most of Steve
Martin's script isn't clever, but rather dumb humor. Just as Bowfinger
pretends to be a big-time director, "Bowfinger" pretends to be
original and fresh.
The acting, though, is above-average. Heather Graham finds a good
comedic role in her caricature of a scene-whore, and Eddie Murphy is
great in both roles; especially as Jiff(he has done the dual role
thing before, in "The Nutty Professor"). Murphy has been skewing away
from children's movies this year, which seems to be a start on the
right track for him. Frank Oz's direction could have been tighter, but
this is essentially Martin's film to make or break.
"Bowfinger" is not totally unfunny; it's more of a hit-and-miss comedy
that misses a bit too much. If you would like a no-holds-barred satire
of Hollywood(that is still quite subtle) I suggest you check out "The
Muse". It has the wit, heart, and vigor that "Bowfinger" is sorely
lacking.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for West Beyrouth (1998)
Ziad Doueiri is best known in the U.S. for being the cameraman for
Quentin Tarantino's films. But there is a story behind every person
(even in Hollywood). Doueiri has used his filmmaking experience to
bring his true childhood experiences to the screen in the poignant
"West Beirut". The film takes place in Beirut, Lebanon in 1975, where
a civil war is breaking out. For Tarek (Rami Doueiri) and Omar
(Mohamad Chamas), the cancellation of school brings a newfound
freedom.  They roam the streets of the war-torn city, making Super 8
films and generally causing mischief. The kids don't realize the
seriousness of the war, which has separated their city into two
sections; East (Christian) and West (Muslim) Beirut. Doueiri also
focuses on the tensions surrounding Tarek's parents. His father
(Joseph Bou Nassar) has faith in Beirut and will not leave, while his
mother (Carmen Lebbos) is overcome with tension and stays only because
she seems to have no choice.  For most of its 105 minute running time,
"West Beirut" is a vivid, involving slice of life showing us a city in
turmoil. However, in the final third of the film, the lack of a clear
plot undermines the realism, and the characters find themselves in
far-fetched situations. I would rather have had Doueiri let the story
tell itself. In the press notes, Doueiri remarks that he made the film
from memory of certain images, and not from memory of a story. But the
images are definitely there, and "West Beirut" is at times very
moving. The story behind the film is just as interesting as the film
itself. For the child actors, Doueiri chose his brother, Rami, to play
his alter-ego, and chose Mohamad Chamas, a penniless orphan, to play
his childhood friend. Chamas now lives in a shack in a Beirut refugee
camp. His only close relative, a brother, is in jail. The images in
"West Beirut" are therefore very real.  Ziad Doueri's debut film is
flawed, but it is a coming-of-age picture made with care and
relevance. In the early 1980's, Doueiri fled Lebanon and went to USC
Film School. Others will never be that lucky, and this film is for
them.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Mifunes sidste sang (1999)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
In 1995, a group of distinguished Scandinavian
filmmakers decided that today's films lack purity. So
they wrote up a manifesto called Dogme 95; a set of
rules that a filmmaker should follow in order to make
a `pure' film. According to the manifesto, a film
should be shot on digital video, use natural props and
light, not fit into a specific genre or credit its
director.
In 1998, Thomas Vinterberg helmed the first Dogme
film, `The Celebration', which won unanimous critical
praise for transcending technical limitations in its
tale of a dysfunctional family. In 1999, Harmony
Korine directed the (unofficial) 2nd Dogme picture
(Lars Von Trier's `Idioterne', which was made before,
has yet to have a U.S. release), `julien donkey-boy',
which was panned by critics for accentuating technical
limitations in its analysis of a dysfunctional family.
Now, in 2000, Soren Kragh-Jacobsen has made the 3rd
Dogme film, `Mifune', which has gained a lukewarm
reception for its unconventional story ofyou guessed
it; a dysfunctional family. Sounds like a genre to me.
`Mifune' is a pitch-black comedy that takes place in
the Land of the Rising Sun. It begins with the
marriage of Copenhagen businessman Kresten (Anders W.
Berthelsen) to his boss' daughter Claire (Sofie
Grabol). The next morning Kresten finds out that his
estranged father is dead, so he goes to his family's
farm for the funeral. His only living relative is a
developmentally disabled brother named Rud (Jesper
Asholt), who, of course, Kresten is forced to care
for.
Simultaneously, in Copenhagen, a hooker named Liva
(Iben Hjejle) has gotten herself into trouble. When
one of her clients, a principal, informs her that he
recently expelled her brother Bjarke (Emil Tarding),
she beats him over the head and urinates on his rug.
On a whim, she decides to take a housekeeping job at a
farmhouse, which belongs to Kresten and Rud, in order
to get away from her troubles 
`Mifune' is the story of these lives at this farm, and
the romance and mayhem that goes on there. On the
surface, `Mifune' is a lot like `Rain Man', in which a
man learns about the important things in life from a
developmentally disabled brother. But Berthelsen and
Asholt aren't Tom Cruise and Dustin Hoffman, and
`Mifune' is not about their relationship as much as it
is about getting on with your life. 
The film takes its title from a game the brothers
play, in which Kresten goes into the cellar and
pretends to fight Toshiro Mifune, star of Akira
Kurosawa's `Seven Samurai', for Rud's enjoyment.
`Happiness is when Mifune comes out of the cellar,'
notes Rud late in the film, and the characters don't
know what he means.
Once it gets going, `Mifune' has many wonderful
moments of inspired humor, but because of the Dogme 95
ban on a background musical score, the all the
emotions must be conveyed by the actors. This is also
the film's main flaw, because the emotional
connections are usually weak. Had `Mifune' been a
straight-up comedy, it might have been more
successful. 
In essence, this is a film that showcases what Dogme
95 has to offer, in both positive and negative
fashion. Director Kragh-Jacobsen has followed the
rules down to every detail. The opening and closing
credits are filmed by a video camera scrolling down a
piece of paper, and all phone conversations switch
back and forth to the rooms of the different speakers,
as to not have pre-recorded noise coming out of the
phone. Also, the movie is filmed in digital video, but
is not as choppy or shaky as in `The Celebration' or
`julien donkey-boy'. But `Mifune' is too wild a comedy
to fit smoothly into rules that strive for `purity',
because it is a film about the things in life that we
believe to be impure. 
All this talk is not to say that `Mifune', which won
the Silver Bear at Berlin Film Festival and was
Denmark's official entry for this year's Academy
Awards, is not a commendable film. It is a very
entertaining picture; one that derives its laughs from
the silliness of life. But I only wish that future
filmmakers stick to their own vision of purity,
because when following the Dogme rules, you can easily
forget that purity isn't what people look for in a
film. 

Title
Review for Plunkett & Macleane (1999)
"Plunkett & MacLeane", the new 18th century action-adventure from
music video director Jake Scott, defies all the rules of conventional
period piece logic. It is hip, vibrant, and a lot of fun. The film
reunites "Trainspotting" stars Robert Carlyle and Jonny Lee Miller as
Plunkett & MacLeane, two ex-cons paired together against their will to
become Britain's most notorious highwaymen.  Plunkett provides the
skills, and MacLeane provides the social stature. The two collaborate
in order to steal from the rich and give to...themselves. When the men
hold up the coach of the Lord Chief Justice Gibson (Michael Gambon),
MacLeane falls in love at first sight with the Lord's feisty niece,
Rebecca (Liv Tyler). While Plunkett tries to rob money for the two to
get to America, MacLeane tries to win the affections of Rebecca. When
I saw "Plunkett & MacLeane", I wasn't quite sure what to
expect. However, after a couple rough opening scenes, Jake Scott
(relative of directors Ridley and Tony Scott) presents us with an
immensely likable, techno-beat-driven period piece adventure for the
MTV generation. Scott's film might be hard-pressed to find an
audience, since it's quirky tone seems to appeal neither to the
costume drama crowd nor the younger action crowd. Hopefully,
moviegoers will look past the facade and "Plunkett & MacLeane" can
become an art house hit.  Whatever the outcome of its theatrical run,
"Plunkett & MacLeane" is quite an enjoyable little film, and an
admirable debut for Jake Scott.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
In the past 5 years, animation has come a long way; or so it
seems. New formats, including high-tech computer animation are
threatening to take the glamour away from Disney's yearly
"masterpiece".  However, it is a film like "The Iron Giant", without
any sidekicks or musical interludes, that I think can make the most
change for the genre. "The Iron Giant" is a wonderful film for adults
and kids that just happens to be animated. It is the story of a boy
named Hogarth(what?)  who, in 1950's Maine, discovers an iron giant
made by a foreign country as a weapon. However, this being the movies,
the iron giant turns out to have a heart of gold, and learns to
triumph over his impulses. Christopher McDonald voices a government
agent who is after the iron giant because he believes he can cause
harm, and Jennifer Aniston is Hogarth's single mother. While the story
is kid-friendly, adults will enjoy the precise reworking of small-town
1950, where people fear the dropping of "the bomb" and learn to "duck
and cover". Despite being a fine film, "The Iron Giant" feels a lot
like a tired rehash of "E.T." But director Brad Bird has a lot of
creative vision, and writer Tim McCanlies("Dancer, Texas Pop. 81")
makes the dialogue sound real; a rare quality in an animated film.
"The Iron Giant" is a successful experiment that might have been
better, but its heart is in the right place, and it truly is a film
that adults will enjoy just as much as the kids. Take a chance and see
this flick.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
John McTiernan's "The Thomas Crown Affair" is a predictable, overly familiar
remake of the Steve
McQueen/Faye Dunaway romance caper. Pierce Brosnan is Thomas Crown, a
billionaire who also
lies to steal fine art. When a valuable piece is missing from the New York
Museum of Modern Art,
ins urance bounty hunter Katherine(Rene Russo) must investigate Crown, and
ends up falling into a
passionate love affair with the man whom she knows is guilty. The plot
sounds a lot like
"Entrapment", with Sean Connery, but the acting in "Thomas Crown" is better.
Pierce Brosnan has
always annoyed me, playing the same role over and over, but this is that
role and he does fine with it.
Rene Russo is back on screen and looking better than ever; she also hasn't
lost her tough-girl act,
which is fine with me. However, this film is lacking a good script as well
as anything fresh or new, so
as a result it's not much fun. Also, while some elements of "The Thomas
Crown Affair" are
well-made, John McTiernan("Die Hard") pays little attention to details, so
the film should have gone
through one more edit. Where "The Thomas Crown Affair" should be slick and
smooth, it's glib and
rough. You're better off sticking with the original.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic 
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
rated R
starring Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe Pantoliano,
Hugo Weaving
written and directed by Andy and Larry Wachowski
What is the matrix? If it helps answer the tagline question, THE
MATRIX is the most satisying and stylish action pic since
FACE/OFF. The second film by the Wachowski brothers, THE MATRIX will
remind many viewers of 1998's little-seen Alex Proyas masterpiece DARK
CITY. It has a similar look to it, and a similar message.  But after
seeing THE MATRIX, the movie that came to mind was Terrence Malick's
misunderstood war epic THE THIN RED LINE. Like THE THIN RED LINE, THE
MATRIX is a heavily disguised, poetic and metaphoric meditation on
finding God, and the difference between pure good and evil.
The complicated plot of THE MATRIX is too good to spoil, so I will not
go in depth.  Keanu Reeves plays Thomas "Neo" Anderson, a computer
programmer who wakes up one morning(a la DARK CITY) and finds that
people are out to get him. He is then contacted by Morpheus(Laurence
Fishburne), a man who says he's out to help him. He then joins
Morpheus' squad and travels into the matrix, a world that is supposed
to shield you from reality. Morpheus believes that Neo is "the one"
who can somehow save the human race. Neo trusts Morpheus and believes
his prophecy. And Neo decides to stay in the matrix, unable to ever
leave.
The Wachowski brothers, who made the brilliant mob caper BOUND, have
backed THE MATRIX's blistering, electric style with substance to
create what is not only a perfect futuristic noir thriller, but a
perfect pre-Y2K film. THE MATRIX took a long 5 year journey to the
screen, but the time all seems worth it. THE MATRIX should also be
credited as the film which revives Keanu Reeves' career. After trash
like JOHNNY MNEMONIC and FEELING MINNESOTA, Reeves is finally back in
style, playing the hero with as much natural tenacity as his hero in
SPEED. Mainstream audiences are likely to leave THE MATRIX feeling
clueless and cheated, but like THE THIN RED LINE, they should give the
film a second viewing to appreciate a subtlety that is largely lost in
modern cinema. THE MATRIX may not be an Oscar winner, but the film is
almost a shoo-in to be a cult classic. Of all the many questions I was
left with after viewing THE MATRIX, the most important one I could
think of was "When is the sequel?"
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
rated PG-13
Universal Pictures
starring Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo, William H. Macy, Kel Mitchell,
Paul Reubens, Ben Stiller, Wes Studi, Greg Kinnear, Lena Olin,
Geoffrey Rush, Tom Waits, Eddie Izzard, Claire Forlani
based on the comic book by Bob Burden
written by Neil Cuthbert
directed by Kinka Usher
It could have been a summer hit; perhaps the beginning of a
much-needed franchise for Universal Pictures. The
superheroes-without-superpowers storyline seemed to appeal to all of
us underachieving Americans. So where did "Mystery Men" go wrong? In
my opinion, at almost every turn. "Mystery Men" is the story of 7
self-made-heroes out to fight supervillain Cassanova
Frankenstein(Geoffrey Rush) in order to get back their real superhero,
Captain Amazing(Greg Kinnear). The film is supposed to be a mockery of
comic-book action franchises, but the jokes just aren't funny at
all. The only real high-notes in an "all-star" cast(which includes
Paul Reubens a.k.a Pee Wee Herman) are Ben Stiller and Janeane
Garofalo, who each have the talent to make any line into a sardonic,
cynical catchphrase. While the film's basic idea sounds like fun,
"Mystery Men" is actually somewhat of a bore thanks to Neil Cuthbert's
one-note script and Kinka Usher's wannabe-hip-and-stylish
direction. Even as a comedy sketch, there wouldn't be much to "Mystery
Men", so why torture us with a feature film? "Mystery Men" also
disappointed at the box office, so thankfully, no sequel is being
planned.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Better Living Through Circuitry (2000)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
You know it's the year 2000 when the most significant
form of teenage musical rebellion involves the embrace
of technology and, dare I say, materialism. `Better
Living Through Circuitry' is the perfect title for the
first film to document rave culture, because it
inadvertently hints at why the scene may have a shelf
life. As long as there are new advances in the digital
world, the music will keep bumpin', the drugs will
keep floating, and the newest breed of DJ's will
continue to preach their gospel through the language
of music. Rave, the biggest underground party scene in
the world, has moved above ground, and no one is quite
sure when the `comedown' will begin.
Jon Reiss' `Better Living Through Circuitry' is an
insightful commercial for rave culture; a collection
of interviews with major stars of the rave world, some
of whom (Moby, Crystal Method) have gone on to become
major international bestsellers. Reiss also talks to
kids in the scene, who explain how their subculture is
about `rebelling against being pissed off.' How could
any parent disapprove?
Well, it takes a while for the film to get into the
most controversial aspect of the all-night rave
parties; the incessant use of hallucinogenic drugs.
Ecstasy, a `happy' drug, is the most common choice
among ravers. Thankfully, `Circuitry' gives a clear
anti-drug message, with party kids claiming that the
music and energy of a rave is enough to bring on
euphoria.
Rave culture is so powerful that, to some, it is
almost a religious experience. One look at the faces
of the folks dancing the night away and it is clear
that it's about more than just the music. The bouncing
beats and electronically charged rhythm provide an
ironic helping of soul food for today's disaffected
youth. It's not just the `happy drug' that puts these
kids in a trance.
`Better Living Through Circuitry' is directed with a
style that emulates the `empowerment through
technology' theme of rave culture. `Circuitry' was
filmed with a small Sony VX1000 digital video camera,
which director Jon Reiss took into raves in a
backpack. All post-production was performed using
various programs on a Power Macintosh computer.
`Better Living Through Circuitry' is being released on
the heels of the criminally under-seen rave flick
`Human Traffic', and is an effective `digital odyssey'
which adds new understanding to my limited knowledge
of the booming underground youth culture. The film
doesn't give the viewer the rush that one could get at
a rave, but Reiss' camera takes you deeper into the
lifestyle than you may ever want to be.

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)

200 Cigarettes **
rated R
starring Ben Affleck, Casey Affleck, David Chappelle, Guillermo Diaz, Angela
Featherstone, Janeane Garofalo, Gaby Hoffmann, Kate Hudson, Courtney Love,
Brian McCardie, Jay Mohr, Nicole Parker, Martha Plimpton, Christina Ricci,
Paul Rudd
written by Shana Larsen
directed by Risa Bramon Garcia
Filmmakers love making ensemble pieces. Why? Maybe because it is a way in
which you do not need to develop your characters in order to prove a point.
You just need some witty dialogue and good direction to keep the viewer
intrigued, and all the characters must come together at the end in some
mysterious way. In the case of PLAYING BY HEART, this kind of film is done
well, but in 200 CIGARETTES the viewer leaves unintrigued. 
200 CIGARETTES loosely tells the story of many New York couples during New
Year's Eve 1981. Somehow, these people are all supposed to attend a party
being held by Martha Plimpton, but they don't seem to show up. First, there
is Paul Rudd(CLUELESS), who has just been dumped by his girlfriend and is
spending New Year's Eve(ironically, his birthday) with his good friend,
played by Courtney Love, and contemplating whether to start a relationship
with her. There is also Jay Mohr, a typical player who is tired of women
with whom he's had one night stands telling him they love him. His latest
victim is Kate Hudson, who sports dog feces on her dress for half of the
film. Then there are Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffmann, who are spending a
night on the town without their parents' knowledge, and they meet punks
Casey Affleck and Guillermo Diaz in an East Village club. And Ben Affleck,
Janeane Garofalo, Nicole Parker, and Angela Featherstone all show up in
small roles. The closest the film has to a protagonist is a cab driver(David
Chappelle) who seems to be driving each couple around. 
The problem with 200 CIGARETTES is that it tries to be many things without
succeeding in any particular way. The film only works as an homage to the
80's in its superb soundtrack, showing that even a movie like the WEDDING
SINGER can be more insightful in its knowledge of a period in time. The film
also doesnt work as a comedy or a romance, because there is not enough of
either to take note of. Shana Larsen's script is quite mediocre, and makes
most of the conversations a bore, and the film itself only mildly amusing.
200 CIGARETTES also sadly has no message at all to speak of, and it makes
you wonder as to just when MTV Productions plans to put out a real movie.
Former casting director Risa Bramon Garcia turns her first film into a 2
hour long music video, without even getting much out of her cast. Even CAN'T
HARDLY WAIT, a far more superb film, deals with some kind of a message. If
200 CIGARETTES is any indication of what kinds of films we'll be seeing in
this upcoming year, then I guess I'd just as well stay home. 


Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
"Arlington Road" is an interesting thriller that lost its core
audience because of poor marketing. The film was supposed to have been
released in April after a teaser trailer would tell little but promise
a lot. However, this was not the case. The film's trailer gave away
many secret plot twists and basically told the entire story. Then, the
film's release date got pushed back to July 9th when the filmmakers
decided that they didnt want the touchy subject matter to coincide
with the aftermath of the recent school shootings.
That being said, "Arlington Road" is a movie starring Jeff Bridges as
Michael Faraday, a terrorism expert whose wife was killed in a
Waco-like shootout. He meets his new neighbors, Oliver(Tim Robbins)
and Cheryl(Joan Cusack) Lang, when he rescues their son after he is
wounded while using fireworks. Michael and his girlfriend, Brooke(Hope
Davis), befriend their neighbors while their kids bond
together. However, Michael starts to notice some very disturbing
things about the man next door. Is he just imagining these
things(because of his terrorism-laced mind) or are they real? I will
not give away any more, because hopefully you haven't seen the film's
trailer and might be surprised.
Director Mark Pellington made the romantic-comedy "Going All The Way"
a couple years ago, and "Arlington Road" has an entirely different
filmmaking style. Despite a few formulaic plot contrivances,
"Arlington Road" is a cut above most suspense flicks. Jeff Bridges is
at his Lebowski-best, while Tim Robbins and Joan Cusack are absolutely
haunting as the neighbors from hell.  The ending of the film is
devastating and very disturbing, as conventionality takes a backseat
to the sad, slightly warped version of the truth.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Best Laid Plans (1999)
Mike Barker's "Best Laid Plans" is an example of effective film
noir. A dark subject matter, plenty of moral dilemmas, good dialogue,
and stylish direction which makes for an entertaining, twisty
90-minute diversion.
Two buddies, Nick(Alessandro Nivola), who works at a recycling plant,
and Bryce(Josh Brolin), a high-school teacher, are meeting for a few
drinks at a local bar in Tropico(a small town in an unnamed state that
looks like Nevada). Nick has been living in Tropico his entire life,
and is depending on the inheritance which he will now receive, since
his father has just died. Bryce is fortunate enough to be
house-sitting for a wealthy family, and is looking forward to a bright
future.
All that is changed when Nick gets a phone call from Bryce after
midnight, asking him to come over to discuss a huge problem. A
woman(Reese Witherspoon) whom he met at the bar, and then had sex
with, accused him of rape. She also happens to be downstairs, tied up
in rope and handcuffed.  Bryce seems to be hazy about what exactly
happened, but he knows that a rape charge would ruin his career and
perhaps send him to prison.
Ted Griffin's script then flashes back three months, and although I am
tempted to let you in on some of the twists that occur after the
initial setup, I'm doing you a favor by letting you witness them on
your own. However, if you aren't paying attention to certain moments,
then some plot complications will fly over your head. It's called
challenging cinema.
"Best Laid Plans" won't grab you in the way that "The Usual Suspects"
does, but it is a fine homage to the way film noir used to be made;
with multilayered characters, strong-willed women, and people who
pretend to be something that they're not. "Best Laid Plans" is
sometimes rough-around-the-edges, but being Mike Barker's first
American film, it is quite an achievement.
Alessandro Nivola(Pollux Troy in "Face/Off") makes quite an impression
as the good-natured guy who gets corrupted by money, and Reese "Is
There Anyone Better" Witherspoon once again displays sheer talent in
her role of the girl who displays her love through the things she'll
do for her lover.
The look of "Best Laid Plans" reminds me of Paul Thomas Anderson's
"Hard Eight", and Danny Cannon's "Phoenix", and the tone of these
films is also similar. It's nice to see a well-made character-driven
suspense-thriller, especially when it has a cast of young
people. Nothing much goes awry in these "Best Laid Plans".
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com
this review is also featured at http://jump.to/moviepage 


Title
Review for Illuminata (1998)
rated R
119 minutes
Artisan Entertainment
starring John Turturro, Katherine Borowitz, Christopher Walken, Susan
Sarandon, Beverly D'Angelo, Bill Irwin, Rufus Sewell, Georgina Cates,
Matthew Sussman, Ben Gazzara, Leo Bassi, Donal McCann, Aida Turturro
written by Brandon Cole and John Turturro
directed by John Turturro
The shadow of "Shakespeare In Love" looms over John Turturro'
sophomore directorial effort, "Illuminata". However, the latter film
has an ingenuity and flavor all its own. Turturro stars as Tuccio, a
struggling playwright in turn-of-the-century New York. Tuccio wants to
stage his controversial new play, "Illuminata", but many are convinced
that the work isn't yet finished. However, using his lover,
Rachel(Katherine Borowitz) as his muse, he crafts a work about
imperfect love. Among Turturro's eclectic cast is Susan Sarandon as an
aging actress and Christopher Walken(in the film's breakaway
performance) as a powerful, cynical theater critic. "Illuminata" moves
at a slow pace, and is not as lighthearted or flamboyant as
"Shakespeare In Love", but it is a fine film nonetheless. John
Turturro, having worked with visionaries such as the Coen brothers,
Spike Lee, Martin Scorsese, Robert Redford and John Dahl, knows how to
make a film, and it is evident that he knows how to work with
actors. No performance here is too overdone, and everyone seems to be
having a lot of fun.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for My Name Is Joe (1998)
Please post this review to the newsgroup.
For many years, Scottish filmmaker Ken Loach has made movies about the
struggles of the working-class citizen in today's society. His latest
film, MY NAME IS JOE, is one of the most powerful and intense
character studies I have seen in years. At the beginning of the film,
the title character, Joe Kavanagh(Mullan), announces that after being
an alcoholic for several years, he has finally sobered up. Joe is a
poor man who does odd jobs like coaching soccer. He runs into a woman
named Sarah(Louise Goodall) who works as a nurse and is higher up in
the ranks of society. Joe wants to ask her on a date, but he doesn't
have money for a fancy dinner, so they go bowling. At first she
declines his invitation, calling him too "wild", but she ends up
giving in to his charm. Also, both Joe and Sarah are trying to help
out Liam(David McKay) and Sabine(Anne-Marie Kennedy), a young couple
who are caught up in the underworld of drugs.
MY NAME IS JOE seems to be a simple and familiar story, but it rises
above mediocrity because of a raw, brutally sympathetic performance by
Peter Mullan, who won the Best Actor award at last year's Cannes Film
Festival. Mullan makes Joe such a three-dimensional character that he
makes up for the lack of depth in Sarah's character.  Few films can
match the emotional wallop provided by Joe's transcendence in MY NAME
IS JOE. The film also deserves praise for subtitling the thick
Scottish accents, providing us with pure English. Other British films
should take note of this new technique. It is a shame that MY NAME IS
JOE has been released in early 1999 and will definitely be forgotten
by next year's Oscars. But I'm glad to see that there are some
filmmakers interested in just putting out a film that's worth
seeing. MY NAME IS JOE is that, and more.  


Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Hype is a term usually associated with a highly anticipated big-budget
film, and it exists to spark interest so that the studios can make
lots of money. Too much hype almost always leads to a letdown, as
proven with "Godzilla" and "Wild Wild West". But "The Blair Witch
Project" is a "victim" of a different kind of hype. A hit at Sundance,
"Blair Witch" was hyped because of its critical praise and its
unconventional premise.
"The Blair Witch Project" is a fictional film about 3 twenty-something
filmmakers who head off into Maryland's Black Hills to film a
documentary on a local myth called the "Blair Witch". The three never
return(as we're informed at the beginning), but the footage which they
have filmed has turned into this movie.
The first few minutes of the film are comedic as the filmmakers ask
the locals whether they believe the myth or not. Then, as they begin
their hike into the woods, they begin to notice strange things.
The high-strung Heather is holding the camera, filming basically
everything that she, Michael and Josh do. What started off as a
documentary about the fiction of myths has turned into an exercise in
paranoia.
I don't want to give away much plot, because the thrill of "The Blair
Witch Project" is not knowing what is going to happen. Filmmakers
Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick have created one of the creepiest
and most original horror flicks of all-time. Heavily hyped on the
internet, many who see this film believe that it is totally real. But
if you see the film knowing the truth, then you will notice the
incredible wonder of the entire project.
Shot on a miniscule $100,000 budget, "The Blair Witch Project" used
its limited resources to make an incredibly creative thriller that
relies on smarts instead of effects to shock the viewers out of their
seats.
The filmmakers sent the three actors into the woods with cameras and
an understanding of the film's premise. They spent a week hiking from
spot to spot, and then picked up food and film. It was up to them to
improvise and film their scenes. The result is shot on poor 16mm and
Hi8 video with a couple of handheld cameras.
"The Blair Witch Project" has been breaking all kinds of box-office
records in its first week in limited release. Destined to be a
cult-classic, it proves that a low-budget can spark surreal
creativity, and that psychological paranoia is much scarier than
costly aliens.
"Blair Witch" reinvents the horror genre moreso than "Scream"
supposedly did. I'm glad that smarts and great marketing are adding up
to dollars for Artisan Entertainment, which is currently the boldest
name in independent cinema. "The Blair Witch Project" is far from
perfect, but it is a piece of landmark filmmaking.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
rated R
Artisan Entertainment
99 minutes
starring Kevin Bacon, Kathryn Erbe, Ileana Douglas, Liza Weil, Kevin
Dunn, Conor O'Farrell, Jenny Morrison, Zachary David Cope
based on the novel "A Stir Of Echoes" by Richard Matheson
written and directed by David Koepp
"The Sixth Sense" is still racking up the dough at the box office, and
already we have a cheap rip off of it. However, David Koepp's "Stir Of
Echoes" doesn't fail merely because of its $250 million shadow. "Stir
Of Echoes" fails because it's a poor effort by everyone involved.
Well, David Koepp has scripted some of the major blockbusters of all
time ("Jurassic Park", "Men In Black") and from what I've heard, his
directorial debut, "The Trigger Effect", was a fine, if underrated,
film. But "Stir Of Echoes", adapted from the cult classic novel by
Richard Matheson, takes none of the risks that the overrated "Sixth
Sense" does.
Tom Witzky (Kevin Bacon) is an "ordinary" construction worker in
Chicago who writes music in his spare time. He has a fine relationship
with his wife, Maggie (Kathryn Erbe) and his quiet son Jake (Zachary
David Cope). But one night, his sister in law (Ileana Douglas), an
amateur hypnotist, hypnotizes him at his request. The hypnosis sends
him on a downward spiral, and she opens up parts of his mind that were
closed before.
Tom starts to see things; quick flashes of dead bodies, fingers
falling off, and other stuff like that. His son calmly assures him
that everything will be alright, and it is then that Tom realizes that
Jake sees these things, and he speaks with them too. What are these
things? Dead people, of course. Little boys in movies never "see dead
people", right? Uh-huh.
Coincidentally, it turns out that these dead people are merely trying
to communicate something to someone in the real world. Tom and Jake's
"mission" is to help a dead girl named Samantha (Jenny Morrison) get
in touch with her family (her sister is played by Liza Weil, the
amazing young actress from "Whatever") so that they can figure out why
she has been "missing" for the past few months.
At the start, the setup isn't that bad, but then, the filmmakers
decide to have the film self destruct in five seconds. And self
destruct it does. "Stir Of Echoes" turns from promising thriller to B
horror movie pulp. Kevin Bacon's Tom becomes some sort of a madman and
the film spins wildly out of control.
"Stir Of Echoes" may look and sound like "The Sixth Sense", but it
feels like a spoof. Kevin Bacon is gritty and tough as nails, but he
just doesn't cut it as a leading man. I hate to bash child actors, but
Zachary David Cope has none of Haley Joel ("Sixth Sense") Osment's
guts, and neither does the film itself.
I know it's unfair to compare the two films, since "Stir Of Echoes"
was probably made before "Sixth Sense", but when you see movies with
such similar plotlines, it's hard to resist. "Stir Of Echoes" is
watchable most of the time, but David Koepp seems to have learned a
little too much from the disaster movies he's used to writing. He
directs this low budget film as if it's an action extravaganza,
especially during the wildly preposterous ending.
While "Sixth Sense" at least made its conflict believable, "Stir Of
Echoes" just seems to be along for the ride. Instead of being scary,
it's just downright disturbing. Towards the end, the film becomes
laughably bad, which is fun in an "Evil Dead" kind of way, but when
Kevin Bacon and his son start digging in their backyard because a
movie screen told him to, I have to draw the line. I'm giving "Stir Of
Echoes" an undeserving two stars, but only because I may have enjoyed
it more had I seen it a couple months ago. How sad.


Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
This week, upon returning to Los Angeles from my summer vacation, I
tried to buy tickets to two separate R-rated films and was denied both
times. Despite the fact that I am under the age of 17, I am usually
let into the films because I look much older than I really
am(haha). The reason why I was not let in was because of President
Clinton's new "family man" policy, in which theatres must check the
I.D. of anyone trying to buy a ticket to an R-rated movie.
Because of this new law and the controversy surrounding it, there has
and never will be a better time to release the hilarious satire "South
Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut", despite the fact that the Comedy
Central TV series on which it is based has been steadily losing
viewers. The animated film unleashes its wrath on targets such as
Canada, Saddam Hussein, Brian Boitano, Winona Ryder, The Baldwins,
Satan and most of all, the MPAA, which threatened to slap the film
with an NC-17 rating.
The timely storyline is about four kids(the fat Cartman, the Jewish
Kyle, the braindead Kenny, and the "normal" Stan) who sneak in to an
R-rated Canadian movie called "Asses Of Fire", starring their favorite
comic duo, Terrence and Phillip. The two prance around, fart, sing
songs like "Uncle Fucka", and teach the "innocent" children words they
never knew existed(and we thought the TV show was vulgar).
Once the children spread the word(s) of the forbidden movie which they
have seen, and begin to curse nonstop, Sheila Broslofski(Kyle's
mother) decides to "Blame Canada", and when the Canadians bomb the
Baldwin residence, the war begins.
What follows is 80 minutes of the funniest and most shocking humor to
ever come out of "South Park" co-creators Trey Parker and Matt
Stone. Finally, a film with a scathing social message that I'm with
all the way. The songs are catchy and the characters are irreverent.
"South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" will remind viewers why we all
clung to the show in its first season, and why we will become fans
once again. Parker and Stone can speak, though indirectly, to and for
today's young people. "South Park" is a wake-up-call to a world in
which peace can supposedly be created by forbidding teenagers to see
R-rated movies.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
rated PG-13
starring Heath Ledger, Julia Stiles, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Larisa Oleynik,
David Krumholtz, Andrew Keegan, Larry Miller
written by Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith
based on the play "The Taming of the Shrew" by William Shakespeare
directed by Gil Junger
In the wake of SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE's recent Oscar winnings, there
seems to be no better time to release a modern Shakespeare
adaptation. First-time director Gil Junger's 10 THINGS I HATE ABOU YOU
is loosely based on the Bard's "The Taming of the Shrew". As we find
out early in the film, the shrew, Kat Stratford(the Shakespeare
references don't end there), is most often referred to as "heinous
bitch".  Kat(Julia Stiles) is a very pretty girl, but a very
tempestuous one. To her, being nice is too normal, and she wants to do
whatever is unexpected. her sister Bianca(Larisa Oleynik), on the
other hand, is the most popular and gorgeous girl in school. But the
sisters are untouchable because their father(Larry Miller), who fears
pregnancy, will not let them date till college. But then, he decides
on a better idea. Bianca can't date until Kat dates.  It is then that
Joey(Andrew Keegan), a superficial asshole as well as a model, decides
to pay juvenile delinquent Patrick Verona(dont' mind the pun), played
by newcomer Heath Ledger, to take Kat out on a date so that he can
have Bianca to himself. But there is also the new kid Cameron(Joseph
Gordon-Levitt), who feels genuine infatuation for Bianca, and will do
anything to be near her.
The relationship between Kat and Patrick is basically the staple of
the movie, and for the most part, it works out rather nicely. But that
doesn't mean that 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU isn't contrived. There
are moments in the film in which you'll say out loud "Why would anyone
ever do that?" This film is basically nothing more than an
insignificant entry into the way-too-crowded teen movie genre, but
it's actually pretty fun for the most part, and should make most teens
happy. Julia Stiles(T.V's "The 60's") shows a lot of potential while
playing the part of Kat, and it's no surprise that she has a crowded
schedule to round out '99, including a couple more Shakespeare
adaptations.  10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU is dumb for the most
part(especially when it blatantly rips off CAN'T HARDLY WAIT), and it
is no excuse to not read Shakespeare, but it does deserve some credit
for being entertaining.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
rated PG-13
starring Kevin Kline, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rupert Everett, Stanley Tucci,
Calista Flockhart, Anna Friel, Christian Bale, Dominic West, David 
Strathairn, Sophie Marceau
based on the play by William Shakespeare
written and directed by Michael Hoffman
There really is no need for me to mention it, but Shakespeare is
hotter than ever. SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE won Best Picture, and more than
a few teen movies are using the Bard as inspiration. We knew it
wouldn't be long before we had another period piece Shakespeare
adaptation. The film is Michael Hoffman's rich, opulent adaptation of
WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM.
This version of A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM moves the setting to Italy
towards the end of the 19th century. It is the story of one night when
all sorts of unexpected twists occur involving a few couples falling
in and out of love.
Demetrius(Christian Bale), is set to be wed to Hermia(Anna Friel), who
actually is in love with Lysander(Dominic West). Since Hermia doesn't
want to be forced into unwanted wedlock, she runs away into the forest
with Lysander. But that is not before they tell Helena(Calista
Flockhart), who is starved for Demetrius' affection, of their plans.
Helena then tells Demetrius of their flight, and he rushes into the
forest, followed by Helena. It is there that all four of them
encounter Puck(Stanley Tucci), a fairy who administers a love potion
that will make a person fall in love with the next person he
sees. Puck also works his magic on the fairy queen(Michelle Pfeiffer),
who falls in love with an actor(Kevin Kline) who is turned into a
donkey, while the fairy king(Rupert Everett) makes some observations
of his own.
Michael Hoffman(ONE FINE DAY, RESTORATION) works wonders with a superb
ensemble cast; the standouts being Pfeiffer, Kline, and Calista
Flockhart, who takes a step away from "Ally McBeal". The film is shot
wondrously on location by Oliver Stapleton(THE GRIFTERS, ONE FINE
DAY), who makes the play seem anything but stagy.
A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM is a fine film, but if there is a problem to
be mentioned, it is the film's length. At 115 minutes, the movie is
too long to just be taken as a light comedy, and there isn't much in
the way of drama to hold a viewer's attention. Although I am
unfamiliar with the play, there doesn't seem to be much original work
added to this production, despite the change in location. But all in
all, A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM is a funny, lush tribute to the Bard's
greatness...and newfound popularity.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
There's not much to say about "Varsity Blues", the latest
insignificant entry into the teen movie field, other than the fact
that it's another clunker from MTV Films. "Dawson's Creek" heartthrob
James Van Der Beek plays John Moxon, or "Mox", a second-string
quarterback on his high school football team; a team playing in the
football-obsessed West Canaan, Texas. When the star quarterback gets
injured, Mox finds himself in the spotlight as West Canaan's new
hero. But Mox would rather stay home reading Kurt Vonnegut than play
for his legendary hard-ass coach, Bud Kilmer(Jon Voight).  Mox decides
that if his team is going to win the championship, it'll be for them,
not for the coach.  Sounds like high aspirations for a film that is
actually a frat-boy movie filled with gratuitous nudity, beer-drinking
and football. That Van Der Beek and Voight manage to give decent
performances is a wonder considering that W. Peter Iliff's screenplay
is nothing but a bunch of stereotypes. "Varsity Blues" is watchable
when it doesn't take itself too seriously, but more often than not, it
does.
a video capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Beautiful People (1999)
When culture is used as a verb, one definition given
by Webster's Dictionary is `to cultivate'. A few of
their definitions of cultivate are `to promote the
growth of,' `to nurture,' `to form and refine, and to
`make friends with'. Jasmin Dizdar's `Beautiful
People' is a film about culture, yet few of its
characters are nurturing or friendly.
To establish its tone, the film begins with a violent
fight between two strangers on a London bus. One man
is a Croat; the other is a Serb. The two don't even
need to speak in order to know that they are enemies.
Hate is so deeply ingrained in their minds that words
could do little to help. `Beautiful People' is a
bittersweet, ironic look at the lives of a
cross-section of Londoners that can only be redeemed
by their ability to turn hate into love.
For his first film, Dizdar weaves about five different
stories into his tale of love, tolerance and family.
We meet characters of all races from all different
classes of society. A couple stories, in particular,
stand out. One involves a doctor (Nicholas Farrell)
who copes with his recent marital separation by
befriending a young Balkan couple. The other involves
a young heroin addict who unexpectedly finds himself
in the midst of a war zone, and ends up a hero.
Like most first films, `Beautiful People', which won
Best Picture at the Cannes Film Festival, is a bit
rough around the edges. Not all the stories are
particularly involving, and the odd blend of pathos
and humor is often misguided. But it is a nod to
Jazmin Dizdar's maturity that all the stories feel
human. Unlike most ensemble films, `Beautiful People'
doesn't use a superficial plot thread to tie the
stories together. Instead, the characters are linked
by their similar feelings and actions.
Over the past few years, a few important films (most
notably Emir Kusturica's `Underground') have put their
own spin on the turmoil in the Balkan region.
`Beautiful People' is the first to explore life after
survival, where many realize that cultural diffusion
can be a war in its own right.
With this film, Jasmin Dizdar has taken a bold,
ambitious look at prejudice in a cultural melting pot.
However, his greatest achievement is shining all his
characters in a sympathetic light, regardless of their
race or gender. His all-inclusive approach to the
characters is the real lesson to be learned from the
experience.
The struggle of this group of people is one that
millions of immigrants go through every day, on all
continents. But in Dizdar's eyes, whether they be
black, white, green or red, they're all beautiful.
That's cultivation in a nutshell.

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Summer is beginning earlier than ever, with each
year's first blockbuster action picture being released
in early May. Last year, early May brought us `The
Mummy', easily the worst film to hit screens in 1999.
The summer of 2000, however, seems to be a more
ambitious one, with its May blockbuster being Ridley
Scott's thrilling `Gladiator', a solid, high-octane
period picture that wears the guise of a sweeping,
emotionally-charged epic.
The success of `Gladiator' (both critically and
commercially) should be attributed to two film
veterans. The first is director Ridley Scott; a man
who, in the early 80's, changed the face of
science-fiction forever with `Blade Runner' and
`Alien', and showed a knack for female-exploitation
with his estrogen-fueled `Thelma and Louise' and `G.I.
Jane'. 
The second reason for the event-movie status of
`Gladiator' is Australian heartbreaker Russell Crowe,
who was recently robbed of an Oscar for his riveting
work in Michael Mann's `The Insider'. After years of
stunning bit roles in American films like `L.A.
Confidential', he may finally become a recognized star
with his compelling performance in `Gladiator'.
The film begins with a battle sequence so sharply
edited that it rivals the football matches in Oliver
Stone's `Any Given Sunday'. The Roman army, led by
General Maximus (Russell Crowe), engages in bloody
combat with an incompetent squad of Germanians, and
comes out victorious. The battle brings to an end
another tireless war, and the dying king Marcus
Aurelius (Richard Harris) feels that it is time to
pass his crown on to another man.
The expected choice would be Aurelius' son, the
brutally unscrupulous Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix). But
Aurelius has a different agenda, and tells General
Maximus in closed quarters that it is he who he wants
as heir. When not on the battlefield, Maximus is a
humble farmer with a wife and son, and claims not to
know a thing about Rome and/or politics. Aurelius
claims that his lack of political knowledge proves
only that he has not been corrupted by Roman wealth,
unlike his son.
When Commodus learns of his father's proposal to
Maximus, he murders his father and then orders Maximus
to be put to death. Maximus escapes his execution, and
his wife and son suffer the fate that he was planned
to receive. In the desert, a wounded Maximus is
captured and sold as a slave to a man who plans
barbaric gladiator fights in large stadiums. Because
of his former stature in the army, he is quite a
fighter, and becomes known as `The Spaniard'. He plans
to use his new `power', and some help from the radiant
Lucilla (Connie Nielsen), to help exact his revenge on
her brother, Commodus.
`Gladiator' is full of intense, strategic scenes of
gladiatorial battle, and beautiful, wide-angle
cinematography. It is a slick action film,
entertaining and often thrilling, but if Ridley Scott
is aspiring to a sweeping, `Braveheart'-like epic,
then his work is unsuccessful. `Gladiator's' plotline
is the generic revenge tale, somewhere along the lines
of `Hamlet' and `The Count of Monte Cristo'. 
`Gladiator' is glorious on a technical level, but the
emotional aspects of the film are not on par. Crowe's
Maximus is a traditional hero, Phoenix's Commodus his
traditional villain, and like most action films,
`Gladiator' is traditionally predictable. Though the
film has been blamed for some historical inaccuracies,
the period detail of ancient Rome seems particularly
genuine.
Ridley Scott is a master of the movie blockbuster, and
his films are often revered by his legion of fans long
after their original release. Despite a number of
shortcomings, `Gladiator', a film magnificent in its
scope, should prove to be no exception. It is a
wonderful way to kick off a long summer.

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
rated R
Fox Searchlight Pictures
114 minutes
starring Hilary Swank, Chloe Sevigny, Peter Sarsgaard, Brendan Sexton III,
Alison Folland, Alicia Goranson, Matt McGrath, Rob Campbell, Jeanna Arnette
written by Andy Bienen and Kimberly Peirce
directed by Kimberly Peirce
"Boys Don't Cry", the debut film of Kimberly Peirce, is probably the
most emotionally draining picture I will see all year. Having read the
news stories on which this film is based, I knew how it all was going
to end. But that didn't lessen the powerful impact which this film had
on me. It is admittedly a very difficult film to watch, and one that I
cannot recommend to all viewers. However, if you are looking for a
gripping portrait of Americana gone bad, then "Boys Don't Cry" is the
film you need to see.
If you do not know the heartbreaking story of Brandon Teena, then I
will ask you to read no further than this paragraph. It is impossible
to review this film without discussing the ending. But if you know how
the story ends, the film's strong emotional bond is not weakened.
"Boys Don't Cry" explores the life of Brandon Teena (Hilary Swank)
from the day he wanders into Falls City, Nebraska, until the day of
his grisly death a few months later.  Brandon is really a girl named
Teena who is in the midst of a sexual identity crisis. One night,
after having lesbian slurs thrown at her, she decides to cut her hair
and dress like a man. She goes roller skating and ends the night
making out with a beautiful blonde.
The next night, she tries it again, and she meets John (Peter
Sarsgaard) and Tom (Brendan Sexton III), who take Brandon to a party
in their hometown, Falls City. The next day, Brandon wakes up and
realizes that he's still there. That night, at a karaoke bar, he gets
his first glimpse of Lana (Chloe Sevigny), the most beautiful girl in
town.
John, the tough guy who has just got out of prison, resides in Lana's
house with her mother (Jeanna Arnette) and his young daughter. John
has no impulse control, and can often go into unprecedented fits of
wild rage. He immediately takes a liking to the girlish Brandon, but
one can see how he slowly begins to notice his true identity.
Brandon and Lana slowly form a convincing relationship. Like
characters in every small town movie, Lana is bored with her life, and
needs someone to help open her eyes. This helps explain why later in
the film, when she finds out who Brandon really is, she decides to
stay with him/her. Brandon is known as the nice, slightly awkward guy
in town, and Lana likes his sense of newness in her world of familiar
people. All the questions about how their relationship functions
sexually are explained in the film, so I won't go into detail.
Things are going quite well for Brandon in his new life, until he
misses a court date in Lincoln for a grand theft auto which occurred a
while back. Soon his past life of fake IDs and crime catches up with
him, and he finds himself in prison...in the girls ward.
Kimberly Peirce presents every stage of this tragedy flawlessly, and
she doesn't do it alone. Hilary Swank and Chloe Sevigny are excellent
together; each one bringing such emotional honesty to their role. In a
better world, Swank would be a shoo in for an Oscar nomination, but
"Boys Don't Cry" is too explicit and truthful a film to win such an
award.
"Boys Don't Cry" retells one of the most important stories of the
1990's, one that Peirce recreates down to every detail. She spent ages
of research on this project, and even made Hilary Swank live as a man
for a number of weeks. It is a breakout film for everyone involved,
and can stand tall as one of 1999's very best.
The tragic ending to this gritty tale is one that will continue to be
discussed. How could we live in such a homophobic society that a girl
must dress as a boy in order to be accepted, and then die for her
actions? People try to fit in in different ways, with different
results.  The saddest thing about "Boys Don't Cry" is that it really
is just another murder story, one that happens every day in all parts
of the world, but makes us turn our head away.


Title
Review for Life (1999)
rated R
starring Eddie Murphy, Martin Lawrence, Obba Batabunde, Lisa Nicole Carson,
Nick Cassavettes,
Noah Emmerich, Bokeem Woodbine, Clarence Williams III
written by Robert Ramsey & Matthew Stone
directed by Ted Demme
LIFE, Ted Demme's wonderful new film, falls prey to the predator
called marketing. Anyone who has seen the film's trailer and/or poster
will simply dismiss the film as another dumb Eddie Murphy or Martin
Lawrence vehicle, either filled with offensive jokes or strictly for
the kids. Such things happen when an actors become typecast, as Eddie
Murphy and Martin Lawrence have, but their new film, LIFE, is as
expansive as it's title indicates.
Ray and Claude(Murphy and Lawrence, respectively), two practical
strangers living in Harlem, meet when they are forced to retrieve many
cases of beer for the local kingpin, Spanky, because of debts they
each owe. As they travel down to Mississippi, they lose all of their
money gambling to a hotshot whom they later find dead right in front
of their eyes. The man was beaten to death by a cop, but the hicks who
find the two black men suspect him immediately, and before they know
it they are sentenced to prison for life; hence the title.
The Mississippi State Prison of LIFE is a fairly lenient one. The
prison is actually a large farm with no gates, but a boundary called
the "gun line". Ray and Claude form an unlikely partnership, even
though Claude still blames Ray for getting them into the prison. Among
the colleagues they meet, the most memorable ones(I forget his name,
but it's long) is a silent man(Bokeem Woodbine) who, because of his
baseball ablility, is able to escape the prison for the Negro Leagues,
and a homosexual inmate who is granted a pardon but decides to commit
suicide instead of letting his parents see what's happened to him
while in jail.
As Ray and Claude get older, the film begins to grow on the viewer
more and more. After a few failed escape attempts during their
lifetime, the two men are beginning to ponder their own existence and
wonder why they're wasting their time. But they never lose hope.
These qualities of the film, among others, compare favorably with the
Oscar winning Italian film LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL. Like LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL,
LIFE's characters try to provide humor and dreams to get them through
their suffering. Ray sparks the interest of his cellmates when they
all begin to dream about their place in Ray's Boom Boom Room, a
nightclub in which they all play their own little part. Ray and Claude
help prove the universal theory that hope and faith can get anyone
through the worst of times.
Director Ted Demme(BEAUTIFUL GIRLS, MONUMENT AVE.), nephew of director
Jonathan Demme(SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, PHILADELPHIA) lets his actors
shine in roles that flaunt their dramatic and comedic acting
abilities. The film never really addresses subjects like racism
head-on, but the film does, in a much deeper way, help unite a feeling
of peace, instead of violence.  The film then ends on a happy note,
before subjecting the viewer to the unneccesary outtakes. But LIFE is
still one of the year's most unexpected surprises. The film pulls no
punches in getting it's way to your heart, and it proves that life,
though not always beautiful, is always worth living.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
rated R
Paramount Pictures
starring John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy
Hutton, Clarence Williams III, James Woods, Leslie Stefanson
based on the novel by Nelson DeMille
written by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman
directed by Simon West
The topic of debate in "The General's Daughter", a conventional
thriller from Simon West, is whether there is a place for women in the
army. The problem, though, is that the ending fails to present a
clear-cut opinion on the matter. And from watching the film, we don't
have anything to base out opinions on either. "The General's Daughter"
stars John Travolta as an undercover detective who, with a special
agent played by Madeleine Stowe, is investigating the rape and murder
of Capt.  Elizabeth Campbell(Leslie Stefanson), daughter of General
Joe Campbell(James Cromwell). What the two end up finding is a slew of
cover-ups involving some "extracurricular activities". The script is
awful, but things remain interesting because of a touchy subject
matter, and also because of a fine performance by James Woods as a
murder suspect. The most I can say is that it's better than Simon
West's last feature, which was the embarrassing "Con Air". John
Travolta needs a more eclectic role and Madeleine Stowe should use her
tenacity to her advantage. "The General's Daughter" is a so-so
thriller without much originality.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
"What would you do if you had a million dollars?" asks a character in Mike
Judge's awkward satire OFFICE SPACE. "Two chicks at the same time," answers
the other. Right from the start, Judge makes sure you know that this movie
is from the creator of the controversial animated TV program BEAVIS AND
BUTT-HEAD(and co-creator of KING OF THE HILL). But despite being at times
very funny and very entertaining, OFFICE SPACE fails to live up to it's
creator's potential.
Based on Judge's animated shorts "Milton", OFFICE SPACE tells the story of
Peter Gibbons(Ron Livingston), a young computer programmer at a large
corporation called Initech. Peter's job is slowly eating away at him. His
boss, played by Gary Cole, is defnitely a creation of Judge; he is a boss
who is always hinting at something else. A nearby secretary answers every
phone call with "Just a moment". The computer won't print. A nearby
stuttering employee(Stephen Root) is calling Peter on the phone to complain
about his desk being moved constantly. And Peter stays at his desk all day
and plays Tetris. One Saturday, Peter disobeys his boss and doesn't come to
work. From that point on, Peter is a crazed man who just doesn't care about
anything anymore. He comes into work without a suit on the day in which many
employess are being laid off. But instead of being fired, Peter is given a
promotion because of his frankness and laid-back attitude, and his
hard-working friends Samir(Ajay Naidu) and Michael Bolton(David
Herman)...yes you heard me correctly...have been laid off. Wanting to get
back at the corporation, these 3 friends decide to hatch a scheme that could
ruin the whole business without them even knowing. It is then that Peter
meets a pretty young waitress(Jennifer Aniston) with whom he begins a very
underdeveloped relationship(arguably the worst part of the film). 
The whole "work is hell" message of OFFICE SPACE doesn't work nearly as well
as it did in last year's CLOCKWATCHERS. One of the reasons for this is that
Judge, like the Farrelly brothers, isn't above adding stupid subplots to
generate some laughs. The sign of a great comedic filmmaker is when they can
give you laughs without ruining a good plot. RUSHMORE is a fine example of
that kind of film. Judge, however, does show some signs of potential in his
first film. The script is occasionally smart, and he gets likable
performances from most of his actors(Aniston excluded), especially
Livingston, who had a small role in SWINGERS. OFFICE SPACE is also a bit too
short to make much of an impression, but for light comedic fare, this should
provide some harmless entertainment.
review by the Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
www.angelfire.com/mo/film 


Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
rated R
starring Patricia Arquette, Dermot Mulroney, Ellen DeGeneres, Mary-Louise
Parker, Don Johnson
written by Ron Peer, Joel Cohen, & Alec Sokolow
directed by Roland Joffe
Before seeing Roland Joffe's black comedy GOODBYE, LOVER, I didn't
think I would ever need to say that a film suffers because it doesn't
rip off Tarantino enough. But, alas, the unexpected has happen. For
the most part, GOODBYE, LOVER's plot is solid all the way through, and
the twists are timely and unexpected. But the script does not make for
good comedy, and none of the characters are interesting enough to care
much about.
GOODBYE, LOVER is the story of real-estate agent Sandra
Dunmore(Patricia Arquette), a woman as obsessed with kinky sex as she
is with "The Sound of Music". She is cheating on her husband,
Jake(Dermot Mulroney), with his brother, Ben(Don Johnson). Then, one
night, a drunken Jake calls Ben, telling him that he knows all about
the whole ordeal and that he is planning on throwing himself off of a
30-story building. Ben rushes to the building, and while he is trying
to help Jake away from the ledge, Sandra comes from behind and pushes
him off the building to his death.
Jake and Sandra then tell the police investigator, Sgt. Pompano(Ellen
DeGeneres), that Ben fell off while trying to help Jake, and it turns
out that what Jake and Sandra are trying to do is collect the money
from Ben's will, since Jake is Ben's only living relative...or so they
think.
But Ben decided to marry his ditzy co-worker Peggy(Mary-Louise Parker)
3 days before at a secret Las Vegas ceremony. But it's not long before
Sandra finds out, and everyone seems to be against everyone
else. Meanwhile, Sgt. Pompano is still trying to piece together the
whole ordeal.
GOODBYE, LOVER was supposedly kept on Warner Bros. shelves for quite a
while, because the company wasn't sure how to market it. The film
doesn't feature any big name stars, and the subject matter is too dark
and risky for most viewers.
Director Roland Joffe, who directed the great THE KILLING FIELDS and
the not-so-great THE SCARLET LETTER has taken a different route this
time around, with a film that is a lot of fun but doesn't provoke a
lot of thought. Patricia Arquette is good as always as the vixen, and
Ellen DeGenres is, well...Ellen DeGeneres. Walking out of GOODBYE,
LOVER, I wasn't sure what to think of it, because the film doesn't
leave you with much. The film is not as smart as FARGO or even last
year's CLAY PIGEONS, because what it is lacking is a script with the
least bit of comedic bite.  The screenplay, by Ron Peer, Joel
Cohen(don't worry, it's definitely not Joel Coen), and Alec Sokolow
seems to concerned with the story and it's plot twists that it doesn't
take the time to be funny or give us characters we can care about. If
GOODBYE, LOVER had been another PULP FICTION rip-off, I probably
would've enjoyed it more
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Winterschläfer (1997)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
Anyone who saw last year's transcendent, action-packed "Run Lola Run" 
knows that German filmmaker Tom Tykwer is one of film's most exciting 
young auteurs. So it's a shame to note that excitement is what "Winter 
Sleepers", a film he made prior to "Lola" in 1997, is lacking most.
The film takes place in a German skiing village in the dead of winter. A 
pre-credit sequence introduces us to Rebecca (Floriane Daniel), a 
translator of romance novels, Marco (Heino Ferch), her ski-instructor 
boyfriend, Laura (Marie-Lou Sellem), a lonely nurse and fledgling 
actress, Rene (Ulrich Matthes), a lonely movie projectionist, and Theo 
(Josef Bierbichler), a farmer and loyal family man.
Being a Tom Tykwer film, "Winter Sleepers" is also an exploration of 
fate. One winter day, Rene steals a car belonging to Marco, and heads 
out on a slippery highway road. Theo is also driving down the road, with 
a horse in a trailer hitched onto his car. He is unaware that his young 
daughter is also in the trailer. When Theo swerves in order to not to 
crash into the projectionist in the stolen vehicle, his car and trailer 
flip over, leaving his daughter in critical condition. Theo is knocked 
unconscious, and Rene leaves the scene of the accident.
Meanwhile, Rebecca and Marco are contemplating the seriousness of their 
relationship. Rebecca is interested in little more than sex, and Marco 
is having an affair with another woman. Nevertheless, they move in 
together.
Laura and Theo, both lonely and single, also begin a relationship. He 
goes to see her in an awful community production of "A Streetcar Named 
Desire", and gives her free tickets to visit the local cinema. Like most 
of the film's characters, Theo begins as a less-than-admirable 
character, but we learn to understand his pressures, and when the film 
ends, he is a different person.
For the most part, "Winter Sleepers" is the polar opposite of "Run Lola 
Run". While its often unfair to compare two different films, it must be 
taken into consideration that "Lola" is 80 minutes long and fast-paced, 
while "Winter" runs a whopping 124 minutes at a slow pace. The film 
plays like an amateur "Sweet Hereafter", without the poetic grace or 
fine acting.
"Winter Sleepers" does not come without its merits. The mountain 
cinematography, by Frank Griebe, is both breathtaking and unpretentious, 
and the techno score (co-written by Tykwer) often gives the proceedings 
a temporary jolt of energy that is missing from the rest of the film.
Though you wouldn't know it from watching "Winter Sleepers", Tom Tykwer 
is responsible for what might be a new wave of German filmmaking. The 
newest German films, such as "Lola" and Katja Von Garnier's "Bandits", 
are kinetic, highly stylized and more than a bit of fun. Compared to 
those films, "Winter Sleepers" seems to be in hibernation.

Title
Review for Amants criminels, Les (1999)
CRIMINAL LOVERS (LES AMANTS CRIMINELS)
Once Francois Ozon's daringly explicit films See The
Sea, Sitcom and Water Drops on Burning Rocks hit the
European mainland, he was immediately dubbed "the bad
boy of French cinema".  After suffering through the
over-the-top, downright disturbing Criminal Lovers, I
am convinced that Ozon is trying too hard to live up
to his new title.
Criminal Lovers is the type of film that would never
be made in post-Columbine America; it's a Natural Born
Killers in which the killers are under 18.  Alice
(Natacha Regnier), the femme fatale, is a promiscuous,
manipulative bitch whose actions are merciless.  As
the film opens, she persuades her naive boyfriend, Luc
(Jeremie Renier), to help her kill a smug,
good-looking classmate as an act of love.
After the murder is committed, in an empty gymnasium,
the couple flees to the forest to bury the body, and
is kidnapped by a scruffy woodsman (Miki Manojlovic),
who promises to make them suffer for their sins.  He
is the type of man who won't feed Alice because he
likes his women "thin and crispy", and drags Luc
around on a short leash, literally.  Needless to say,
his torture tactics, which involve cannibalism and gay
sex, are not fun to watch.
However, the scenes in the woods are inter-cut with
flashbacks that lead up to the murder, and explain why
it was committed.  The flashbacks are, in their own
way, fascinating, but the more we learn about Alice,
the more we want her to die a bloody death herself. 
Despite all the potentially interesting things Ozon
has to say about the psychology of the characters and
the anatomy of a murder, one can't help but see the
proceedings in an exploitative light.  He claims that
he wanted Criminal Lovers to feel like a fairy tale,
but he must have forgotten that fairy tales aren't
about gratuitous violence and homosexual rape.
Criminal Lovers turns into a rather pointless
psychosexual affair, downright disturbing and equally
creepy.  Regnier ("Dreamlife of Angels"), Renier ("La
Promesse") and Manojlovic (most of Emir Kusturica's
films) are all fine actors, and have done little to
deserve roles in Ozon's B-movie horror-show.  In an
age when the Farrelly Brothers rule the box office and
John Waters is no longer shocking, Francois Ozon has
found new ways to unsettle an audience.  If that's
talent, then so be it.
-Akiva Gottlieb 
http://www.pictureshow.8m.com

Title
Review for Tea with Mussolini (1999)
rated PG
MGM/G2 Films
starring Cher, Judi Dench, Joan Plowright, Maggie Smith, Lily Tomlin, Baird
Wallace, Charlie Lucas
based on the autobiography of Franco Zeffirelli
screenplay by John Mortimer and Franco Zeffirelli
directed by Franco Zeffirelli
In the past year or two, there has been no shortage of World War II
based films. Viewers have now seen the war from many unique
perspectives, and can form their own account of what happened. This
time around, acclaimed director Franco Zeffirelli, who is best known
for his 1968 black-and-white version of "Romeo And Juliet", shares
with us his true story of being raised in Italy during World War II.
In the film, Zeffirelli goes by the alias Luca (Charlie Lucas as a
child, Baird Wallace as a teen).  Luca's Italian father has remarried
to a woman who for some reason despises the child, and Luca is sent
off to live with his English caretaker, Mary (Joan Plowright). Mary is
part of the Scorpioni, a group of mostly arrogant, wealthy, conceited
English women who happen to be living in Florence for the time
being. Hester (Maggie Smith), the leader of the clan, has recently had
tea with Mussolini, the leader of Italy, and he has assured her that
the women will be kept safe in case of any war.
When Elsa (Cher), an elegant, audacious American Jewish woman arrives
into the city, the threat of war seems to come with her. But the women
keep their poise and the oncoming war seems to do nothing to stop
their rich lifestyle. Luca is then sent to Austria by his father so
that he can learn the Nazi ways, and the Englishwomen are told that
they are no longer welcome in Italy. The orders work to no avail.
"Tea With Mussolini" starts off nicely, but the pace soon slows and
the film becomes less interesting as it succumbs to World War II
cliches instead of telling Luca's own story. The livelier moments are
dragged down by the dry patches.
The film does feature a first-rate cast, including Cher (in her first
film role since 1996's "Faithful"), Academy Award Winner Judi Dench,
and Lily Tomlin. All the actresses bring life to their characters, and
despite a clunker of a script, "Tea With Mussolini" at least has its
heart in the right place.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
rated R
Universal Pictures
starring Jason Biggs, Chris Klein, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Eddie Kaye
Thomas, Sean William Scott, Tara Reid, Natasha Lyonne, Alyson
Hannigan, Mena Suvari, Shannon Elizabeth, Jennifer Coolidge, Eugene
Levy, Chris Owen
written by Adam Herz
directed by Paul Weitz
If you've been to a movie theater in the past 2 or 3 months, chances
are you've seen the hilarious, shocking trailer for "American
Pie". And while the film is lewd and consistently hilarious, it's also
derivative and largely unconvincing. "American Pie" is part Farrelly
Brothers and part "Porky's", but at its core is yet another
traditional high school comedy leading up to the prom. However, from
the first scene, we know things are going to be a little bit
different.
We first meet Jim(Jason Biggs) as he is masturbating to an illegal
porn channel on his television set.  His mom barges in and sternly
says "I think you're trying to watch some illegal channels." His very
frank father(Eugene Levy, who deserves some kind of award for his role
here) then assures her that "It's only bad reception, honey."
After a party during which none of Jim's friends(all virgins) get
laid, they decide to make a pact.  They will all lose their virginity
by the end of this, their senior, year.  Kevin(Thomas Ian Nicholas,
from "Rookie Of The Year") is going steady with his girlfriend,
Vicky(Tara Reid), but she's decided to push away sex until Kevin tells
her that he loves her. Oz(Chris Klein, who was so good in "Election")
hasn't had much luck with girls(his main pick-up line is "Suck me,
beautiful"), but he has just met Heather(Mena Suvari), a
goody-two-shoes from his singing class whom he is starting to fall
for. The geeky Finch(Eddie Kaye Thomas) has paid a girl(Natasha
Lyonne of "Slums Of Beverly Hills") to start passing around
tantalizing gossip about him. Jim's best chance is with a sexually
promiscuous foreign exchange student named Nadia(Shannon Elizabeth),
who is coming to his house to "study".
Right from the initial setup, the laughs keep coming, but sadly, so do
the cliches. Because of all the fun, it's hard to care about the many
holes in the plot, but writer Adam Herz feels the need to fill the
gaps with things we've seen and heard too many times before. The
misguided love story between Oz and Heather doesn't work, and a lot of
the dialogue seems forced.
Many envelope-pushing scenes almost nabbed the "teen" film an NC-17
rating, but Universal seems to think that the film will have crossover
appeal(not unlike last year's summer sleeper "There's Something About
Mary"). Universal may have their fourth straight hit on their hands,
following "Life", "The Mummy", and "Notting Hill". There's also the
"South Park" movie and the Eddie Murphy-starring "Bowfinger" on their
summer lineup.
Paul Weitz, making his directing debut here, shows some talent with
his talented teenage ensemble cast. "American Pie" may be the first of
the recent crop of teen movies to have a built in camp value. Although
it may be hard to believe, "American Pie" reaches a level of
raunchiness that "There's Something About Mary" or even "Happiness"
never comes close to.  Whether that's a good thing or not, I'm not
sure.
It's hard for me to call "American Pie" a disappointment, since I had
so much fun. It is a very flawed movie, but anyone who can take it
will have a good time. I wouldn't be surprised if "American Pie" is
the funniest movie to be released this summer.
Note: One of my favorite bands, Blink-182, makes an appearance in the
film.  Their new album, "Enema Of The State" is on sale now. Buy it,
you won't be disappointed.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
The topic of celebrity is one of much debate in this
entertainment-obsessed decade. Should celebrities recieve different
treatment than "regular" people? Well, regardless of whether they
should or shouldn't, they do, and Roger Mitchell's "Notting Hill"
examines the relationship between the world's most famous actress and
a "normal" bookshop owner in a section of London called Notting Hill.
Living in Los Angeles, I have had many celebrity encounters, and my
experiences have usually been somehwat similar. When you first see the
celebrity, you feel a rush that leaves you breathless for a couple
seconds. As you talk to the person, the newness will wear off; the
speed depending on how down-to-earth the celebrity is. However, when
the person leaves, you end up regretting either asking too much or
asking too little. Therefore, a romance between a celebrity and an
everyman can be a whirlwind.
In "Notting Hill", William Thacker(Hugh Grant) first meets Anna
Scott(Julia Roberts) when she visits his travel bookshop, arguably the
least successful store in Notting Hill. A series of coincidences leads
her to his flat, where they share a passionate kiss.  William isn't
sure what to make of the kiss, since Anna had, at first, come off as
arrogant and selfish.
>From that moment on, their relationship has its ups and downs, as
William learns that dating a celebrity is tough work. She loves him
only for the fact that he is something ordinary in a hectic
lifestyle. He loves her because, well...she's the world's biggest
movie star.
"Notting Hill" is well-written for the most part(despite its
predictability), but it is the acting that keeps everything real. Hugh
Grant once again perfects his charming loser act, and Julia Roberts
was born to play this role; a role that isn't much different than her
real life. The supporting cast is wondrous, led by Rhys Ifans("Dancing
At Lughnasa") as William's roommate and newcomer Emma Chambers as
William's sister. The acting more than makes up for the very
conventional wedding.
"Notting Hill" is the first film after Woody Allen's "Celebrity" to
accurately examine the celebrity lifestyle, and it's a topic that
deserves to be looked at in cinema, even if the film is being done by
the people it is examining. I'd like to see a film that(a la "The
Player") looks at celebrity life with sardonic wit and a cynical point
of view. "Notting Hill" isn't that kind of film, but it's a charming,
funny romantic-comedy.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
rated R
Warner Bros. Pictures
159 minutes
starring Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Marie Richardson, Rade
Serbedzija, Todd Field, Vinessa Shaw, Leelee Sobieski
inspired by the novella "Traumnovelle" by Arthur Schnitzler
written by Stanley Kubrick and Fredric Raphael
directed by Stanley Kubrick
In my years of watching movies, I have never once heard anyone be
called a Kubrick rip-off. Sure, film students from here to Timbuktu
constantly use Tarantino and Scorsese as "inspirations", but no one
can rip-off Stanley Kubrick. Why? Maybe because Kubrick's work was so
distinctive, right down to every detail. Stanley Kubrick was film's
most notorious perfectionist, and up until his death a few months ago,
he may have been film's greatest visionary.
With films like "2001: A Space Odyssey" and "Spartacus" he took us to
places that we've never been, and with "A Clockwork Orange" and
"Dr. Strangelove", he expanded our knowledge of things we may have
seen. Kubrick's 17th and final film, "Eyes Wide Shut", is a
masterpiece which is also his most intimate and character-driven film.
In "Eyes Wide Shut", Tom Cruise plays Doctor William Hartford, who is
living the upper-class life in Manhattan with his wife, Alice(Nicole
Kidman) and their young daughter, Helena(Madison Eginton).  The film
opens as Bill and Alice are getting ready for a Christmas party held
by Bill's friend, Victor(Sydney Pollack). At the party, both Alice and
Bill are hit on, but both escape their desires.
That night, after the party, Alice confesses to having sexual
fantasies about other men. After she describes her desires in graphic
detail, Bill has an eventful night on the town where he makes many
sexual and moral discoveries. These involve a hooker, a jazz lounge,
an orgy and a couple of deaths.
Bill ends up getting himself caught up in a psychological web of
jealousy, obsession and revenge. The succession of events are dark,
haunting and disturbing. There is a scene, which takes place at a
ritual orgy, that is one of the most graphic, terrifying and
provocative scenes that Stanley Kubrick has ever put to film.
"Eyes Wide Shut" garnered lots of publicity concerning its risky
subject matter, its two-year long shoot, and its brush with an NC-17
rating. But everything seems to have paid off. Cruise and Kidman fit
their roles perfectly, and all the components fit together.
The film is excellent in its portrayal of a bored married couple and
it is excellent as a dark mood piece. Kubrick magically pushes us
further and further into the story, and the intrigue never ceases.
"Eyes Wide Shut" is a thriller, a romance and a work of art.
The years that have passed since "Full Metal Jacket" seem to be worth
the wait, because "Eyes Wide Shut" is one of 1999's best films. The
film is quite long, and not for the faint of heart. Those expecting a
Tom Cruise romantic comedy a la "Jerry Maguire" will be
disappointed. Those looking for challenging fare among the mess of
summer movies will be pleasantly surprised.
Stanley Kubrick's legacy will continue to live on, both in film
schools and at home. Although he may have been eccentric, he managed
to make unconventional films that people wanted to see. He gave us
something to think about. There is always more to his films than meets
the eye, and his final masterpiece, "Eyes Wide Shut", is no exception.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Love's Labour's Lost (2000)
To many fans of modern cinema, the name Kenneth
Branagh is synonymous with Shakespeare, and rightly
so.  He has adapted the Bard's work in the films
`Henry V', `Much Ado About Nothing' and `Hamlet'
(which is widely considered to be the finest of many
film versions of the play), and enjoyed major success
with each.  His devotees claim that Branagh is the
only working filmmaker who truly understands
Shakespeare, presenting it in a form that is
simultaneously creative and faithful.  I wonder what
those folks will think of his latest foray into the
Bard's creative genius, the amusing yet forgettable
musical treatment of `Love's Labour's Lost'.

Shakespeare's play has been moved to the 1930's, on
the heels of World War II, in fair Navarre.  Four
eligible bachelors, Berowne (Kenneth Branagh), Dumaine
(Adrian Lester), Longeville (Matthew Lillard) and the
King himself (Alessandro Nivola) have sworn off women
and fine food in order to devote three years to the
study of philosophy.  But a diplomatic visit from the
Princess of France (Alicia Silverstone) and her three
beautiful attendants soon attempts to disprove the
men's belief that they can live without love.
Each man, unbeknownst to the others, carefully breaks
the pact and woos one of the women, setting off some
genuinely Shakespearean wordplay and visual comedy. 
The main difference is that, in this production, the
characters break into song at random moments of glee. 
Branagh's decision, to make `Love's Labour's Lost' in
the style of a 1930's musical (with classic songs by
George Gershwin and Irving Berlin), is surely a
welcome one, considering the lowly status of the
modern movie musical.  However, while the choreography
and singing are top-notch (all the actors recorded the
songs using their own voices, and did all the dancing
as well), only a couple of the musical interludes add
to the story.  It is as if the characters are so bored
with the material that they choose their own agenda.
This we should be thankful for, as the dramatic side
of Branagh's film is underdeveloped.  Shakespeare's
characters often referred to women as the `weaker
vessels', and this production does little to disprove
that theory.  Alicia Silverstone, attempting some kind
of dramatic comeback, is severely miscast, showing
Valley-girl type problems with her lines, and her
three female companions fail to make any kind of
impression.  As a result, parts of the 95-minute
running time drag, since the romance in `Love' is
what's truly lost.
However, this comedy still has a lot going for it. 
The story is lighter than a feather, and the film's
all-around joyfulness makes it a breath of fresh air,
especially in the wake of recent angst-ridden Bard
adaptations like Michael Almereyda's Gen-X `Hamlet'. 
Also, while `Love's Labour's Lost' retains much of
Shakespeare's original language, it is relatively
easy-to-follow and enjoy, the story being as
straightforward as it is.
Kenneth Branagh's `Love's Labour's Lost' is certainly
an intriguing project; one that refreshingly lacks the
cynicism found in his earlier films.  Sadly, though,
it will not reinvent the movie musical, nor
reinvigorate the work of Shakespeare.  However, it's
still more fun than you're likely to find in the
multiplex.   

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
At some point in their lives, many adults look back upon their
twenty-or-so years of schooling and wonder where all the knowledge
went; or better yet, what was the point of the knowledge? The
characters in `Boiler Room' figured out early on that their
upper-class prep school upbringing, and the limited amount of
knowledge that came along with it, was all just preparation for
fulfilling life's most important task: becoming a millionaire .
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi), the son of upper-class Jewish parents,
knows that money is nothing without hard work. When we first meet him,
he has dropped out of college and pays the rent by running a casino in
his home. His overbearing father (Ron Rifkin), who happens to be a
prominent judge, disapproves of his son's work.
At this point, fate brings Greg (Nicky Katt) into Seth's
casino. He offers him a job as a stock broker at his small firm
J.T. Martin, where Seth is guaranteed to make a million dollars in his
first three years. Why pass it up, thinks Seth, if I can make money
and please my father at the same time? So he decides to take the job
and learn the ropes of telemarketing.
It only takes a few weeks for Seth to become one of the
firm's high-rollers, along with a group of guys who can quote every
line from Oliver Stone's `Wall Street'. But la dolce vita is
spoiled when Seth finds out that the firm is selling stocks that
don't exist. An intense battle with his supervisor doesn't help
matters much.
First-time writer/director Ben Younger makes `Boiler
Room' into a dark, direct study of day-traders. However, the film
lacks much of the immediacy found in similar films such as
`Glengarry Glen Ross' and `The Firm'. Younger's hip-hop
style is anything but conventional, yet `Boiler Room's'
storyline paints by the numbers.
What makes `Boiler Room' an involving picture are the
brilliantly smug performances from the young ensemble cast. Along with
Ribisi and Katt as the leads, this young group includes Ben Affleck,
Nia Long, Tom Everett Scott, Jamie Kennedy and Vin Diesel. The energy
needed to make this film successful is provided by each of the
aforementioned actors.
`Boiler Room' is certainly an ambitious first project
for Ben Younger, so it's disappointing to note that the film's
elements never quite jell. The first portion of the film is often
comical, while the final statement is largely depressing. Younger has
built `Boiler Room' around one probable assumption. The world is
one big stock market; some sell out, others buy in.

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
In Alison Maclean's `Jesus' Son', the audience is
provided with a narrator who sounds drunk, a
disjointed plot that doesn't make a whole lot of
sense, a handful of undeveloped lowlifes who are
supposed to pass as characters, and some heavy-handed
Christ imagery. However, by the end of the film, I
hardly cared, because although `Jesus' Son' contains
not an ounce of dramatic substance, Maclean's
disjointed, careless style suits the `slacker' tale
rather well. 
The film is based on a series of
semi-autobiographical, drug-induced short stories
written by cult favorite Denis Johnson. `Jesus' Son'
tells of the random misadventures of a 1970's heroin
addict named Fuck Head (Billy Crudup). Our narrator,
whom we first encounter on a dark highway, is FH
himself, who tells his story in a non-linear manner;
often forgetting and remembering, clarifying and
commenting. The tactic, which is meant to be either
humorous or interesting, comes off instead as
annoying. 
FH doesn't lead a terribly important life. Our
information about him is limited: he is a junkie, his
girlfriend Michelle (Samantha Morton) is a junkie, and
his friends (Denis Leary, Jack Black) are, you guessed
itjunkies. No background, no goals, nothing but drugs
and booze. It's not hard to imagine how that kind of
lifestyle can alienate a man. Indeed, FH lives a life
of cloudy alienation; a life in which the boundary
between a vision and a hallucination is a thin line. 
And, of course, `Jesus' Son' fits into the genre of
the tried and true `let's get sober' cautionary tale,
somewhere along the lines of `Drugstore Cowboy'. But,
after a dreadfully poor opening act, the film settles
down to find its own quirky charm. One especially
entertaining episode involves FH's night out with a
pill-popping peer played by the multi-talented Jack
Black (`High Fidelity'). 
With an eclectic soundtrack of 70's rock hits, some
`far out' hallucination sequences, and a cameo by
Dennis Hopper, pioneer of another drug culture,
`Jesus' Son' gets an A for style. It's too bad, then,
that the film is so shallow, because, with a bit of
substance, this could have been a cult classic.
`Jesus' Son' shows us how the characters use drugs,
but never tells us why. 
Alison Maclean (`Crush') directs this film with a
unique visual flair, shooting the more intimate
sequences on digital video. She shows a lot of
promise. It is the screenplay, written by three
people, that ruins a potentially strong picture. The
script never treats FH like a person, even if the
camera does. `Jesus' Son' is at times remarkably
atmospheric, and at other times remarkably bad. For
the most part, `Jesus' doesn't deserve your faith. 

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
When Francis Ford Coppola entered the movie business,
he should have anticipated that his entire family
would also leave their own mark. Sofia Coppola is his
daughter, Talia Shire is his sister, and Nicolas Cage
is his nephew. Cage married Patricia Arquette, Sofia
Coppola married Spike (`Being John Malkovich') Jonze,
and Talia Shire wed Jack Schwartzman, a film producer.
The Schwartzmans had two children, Jason, who starred
in 1998's `Rushmore', and Robert, whose feature film
debut is in cousin Sofia's `The Virgin Suicides'.
If Sofia is trying hard to live up to her family's
distinguished name, then she doesn't show it, because
`Virgin Suicides' is a leisurely-paced, darkly comical
and often dreamlike first feature. After her
performance in `The Godfather Part III' received
critical pans, she turned her ambitions to photography
and fashion, and succeeded in both fields. Her unique
visual flair lends a quiet subtlety to her portrait of
suburban dismay.
`The Virgin Suicides', based on the novel by Jeffrey
Eugenides, is the story of five unattainable teenage
girls and the four boys who lust after them in 1970's
Michigan. The five Lisbon sisters live in a quiet
suburban house with their domineering mother (Kathleen
Turner) and their passive father (James Woods). The
mysterious girls live by strict rules, and the fact
that they're not allowed to go out at night adds to
the boys' obsession.
Things become more mysterious when the youngest Lisbon
sister, Cecilia (Hanna Hall), attempts a suicide.
`You've never been a thirteen-year-old girl,' she
tells a psychologist (Danny DeVito). When she gets
better, the parents let the girls throw the first and
only party of their short lives. For the first time,
the neighborhood boys are able to sneak a peek at the
world of the Lisbon sisters.
But the party turns tragic as Cecilia tries suicide
once again, and succeeds. An even thicker cloud of
mystery shrouds the house Strangely, in the aftermath,
all the Lisbons act as if the suicide had never
occurred, 
It is at this point that school hunk Trip Fontaine
(Josh Hartnett) meets the dreamily gorgeous Lux Lisbon
(Kirsten Dunst). Against all odds, he is able to
persuade Mr. Lisbon to allow him to take her to the
homecoming dance. He is the first and only boy to ever
get close to one of the sisters. But the events that
occur at the dance lead Mr. And Mrs. Lisbon to remove
the girls from school and leave them locked up in the
house 24 hours a day. This builds up to a climax that
will be the most talked about aspect of the film.
Sofia Coppola has succeeded in painting a vivid
portrait of adolescent obsession that feels a lot like
a dream. Like all dreams, not everything is clear at
first, and everything is open to interpretation.
Coppola's film is a mystery with an open ending, like
waking up from a nightmare because you can't dream
your own death.
There's so much subtlety here, that it makes me wonder
why the filmmakers provided voice-over narration (by
Giovanni Ribisi) to tell the emotions of the
characters in almost every scene. It's an overused
tactic that's used to death in this film. Coppola's
pictures speak louder than words, and the film would
have been even better without the running commentary. 
James Woods and Kathleen Turner give nice, restrained
performances as the parents, but it is the beautiful
Kirsten Dunst (`Dick', `Interview With The Vampire')
who steals the show. We never learn very much about
the Lisbon sisters, but Dunst makes Lux the one the
audience is still thinking about when the film is
over.
Sofia Coppola's absorbing debut film proves once again
that the only good films about teenagers are from the
art-house. With its delicate balance of fantasy and
reality, a screen full of beautiful imagery, and a
haunting musical score by Air that I ended up
purchasing, `The Virgin Suicides' is one of the first
pleasant surprises to emerge from Sundance 2000.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
In FORCES OF NATURE, Bronwen Hughes' contrived, pointless attempt of a
romantic comedy, we, the audience are asked not to just suspend
disbelief, but to stretch our brain's capacity to digest the
impossible. The main problem with this film is that it doesn't know
whether it has its feet up in the air or planted firmly on the ground.
Ben Affleck plays Ben, a 20ish yuppie who writes blurbs for book
jackets.  The plane-shy Ben is off to Savannah to marry his fiancee
(Maura Tierney).  Everyone Ben meets on his way to the wedding seems
to be unabashedly cynical about marriage.  They all tell him their
triumphant stories of divorce and adultery, but Ben seems to be ready
and willing to face the challenge which awaits him on his big day.
That is, until he meets Sarah (Sandra Bullock), an outgoing and
somewhat crazy woman who happens to sit next to him on his
flight. That is, until the plane "crashes" before it even takes off
(don't ask). In the aftermath of it all, Ben and Sarah decide to drive
cross country with another traveler named Vic. That is, until Vic gets
them busted by smoking pot in his car. After that, Ben and Sarah are
on their own, both trying desperately to get to Savannah, in any form
of transportation imaginable. They even hitch a ride on a tour bus
full of elderly fun-seekers, and end up in the same hotel as the
wedding's best man (Steve Zahn). Ben and Sarah really hit it off, and
Ben begins to question his love for his fiance. That is, until he
finds out dark truths about Sarah. Meanwhile, back at home, an old
beau (the late David Strickland) is putting the moves on his fiance,
and her mother (Blythe Danner) is freaking out. And then a hurricane
strikes, hence the title.
FORCES OF NATURE wants to be a fantasy, and at the same time a
meditation on the storminess of love (why couldn't they just stop the
whole love/weather metaphor before it even began?), but director
Bronwen Hughes (HARRIET THE SPY) manages to convey neither. The lame
idea of FORCES OF NATURE was actually sketched out by the DreamWorks
studio, which then hired screenwriter Marc Lawrence to transfer their
idea into a screenplay. FORCES OF NATURE is sporadically entertaining,
and all in all, it isn't that bad of a film. But then again, it's just
a big studio's shot at making some profit early in the year. I would
have given it 2-and-a-half stars, but then i thought about how much I
had underrated Clint Eastwood's recent TRUE CRIME, which I gave 3
stars, and I thought of how this film does not compare with the
other. Also, condolences to the family of David Strickland, who
commited suicide in a Las Vegas motel on the opening weekend of FORCES
OF NATURE. A publicist says that he was mad about his role being
trimmed down as much as it was (he's only in a couple of scenes), but
it's Hollywood and that's what you've got to expect. Also, somebody
give America's best-loved supporting actor, Steve Zahn, a major role!
He's shown promise in too many films (SUBURBIA, OUT OF SIGHT) to be
ignored.
Review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
rated PG-13
New Line Cinema
starring Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Robert Wagner, Rob Lowe,
Seth Green, Mindy Sterling, Verne Troyer, Elizabeth Hurley, Kristen Johnson,
Gia Carides
written by Mike Myers and Michael McCullers
directed by Jay Roach
There's no denying that "Saturday Night Live" alum Mike Myers has
talent. He can write, act, produce and improvise. But most of all he's
just really damn funny. A few years ago, he was best known for
"Wayne's World", a lowbrow pre-Adam Sandler comedy about two slackers
who get their own TV show. The film spawned a sequel in 1993, and
after that Myers took a four-year hiatus. He made a grand return in
1997 with "Austin Powers: International Man Of Mystery", a 60's spy
spoof featuring himself as the shagadelic, unhygienic title character
(and as his nemesis, Dr. Evil).  The film grossed 50 million in
theatres but became a huge hit on video. Like I said before, Myers is
really damn funny, but you wouldnt know it from his latest, "Austin
Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me"; the lackluster sequel to the other
"Powers" film.
Dr. Evil (Mike Myers) is back and this time he has brought an even
more eclectic band of characters to help him take over the world. To
act as his evil sidekick, replacing his quasi-evil son (Seth Green),
he has made a clone of himself; a person 1/8 his size whom he
affectionately calls Mini-Me (Verne Troyer). He also has invented a
"time machine" which will enable him to return to 60's Britain.
Meanwhile, Austin Powers has just found out that the woman whom he
believed to be his wife (Elizabeth Hurley) was actually a robot
working for Dr. Evil. In order to stop Austin from plotting his
revenge, Dr. Evil sends out Fat Bastard (Mike Myers, once again) to
steal Austin's "mojo" (basically his libido, but for Austin, it's the
reason why women fall for him despite his many flaws, which explains a
lot). Austin then teams up with Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham) to
retrieve the mojo from the hands of Dr. Evil. But Dr. Evil has also
created a "laser" which he will use to destroy every city in the
world.
While the first "Austin Powers" was occasionally very witty, the
sequel is only funny about once every 15 minutes, and all of its humor
is quite dumb. In many ways, "Austin Powers" is a very conventional
movie franchise. The first film was a hit because of its originality
and style, and it did well because of word-of-mouth. The sequel is a
typical Hollywood creation, as the humor is dumbed-down for the kids
and the wit and sharpness of the former is gone.
Much of "Austin Powers" humor comes from the audacious sexual
references that are somehow harnessed to just avoid an "R"
rating. There are dick jokes aplenty in the sequel, and many bodily
fluids are passed around ("South Park", anyone?). A little-known fact
about "Austin Powers" is that half of the film is improvised. Director
Jay Roach keeps the camera rolling and it is usually then that he
catches Mike Myers' comedic skill.
"The Spy Who Shagged Me" will undoubtedbly rake in millions at the box
office, and many sequels will follow. Maybe, just maybe, one of those
sequels will provide something as fresh and new as the original film.
Note: The entire opening weekend was sold out, and many of my friends
told me just about every joke in the film before I got to see
it. Maybe that is a factor; maybe not.  Also, what's up with the "Star
Wars" references? It is a sad comment on society when "The Spy Who
Shagged Me" outdoes "Star Wars" at the box office and then laughs in
its face.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com (!!!!!!new site address!!!!!!) 


Title
Review for Get Real (1998/I)
rated R
released by Paramount Classics
starring Ben Silverstone, Brad Gorton, Charlotte Brittain, Stacey Hart, Kate
McEnery, Patrick Nielsen
written by Patrick Wilde(based on his play "What's Wrong With Angry?")
directed by Simon Shore
For quite a while, homosexuality has been trying to find a way into modern
cinema. In films such
as "Gods And Monsters" and "Beautiful Thing", the homosexual themes were
ways to further the
story, rather than shock the mainstream audience. But, I'm afraid the genre
has taken a step in the
wrong direction with Simon Shore's dramatic comedy "Get Real", the first
feature from Paramount
Classics.
Ben Silverstone stars as Steven Carter, a 16-year-old British gay male who
settles for casual sex
in bathrooms. The only one whom he has told about his sexuality is
Linda(Charlotte Brittain), his
overweight next-door-neighbor. The two social misfits are constantly mocked,
but they
complement each other nicely.
One day, while Steven is in a bathroom where the gay men mingle, he gets a
note from someone
in the next stall, asking him to meet him outside. A few minutes later,
Steven realizes that it's John
Dixon(Brad Gorton), the most popular jock in school and "sex on
legs"(proclaims Linda). He tells
Steven that they must forget about the whole thing because he doesn't know
what came over him.
While the year goes on, and different girls(most notably Jessica, played by
Stacey Hart) hit on
Steven and John, the two teens realize their infatuation for one another.
John still denies to himself
that he's gay, but he admits that he is confused. Steven, meanwhile, is
coping with the fact that his
parents are slowly figuring out his secret identity.
The main problem, though, with "Get Real", is that it treats "coming out" as
a plot element that can
fill a movie. But all of "Get Real" is just Steven contemplating whether to
come out or not. "Get
Real" wants to be a normal romantic-comedy, but it makes it's gay themes
seem all too important.
Another problem is cliches. In class, the kids just have to be learning
Shakespeare's "Romeo And
Juliet"(oh no, not another metaphor), while the film's own star-crossed
lovers are taking their
place. And of course, there's got to be the newspaper article, written by
Steven, entitled "Get
Real", from which the film takes its name. It's quite surprising that a film
which claims to be so
refreshingly original and daring can't even surpass the depth of America's
latest teen comedies.
"Get Real" is also very, very melodramatic, so I ended up feeling almost
nothing for it's characters,
making it a dull experience.
But at least newcomer Ben Silverstone gives a charming performance as
Steven, with potential
that shows that he will charge ahead when given a better role. And this is
director Simon Shore's
first film, so at least he has many more years for improvement


Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
rated PG-13
starring Glenn Close, Julianne Moore, Liv Tyler, Chris O'Donnell, Charles
Dutton, Patricia Neal, Ned Beatty, Courtney B. Vance, Donald Moffat, Lyle
Lovett
written by Anne Rapp
directed by Robert Altman
Robert Altman has earned his reputation as one of America's most
distinguished filmmakers. He has made war films(MASH), historical
dramas(VINCENT & THEO) and legal thrillers(THE GINGERBREAD MAN). But
this time around, he has directed COOKIE'S FORTUNE, a hilarious and
quirky dark comedy that opened 1999's Sundance Film Festival. First
time writer Anne Rapp wrote this kinda-sorta murder mystery that
slightly echoes the Coen brothers' FARGO and David Dobkin's CLAY
PIGEONS. What is kind of ironic about COOKIE'S FORTUNE is that 15
minutes into the movie, we know who commited the murder and how, and
during the course of the film we are watching the citizens of a small
town called Holly Springs try to figure out what it going on.
Willis Richland(Charles Dutton) has noticed that Cookie(Patricia
Neal), an old lady whom he cares for, has started acting a trifle
odd. One day, when he goes out to run a few errands, Cookie commits
suicide to finally reunite with her dead husband.  Unfortunately, the
first to arrive at her home is Camille(Glenn Close), a quirky relative
who has come to fetch a salad bowl. She notices that Cookie isn't
answering her, so she goes upstairs to find Cookie dead, the gun in
her hand. Camille's dimwitted sister, Cora, wanders inside and also
sees what has happened. "Cookie did not commit suicide," Camille
assures her. "Only crazy folks commit suicide." Camille, for reasons
unknown to anyone except for her, wants to prove that her family isn't
crazy, so she tries to pass off Cookie's suicide as a murder. She goes
through all the steps trying to make it seem like a murder, and then
calls the cops. Meanwhile, Cora's delinquent daughter, Emma(Liv
Tyler), is back in town. When the police suspect Willis of commiting
the crime, and lock him up, she decides to become her
cellmate. Infact, the jail cell is basically an open room where the
cops come in and play Scrabble and talk about fishing with the
criminals. One of the cops is Jason, a very dumb young man who is in
love with Emma. Jason is excited to be coping with the town's first
real crime, and Camille is trying to cover it up right in front of
him.
COOKIE'S FORTUNE isn't one of Altman's more important films, but it is
still a cut above most dark comedies. Unlike many directors, Altman
isn't trying to show off any derivative new style. He just wants the
viewer to see the characters in their real life form, which makes the
film all the more convincing. I'm surprised to see that the film
recieved somewhat lukewarm reception at Sundance. Perhaps the viewers
were hoping for something different. But I, for one, loved this
entertaining gem. Infact I may have even enjoyed it better than
Altman's last outing, the John Grisham's scripted THE GINGERBREAD MAN,
which was also a very good picture. COOKIE'S FORTUNE is a breath of
fresh air from other derivative movies made by twentysomething film
students.  It shows patient, developed filmmaking from a truly
knowledgable filmmaker.  COOKIE'S FORTUNE is one of the new year's
smartest comedies.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Twin Falls Idaho (1999)
The Polish Brothers' "Twin Falls Idaho" is an example of an effective
independent film. With a cast of no-name actors, it shows us things
that we've never been shown before. In "Twin Falls Idaho" these things
are presented to us in an original and involving manner, for it is a
true independent film made with heart instead of money.
Yes, there is a real town called Twin Falls, Idaho, but it has nothing at
all to do with this film. Let me break down the title for you:
Twin- This film involves two brothers who are conjoined twins.
Falls- The brothers' last name is Falls.
Idaho- They live on Idaho Ave., in a city that closely resembles downtown
Los Angeles.
Real-life identical twins Michael and Mark Polish play, respectively,
Francis and Blake, a pair of conjoined twins living in a run-down
hotel. Penny (Michele Hicks), a hooker, shows up as a birthday
present, but Francis falls ill and she ends up staying and taking care
of them. Francis' health has been heading downwards, and the stronger
Blake is the one who keeps them alive.
Slowly, Blake and Penny become friends, and Penny begins to feel an
odd attraction for him.  Francis, however, takes an instant disliking
to her; perhaps because he is jealous. After living about 20 years
attached to each other, Blake finally starts to think about how it
would be if he could be free, and not have to worry about
Francis. "I'll call you when I'm single," Blake says to Penny.
The relationship between the conjoined twins is very, very
interesting. As a character notes later in the film, their
companionship is like a marriage where divorce is not an option. Blake
and Francis are well-rounded individuals, but a thing like this makes
you wonder how some more hostile types can survive as conjoined twins.
The Polish Brothers have crafted a dark, but touching film. The film's
tone and story are offbeat, but surprisingly, it should be accessible
to mainstream audiences. There are many directions that this film
could have travelled, and a fine path was chosen. I was expecting a
more gritty movie, but "Twin Falls Idaho" has chosen to keep the
tension subtle. In this way, the film can be moving without being too
sentimental.
The performances of the two brothers are as effective as their
behind-the-camera work. They manage to convey, quietly, the long,
drawn-out suffering of two brothers who are together without a choice.
However, it is newcomer Michele Hicks, as Penny, who makes the most
affecting debut. Instead of being the hooker with a heart of gold, she
is a heart of gold who happens to be a hooker.
The Polish Brothers' debut film, "Twin Falls Idaho", is an
interesting, character-driven movie that may decieve some with its
dark tone. Praised at Sundance, the idea of "Twin Falls Idaho" may
strike some as too odd, but those willing to see the film will find it
a pleasant surprise; like a hooker with a heart of gold.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Rear Window (1954)
"Rear Window" takes place almost entirely in one room, yet Sir Alfred
Hitchcock envisioned it as "a purely cinematic film." It is his
ambitious vision that transforms tricky source material into a
timeless classic. To keep his vision intact, Robert A. Harris and
James C. Katz have restored the film from its original negative, and
this remastered version packs the same punch that the original did 5
decades ago.
Most of Hitchcock's films involve voyeurism, but "Rear Window" was
perhaps his most overt film on the subject. "Rear Window" is effective
because it portrays not only its protagonist as a voyeur, but the
viewer as well.
The opening pan shot of the film tells us everything we need to know
about L.B. Jefferies (James Stewart) without wasting a line of
dialogue. The man is a magazine photojournalist who became
wheelchair-bound after a racetrack accident. His girlfriend, Lisa
Fremont (Grace Kelly), is "perfect", yet L.B. is somehow afraid of
commitment, and marriage plans have been put off. He spends his days
solitarily confined in his Greenwich Village apartment, watching
people's lives through his rear window.
We never really hear the neighbors speak, yet each one is a
character. There is the ballet dancer who has to deal with a handful
of men, the lonely woman who longs for affection, and the newlyweds
who spend all day "indoors".
We accept Jefferies as a Peeping Tom perhaps because there is nothing
better for him to do.  However, this all changes when he witnesses
what he believes may be a murder in an apartment across his
courtyard. A strange man named Lars Thorwald (Raymond Burr, who later
on became TV's "Perry Mason") keeps returning to his apartment at late
hours of the night carrying suspicious items. His sickly wife has not
been seen for the past few days.
At first, Lisa thinks that L.B. has become paranoid from lack of
sleep, and scolds his "rear-window ethics". But as new evidence brings
her into the game, "Rear Window" begins to study the fine line between
paranoia and suspicion.
Up until the film's final minutes, nothing about the "murder" is set
in stone. Hitchcock lets the viewer watch the story unfold from
Jefferies' point of view, so that at times the audience feels like a
Peeping Tom. In this way, from the most uncinematic setup, Hitchcock
answers the age-old question of "Why do we go to the movies?" The
audience can sympathize with Jefferies because we know that we're the
true voyeurs, and that "watching the neighbors" is a human instinct.
"Rear Window" is not one of Alfred Hitchcock's most exciting films,
but it is definitely one of his tightest. It is his talkiest film,
which isn't a problem thanks to John Michael Hayes' dialogue, which is
witty, clever and very sharp. James Stewart and Grace Kelly showcase a
chemistry that is rarely seen in films today, and all the neighbors do
a superb job of silent acting.
"Rear Window" joins the ranks of "Lawrence Of Arabia", "Spartacus",
"My Fair Lady" and Hitchcock's "Vertigo" as films that have been
restored by the dynamic duo of Harris & Katz. They have done a fine
job with this film, making it look as modern as possible, even with
the fake Hollywood sets that in no way resemble New York City.
However, I did notice a couple rough spots with the sound, and the
final confrontation scene seems to be sped up. But it's a small price
to pay to see this masterpiece back on the big screen.
In 1954 "Rear Window" was first released. Now it is 2000, and The
Master Of Suspense is simply acknowledged as The Master. It is a
tribute to his everlasting legacy that more than a century after his
birth, he can still hold the viewer in the palm of his hand.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Last year's mob comedy MAFIA! didn't work very well, due to lack of a
smart script and good acting. Harold Ramis' ANALYZE THIS works in all
the ways that MAFIA!  doesn't.  ANALYZE THIS tells the story of Long
Island shrink Ben Sobel(Billy Crystal), who one day gets into a car
accident with a mobster nicknamed Jelly(Joe Viterelli) and the trunk
pops open, exposing a half-dead, tied up man. "You didn't see
nothing," Jelly assures him. Jelly's Don, Paul Vitti(Robert De Niro),
keeps having panic attacks, and expresses the need to see a shrink to
discuss "his friend." Jelly tells him about the one he ran into, and
Vitti pays him a visit. Vitti seems to be losing his gangster
mentality.  He cries at corny commercials and can't find the will to
kill a person anymore. Vitti becomes so obsessed with becoming sane
that he follows Sobel to Florida, where he is supposed to wed
Laura(Lisa Kudrow).
If put in the hands of other filmmakers, ANALYZE THIS would become a
mess.  But director Ramis(GROUNDHOG DAY) keeps things light, and gets
great performances from both leads. Billy Crystal has found a role
wothy of his comic presence, but the one who steals the show is
undoubtedly De Niro. The greatest actor of all time in my opinion, De
Niro shows an gives an exceptionally funny performance. In the film,
he seems to be reprising all the mob characters he's ever played, and
for that reason, De Niro's Vitti didn't need to be a very developed
character, just a funny guy.  ANALYZE THIS also gives viewers the
first chance(I think) to watch De Niro cry. Oh, if only word got out
to the Corleone family... There is nothing groundbreaking about
ANALYZE THIS, but it features a performance that any De Niro fan
should seek out.


Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
A couple weeks ago I had the pleasure of viewing the
restored version of Alfred Hitchcock's classic `Rear
Window'. That masterpiece about voyeurism influenced
all later films on the subject, many of which became
classics as well. `Eye Of The Beholder', the latest
film to tackle voyeuristic themes, fails miserably,
but not because of its subject's familiarity.
Australian filmmaker Stephan Elliott began his career
with the art-house hit `The Adventures Of Priscilla,
Queen Of The Desert' and then proceeded to make
`Welcome To Woop Woop', one of the worst films to
manage a theatrical release in recent years. His
latest film is a silly, contrived noir and the second
release from Destination Films.
Ewan McGregor stars as Eye (I kept waiting for the
inevitable `Eye did it!' line, but it wasn't there), a
private investigator who does his peeping with
computer technology. For inconsequential reasons, his
wife left him, and his daughter only exists as a
computerized image.
His task is to follow Joanna (Ashley Judd), a woman
who kills men for their money and takes many baths.
Eye follows her across the country and develops an
infatuation for her. Eye is a father who has lost his
daughter, while Joanna is a daughter who has lost her
father. Isn't that interesting?
If nothing else, Stephan Elliott does give `Eye Of The
Beholder' an interesting look. Most of the cars and
clothes have a 50's noirish style. It's too bad that
Elliott doesn't give us a clue as to what it all
means.
By the film's final third, most of the plot does not
make sense either. Many characters change
personalities without any explanation. There are also
numerous heavy-handed astrological references which
merely add to the silliness of the production.
The reason why `Eye Of The Beholder' stays watchable
is because of a fine, restrained performance by Ewan
McGregor. Singlehandedly, he gives the film its tiny
sense of mystery. Speaking of mysteries, what is
Ashley Judd's appeal? In this film especially, she
does little more than show some skin and speak lines
without emotion.
However, the two worst performances come from two
unlikely faces. The first, from pop vocalist k.d.
lang, is so unbelievably bad that laughter is
inevitable. `Beverly Hills, 90210' alumnus Jason
Priestley also has five awful minutes of screen time
as a small-town junkie.
`Eye Of The Beholder' is a strange film that leaves
too many questions unanswered. Thankfully, the
filmmakers know that by the end the audience will no
longer care. Destination Films didn't make a mistake
by dumping this film into the cinematic pit known as
January. Hell, it'll probably even make some cash.
I can't recommend this film to any audience, other
than to those obsessed with Ewan McGregor. Because
aside from him, there isn't much beauty in the eye of
this `Beholder'.

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)

Black and White
rated R
Screen Gems
98 minutes
starring Scott Caan, Robert Downey Jr., Stacy Edwards, Allan Houston, 
Gaby Hoffmann, Kidada Jones, Jared Leto, Marla Maples, Joe Pantoliano, 
Bijou Phillips, Power, Raekwon, Claudia Schiffer, William Lee Scott, 
Brooke Shields, Ben Stiller, Eddie Kaye Thomas, James Toback, Mike 
Tyson, Elijah Wood, Kim Matulova
written and directed by James Toback
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
James Toback is no stranger to controversy. In 1998, his brilliant "Two 
Girls And A Guy" was slapped with an NC-17 because of a sex scene that 
contained not a trace of nudity. His latest film, "Black and White", 
also received an NC-17 for a pre-credit sequence involving mE9nage a =
trois in Central Park between a black man and two white teenage girls. 
Both films were eventually cut to receive a more marketable R rating, 
but each one is crafted with the skill of a filmmaker unafraid of taking 
risks.
It's too bad, then, that "Black and White" is as stagnant as it is. It 
is supposed to be an opus about race relations in New York City, but 
ultimately, the film is as inconsequential as any one of the 
underdeveloped caricatures that this ensemble cast attempts to animate. 
However, that doesn't stop it from being an entertaining 98-minute 
diversion.
Toback has fashioned "Black and White" unconventionally. He allowed his 
talented ensemble to improvise many scenes in the film. I'm sure Toback 
made this choice in order to add some realism to his character study, 
but most of the time, the improvisation leads to dialogue that is 
unnecessary, silly and artificial.
The plot of "Black and White" involves a dread-locked Brooke Shields, 
playing a documentary filmmaker out to study the recent phenomenon of 
upper class white kids who pretend to live the hip-hop lifestyle. Along 
with her closeted gay husband (Robert Downey Jr., who starred in 
Toback's "Two Girls And A Guy"), she follows around a group of Manhattan 
teenagers (Bijou Phillips, Elijah Wood, Gaby Hoffmann, Eddie Kaye 
Thomas) on their daily journey to "the 'hood", where they meet up with 
members of the fictional rap group Cream Team (Power, Raekwon, Method 
Man),
Meanwhile, Dean (Allan Houston), a local basketball player, receives 
$50,000 from a mysterious man (Ben Stiller) in order to lose a game. His 
girlfriend (Claudia Schiffer) tells him to "be true to yourself", and 
taking her advice gets him into trouble with the law.
There is an already infamous scene in "Black and White" which finds 
Robert Downey Jr. hitting on a hilarious Mike Tyson (playing himself). 
The fun of the encounter is derived from Toback's clever improvisation 
guidelines. He told Downey to make a move on Tyson, and told Tyson that 
Downey would merely come up and make conversation. After Downey gets a 
little too close, Tyson slaps him across the face. "But what if he kills 
me?" Downey asked Toback. Toback replied, "Look at it this way; firstly, 
I'll get it on camera and we'll have a great scene and secondly, if he 
does kill you, what more dramatic way is there to go?" This is a 
director with a unique vision.
For a while, "Black and White" gets by on the charm of fish-out-of-water 
encounters like the aforementioned Downey-Tyson sequence. But the charm 
easily wears thin since many of the actors give irritating performances. 
NBA star Allan Houston, supermodel Claudia Schiffer, and rapper Power 
all make unsuccessful transitions into acting. Also, Toback's film works 
better when it's not worrying about plot. Towards the end, as "Black and 
White" works toward its weak denouement, it becomes a conventional 
murder story; one that isn't particularly interesting.
Toback is obviously aiming for a dissection of role-playing in society, 
but it rarely works as such. Instead, it's a day-in-the-life journey 
across the respective 'cribs' of those living "the lifestyle", in one 
way or another. To call it a dissection would give Toback too much 
credit, because he never gets under the skin of his characters in a way 
that Robert Altman might have.
The "wigga" phenomenon was explored in last year's critically reviled 
"Whiteboys", and more explorations of the matter seem pointless. "Black 
and White" tells its viewer "to thine own self be true," but it 
glorifies a culture that would contradict the statement.

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
rated PG-13
Columbia Pictures
starring Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Will Ferrell, Bruce
McCulloch, Teri Garr, Dave Foley, Jim Breuer, Harry Shearer, Saul Rubinek
written by Andrew Fleming and Sheryl Longin
directed by Andrew Fleming
Richard Nixon, America's most controversial president, has been given
the Oliver Stone once-over, and has had Forrest Gump ruin his career,
but he has never been the subject of a comedy...until now. Andrew
Fleming's hilarious "Dick" is the contrived story of Betsy and
Arlene(Kirsten Dunst and Michelle Williams, respectively), two
dimwitted teenagers living in Washington, D.C. during the tenure of
Richard Nixon(played to comic perfection by character actor Dan
Hedaya). When the two stumble upon the Watergate scandal, the title
character offers them the job of being official White House
dog-walkers and secret youth advisors; but they're not allowed to tell
about anything that they witness while on the job. However, when they
learn that "Dick" is really a racist who hates his dog, they begin to
comply with two Washington Post reporters(Will Ferrell and Bruce
McCulloch) to help rat Nixon out of the presidency. The storyline
requires a suspension of disbelief, but the good acting and good lines
help "Dick" become quite a fun satire. The cast, peppered with SNL
alumni, is excellent, never being too serious or at all
unfunny. "Dick" is a movie about teens that adults will enjoy because
of the 70's nostalgia, and because of the many Watergate jokes that
may fly over the heads of the film's targeted younger audience. It's
too bad that "Dick" didn't rush out of the gate at the box office, but
hopefully it can find its niche through word-of-mouth.  Enjoy it, but
don't take it too seriously.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
I love L.A. Despite the traffic, L.A. is the best place to live if
you're looking for a casual lifestyle. Los Angeles has been a major
player in films from "Chinatown" to "Short Cuts", perhaps because all
the major players in film reside there; the city translated as "city
of angels"(how ironic; I guess all they all moved away). An overlooked
aspect of Albert Brooks' terrific comedy "The Muse" will be the way
Brooks' presents L.A., as a paradise-like city where you could sit
home during the day, write a bit of your new action screenplay, and
make enough so that your family could live in a Palisades estate.
"The Muse" is Woody Allen territory, both in the way the film business
is presented and in the slightly supernatural mystical
storyline. However, what "The Muse" will gain its notoriety for is for
being Sharon Stone's return to comedy(her last one was
"Irrenconcilable Differences", her first major film role) after years
of forgettable dramatic performances("Casino" being an
exception). Although her role as the title character won't recieve an
Oscar, her natural charm shines through and she is surprisingly
likable.
"The Muse" is the story of Steven Phillips(Albert Brooks), an
Oscar-nominated screenwriter who is told by his boss that he has lost
his edge. He is subsequently fired and turns to his more successful
friend(Jeff Bridges) for he advice. He tells him about Sarah(Sharon
Stone), who is a real Muse, the daughter of Zeus, who can inspire
creativity.
Steven decides to give this Muse thing a try, when he realizes that
the Muse has absolutely no concept of money. Sarah will inspire you,
but in return you must give her everything she wants. So Sarah ends up
moving in to Steven's home, and as well as subtly inspiring Steven,
she inspires Steven's wife(Andie MacDowell) into becoming the next
"Mrs. Fields".
A lot of the fun in "The Muse" comes from watching different
celebrities admit to using the Muse.  Rob Reiner thanks her for "The
American President", James Cameron thanks her for "Titanic", Martin
Scorsese thanks her for inspiring his remake of "Raging
Bull"(hopefully a joke), and Sarah claims that she did "The Truman
Show".
The only real flaw in "The Muse" is a slightly unsatisfying ending
which doesn't live up to the comic genius which preceeded it. But
Albert Brooks has created a very funny comedy that entertains at
Hollywood's expense. What could be better?
"The Muse" also proves that real inspiration can only be found within
yourself, which is something that writers of all kinds need to
learn. I, myself, have started work on a few screenplays, only to give
up after 5 or so pages. Creativity is certainly not an easy
trait. Well, at least Albert Brooks is in top form, proving that he
won't be needing a muse for a very long time.


Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
rated PG-13
Columbia Pictures
93 minutes
starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Cole and Dylan
Sprouse, Josh Mostel, Leslie Mann, Allen Covert, Rob Schneider, Kristy
Swanson, Steve Buscemi
based on the story by Steve Franks
written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler
directed by Dennis Dugan
Adam Sandler makes more money than any other 32-year-old comic on the
planet, but he also takes more slack from the critics than basically
anyone else. To him, and to his fans, it should be a breath of fresh
air when I admit that I enjoyed his latest film, "Big Daddy".
The boyish Sandler stars as Sonny Koufax, a New York City law school
graduate who's a toll booth collector while preparing to eventually
take the bar exam. His life, however, is taking a turn for the worse,
as his girfriend(Kristy Swanson) dumps him for an older man. One day,
while his roommate(Jon Stewart) is in China on business, a
child(played by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) comes to the door with a
note saying that he is Julian, the product of a one-night-stand that
Sonny's roommate had 5 years before.
Seeking a sense of responsibility that he knows he has lost, and
partly to impress his girlfriend, he decides to become the father of
the child, named Julian. He decides to give him the life that his
father never gave him; a life where the father will not give orders;
he will merely make suggestions. This way of parenting makes the two
of them very good friends. They piss on walls; they trip oncoming
skaters, and they do what basically any Adam Sandler-raised child
thinks is cool.
Julian also helps Sonny get a girl named Layla, played by Joey Lauren
Adams of "Chasing Amy" fame. She turns out to be the sister of his
roommate's girlfriend(Leslie Mann), but she is charmed by his wit and
his newfound sense of "responsibility".
The usual eclectic clan of Sandler characters is back. Rob Schneider
plays a foreign delivery boy who comes to Sonny's apartment to Indian
wrestle him; Steve Buscemi plays a homeless man who desires a Sausage
McMuffin; and Allen Covert plays Sonny's gay friend(a sign of Sandler
becoming more PC). Sandler's early films, "Billy Madison" and "Happy
Gilmore", were unashamedly dumb, but also incredibly funny. His two
latest, and more popular, films, "The Wedding Singer" and "The
Waterboy" are my two least favorite of his. "The Wedding Singer"
misfired by trying to portray Sandler as a romantic lead. "The
Waterboy" went back to his dumb roots but turned out to be quite
unfunny. "Big Daddy", however, is a step in the right direction.
"Big Daddy" has taken "Happy Gilmore" director Dennis Dugan and
successfully combined Sandler's comedic and dramatic ability. "Big
Daddy" has its share of predicability and throwaway lines(not to
mention the cheesiness factor), but it's consistently funny and
entertaining, warmhearting and accessible.
Accessibility really is Adam Sandler's whole routine. He represents
those who may not have "talent", but he is showing them(and us) that
anyone can make it big. At heart, Sandler is still a teenager obsessed
with fart jokes. As for those who have talent and still don't make it
big...
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
*DOGMA* (rated R, 125 minutes, Lions Gate Films)- "Dogma", the most
ambitious and highly anticipated film from comic auteur Kevin Smith
("Clerks", "Chasing Amy"), opens with a disclaimer.  It states that the
film, which puts a satirical spin on Catholicism, is not meant to be taken
seriously.  The disclaimer, which was recently added after many pointless
protests and death threats from Catholic radicals, contradicts what I think
Smith was trying to accomplish.  "Dogma" is more about faith than it is
about blasphemy, but how can anyone realize that if they don't take the film
seriously?  
The convoluted plot of "Dogma" involves an abortionist (Linda Fiorentino)
who finds out that she is the only remaining descendant of Jesus.  Along
with Smith regulars Jay and Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Smith himself), she
must save the world from two bad-boy angels (Matt Damon and Ben Affleck) who
plan to pass through the arches of a New Jersey church and thus negate all
existence.  Along for the wild ride are George Carlin, Salma Hayek, Jason
Lee, Alan Rickman, Chris Rock, Janeane Garofalo, who play some of the most
quirkily conceived characters I've ever seen (and yes, Alanis Morrisette
plays God).  
Once you get over just how funny "Dogma" is (it provides as many laughs as
I've had this year), you may realize that just about everything else about
the production is flawed.  Linda Fiorentino doesn't make a competent lead as
Bethany, and the Affleck/Damon pairing adds up to no more than a
distraction.  Kevin Smith wrote "Dogma" before his "Jersey Trilogy" and it
shows.  Smith, who mixes toilet humor with profound existential statements,
takes a step back into adolescence with this flick.  When compared with the
simplicity of "Clerks", or the unexpected poignance of "Chasing Amy", the
overly ambitious and overlong "Dogma" just doesn't cut it.  
It takes a couple viewings to really cut deep into "Dogma", and to realize
that its biggest surprise is an emotionally hollow center.  On the surface,
there's too much going on to absorb in one viewing, but deeper down there's
not enough emotion to fill even half of that.  In the end, "Dogma" doesn't
tell us much about the nature of belief (besides the opinion that
African-Americans are underutilized in the Bible), and the flat, cartoony
result is more like Kevin Smith's beloved pastime; a comic book.  After
watching this hilarious but overblown mess, I wanted to see something as
different as possible.  I wanted to see a Kevin Smith movie.  (now in
theatres)


Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
An older man once told me that once you get old, time seems to go by
much faster. You wouldn't think it from watching Richard
Farnsworth's character in `The Straight Story', but in one of
the film's smaller scenes, I realized something. His character,
Alvin Straight, has been driving on a lawnmower at a painfully slow
pace over about 500 miles. He asks a man for the date, and he realizes
it's been five weeks since he began his journey. That
inconsequential scene proves that life can move at a slow pace while
time speeds ahead. Sad, isn't it?
Sad is one way to describe this new film from David Lynch; odd is
another.  Compared to the films Lynch has done, there is little which
could seem odd. Except for a G-rated Walt Disney Picture,
perhaps. Like David Mamet did with `The Winslow Boy', Lynch (who
made `Blue Velvet', `The Elephant Man' and `Twin
Peaks') has ditched his unusual, edgy style for something more
refined but no less compelling.
But in `The Straight Story', Lynch takes a backseat to 79 year
old actor Richard Farnsworth.  Farnsworth, who has appeared in films
like `Misery' and `The Grey Fox', takes control of the
film in a subtle way that only the most gifted and experienced actors
can perfect. He has already garnered quite a bit of Oscar buzz.
Alvin Straight is in his seventies, and he yearns to be young
again. He lives in Laurens, Iowa with his stuttering daughter, Rose
(Sissy Spacek), and isn't in such great shape. The World War II vet
ignores health advice from his doctor, and has a diet composed
entirely of red meat.
One day, he learns that Lyle (Harry Dean Stanton), his estranged
brother, has just suffered a stroke.  He realizes that neither of them
have much time to live, and that they mst reconcile before they pass
on. He announces that he will be going to visit Lyle in
Wisconsin. Sounds reasonable enough...except for the fact that he has
decided to travel the 500 miles on his lawnmower.
Much to the delight of onlookers, Alvin begins his trek and meets a
handful of quirky characters along the way (among them; a lady who has
killed 15 deer on one highway).  Despite the G rating, `The
Straight Story' is a Lynch movie at every turn. The irony is,
depsite the quirkiness of these Lynchian characters, this film does
more justice to small town folk than any film this year.
`The Straight Story' is about a man who knows his time is almost
up, and about his final journey of freedom. `The worst part about
being old,' he says, `is thinking back to when you're
young.' Alvin Straight is trying to purify his soul.
While the film is pleasant and compelling enough, it's glacial pace
is often annoying. Some conversations seem to last a lifetime, and the
thin premise isn't enough to fill a 2 hour picture.  However, there
are some great shots of America's heartland, and it's a nice
slice of life that's suitable for the whole family. Kids may be
able to sit through it, but `The Straight Story' is adult in its
themes.
This isn't one of David Lynch's better films, but it has its own
simple pleasures. Personally, I'm not a fan of edgy directors
making G rated films, no matter what kind of violence is occuring in
today's society. If this is the way Lynch wants to make films,
that's fine, but I don't want filmmakers to feel pressured by
the ratings board to make films family-friendly. I'm such a fan of
Lynch's old stuff that I don't fell compelled to call `The
Straight Story' a refreshing change, but it is an intriguing piece
of work.
Richard Farnsworth is `The Straight Story', and deserves
recognition for his three dimensional work on Alvin
Straight. Farnsworth presents a character who sits back and chooses to
watch everything from freighters to bicycles speed by him. But he
doesn't care. Life moves slow, but time goes fast.


Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
Did I miss something? Along with the sleeper hit `The Blair Witch
Project', Mark Illsley's `Happy, Texas' was the most
talked about film at 1999's Sundance Film Festival. It was picked
up by Miramax for a hefty sum, and is now being released to critical
acclaim.  Disappointingly, the `Happy, Texas' which I saw is
nothing more than a dumb attempt at quirky humor that never finds its
footing.
Jeremy Northam and Steve Zahn portray, respectively, Harry Sawyer and
Wayne Wayne Wayne, Jr., two jailbirds who are freed when the van which
is carrying them crashes. The wanted criminals then rob an RV and head
for the nearest town, which happens to be Happy, Texas, `the town
without a frown.' Once they arrive, they are mistaken for a couple
of gay beauty pageant producers who are supposed to help the town
qualify for the statewide pageant. Fish out of water `comedy'
ensues.
Harry has his eye on the town's bank, which is run by Jo McLintock
(Ally Walker). She, like the rest of the town, believes that he is
gay, and they quickly become close friends. Harry, however, just wants
access to the bank's safe.
Meanwhile, Wayne gets stuck with the job of training the town's
girls. Along with a lady named Ms.  Schaefer (Illeana Douglas), Wayne
eventually figures out how to teach singing and dancing, through
rather unconventional methods. Soon he and Ms. Schaefer are a couple,
even though he's `gay'.
But the only sporadically funny bit of the film occurs when Harry
catches the eye of Chappy (William H. Macy), the town sheriff. Chappy,
a closeted homosexual, works up the courage to ask Harry out on a
date, and Harry reluctantly agrees. Being the typical movie small town
sheriff, Chappy is too dumb to realize that these two men are the
fugitives which he has been notified of in numerous notices.
`Happy, Texas' basically focuses on the four key relationships:
Harry and Chappy, Harry and Jo, Wayne and Ms. Schaefer, and Harry and
Wayne. Aside from the comic fireworks that William H.  Macy brings to
the proceedings, these main characters are rather dull creations.
The film, which does not live up to quirky small town gems like
`Cookie's Fortune', may have been more successful without
some unprecedented miscasting. The prospect of seeing Steve Zahn, who
has grown on me through his portrayals of stoners in `SubUrbia'
and `Out Of Sight', and Jeremy Northam, who has done fine
dramatic work in `The Winslow Boy' and `An Ideal Husband',
together in a comedy initially seemed exciting. But Northam can't
handle this type of comedy, and Zahn's characters have somehow
become similar and annoying. William H. Macy, who is almost as good
here as in `Fargo', should have been the one carrying `Happy,
Texas'.
The film has supposedly been edited since its premiere at Sundance,
and it shows. `Happy, Texas' can't be the same film that
people were raving about in Park City, because it just isn't very
good.  The screenplay, written by Ed Stone, Phil Reeves, and director
Mark Illsley just isn't very funny, and there isn't much that is
fresh or new. `Happy, Texas' is like `Some Like It Hot'
crossed with `In and Out', except with nowhere near as many
laughs or smarts as either of the two.
I guess good buzz can either be real (in the case of `The Blair
Witch Project') or way off (as in `Happy, Texas'). This
instantly forgettable trifle should be taken off Northam and Zahn's
resumes because both of them are fine actors, but `Happy, Texas'
proves that an actor is only as good as his role.


Title
Review for Among Giants (1998)
When Fox Searchlight Pictures picked up Sam Miller's AMONG GIANTS,
they were probably hoping to once again cash in on the golden touch of
Academy Award nominated British screenwriter Simon Beaufoy, who, with
THE FULL MONTY, gave the small indie company it's first megahit. What
they knew, but didn't care to realize, was that Beaufoy wrote the
AMONG GIANTS script before he wrote THE FULL MONTY.  So instead of a
sequel to the hilarious antics of the latter, we get a weak romance,
held together only by exceptional performances by the two leads, Pete
Postlethwaite and Academy Award nominee Rachel Griffiths, showing that
her vital, restrained work in HILARY AND JACKIE was no fluke.
The 50ish Postlethwaite plays Ray, a divorced man who is currently
painting power lines for money. In the working class town of
Sheffield, the main attraction is mountain climbing, which is how he
meets Gerry(Griffiths), a hitchiker who wants to see if the climbing
is really as good as advertised. The audience never learns a thing
about Gerry's past, which makes her character somewhat
two-dimensional. Anyway, the boyish Gerry ends up joining Ray's
painting crew, and the camera pans back into some beautiful shots of
the crew working on the power lines, high above the rest of the world.
>From then on, there isn't much plot except for the inevitable
accident, and we just have to sit back and let the romance between Ray
and Gerry happen. By just looking at the two, you can already deem the
romance unconventional. But there never is much going on, and
Postlethwaite is always believable no matter what his age, so the
movie basically moves along, though flimsily.
The only thing ironic about AMONG GIANTS is how the film is so weak,
but we cease to notice it because of the simple gestures of the two
lead actors. This is essentially Postlethwaite's film, and he gives a
quietly moving performance as the man who is vulnerable to love, but
Griffiths more than holds her own as the woman who just doesn't want
to commit to anything. It's also quite odd that the man who wrote this
film is the same man who wrote THE FULL MONTY, because I can't find
too many similarities except for some full frontal nudity. AMONG
GIANTS is not a bad film, but good intentions can only get you so far.
review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
rated G
Sony Pictures Classics
starring Nigel Hawthorne, Jeremy Northam, Rebecca Pidgeon, Gemma
Jones, Guy Edwards, Matthew Pidgeon, Colin Stinton
based on the play by Terence Rattigan
written and directed by David Mamet
Playwright/filmmaker David Mamet is truly a master of the literary
arts. To call him accomplished would be an understatement, for Mamet,
after scripting 23 movies(as well as numerous other plays), is beyond
accomplishment. The man has brought us projects varying from
"Glengarry Glen Ross" to "The Edge". Mamet also crafted last year's
brilliant mystery "The Spanish Prisoner". But, as we all know,
sometimes the masters have their disasters.
David Mamet's latest, "The Winslow Boy", is no disaster, but it is far
from perfect. The G-rated period piece is based on Terence Rattigan's
play about a court case involving a boy who is accused of stealing a
five-shilling postal order. I am unfamiliar with the source material,
but Mamet seems to have some trouble structuring the story into an
engrossing film.
Ronnie Winslow(Guy Edwards), the film's title character, is a
14-year-old boy who arrives home from his school bearing an expulsion
notice which tells of his theft. He lives in a large home in London
with his father, Arthur(Nigel Hawthorne), his mother, Grace(Gemma
Jones), his brother, Dickie(Matthew Pidgeon) and his sister(Rebecca
Pidgeon, Mamet's wife) who is about to be married.
Ronnie is afraid to show the notice to his father, but eventually he
is forced to. Arthur's reaction, however, is entirely unexpected. He
asks Ronnie to swear to him that he did not commit this crime, and
when Ronnie does, Arthur vows that he will "let right be done."  He
hires the distinguished Sir Robert Morton(Jeremy Northam) as an
attorney, and they take their case as far as they can.
The case of "The Winslow Boy" is criticized by reporters from the
start.  They say that the Winslows are going overboard, fighting the
legal system so viciously, but Arthur just proclaims that right must
be done.
I have to admit that I love the message of the film; that in order to
find justice, you must push the system. But it is here that the film
stumbles messily. We never get inside the courtroom, and we view the
case as outsiders. Instead of focusing on the trial itself, Mamet
focuses on the emotions of the characters, as they ponder whether or
not to drop the case altogether. While the characters are developed
rather nicely, they are simply not as interesting as the trial
itself. Therefore, "The Winslow Boy" is a meandering character drama
instead of an exciting courtroom thriller.
There is still much to admire about "The Winslow Boy". The acting is
top-notch, with Hawthorne, Northam, and R. Pidgeon standing out. David
Mamet accomplishes an interesting feat by making a G-rated feature
that has as much pizazz as many R-rated films. Mamet's previous film,
"The Spanish Prisoner", was a PG-rated thriller that offered much more
than any R-rated thriller of last year. David Mamet may very well be
the antidote to all the unnecessary on-screen violence. "The Winslow
Boy" is an intriguing project, but one that only a master can do
wrong.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Walk on the Moon, A (1999)
1969. The year has been explored numerous times, most notably(to me)
in "The Wonder Years", which is the only T.V. show that I actually
enjoy watching.  In 1969, man landed on the moon, and Woodstock hit
the world like no other musical event had before. Actor Tony(GHOST,
NIXON) Goldwyn's directorial debut, A WALK ON THE MOON, tells the
story of a family whose lives are turned upside down during the summer
of '69 in a Catskills bungalow colony.
Pearl Kantrowitz(Diane Lane) is a Jewish housewife from the city who
seems to be bored with her marriage to straightforward Marty(Liev
Schreiber). She got pregnant at 17 and forfeited her young life to
take care of her two children, Alison(Anna Paquin) and Daniel(Bobby
Boriello). She seems to want to experiment more, to be young again,
and there is no better time than the summer of '69. It is then that
the blouse salesman(Viggo Mortensen) arrives at the bungalow
colony. His name is Walker Jerome, and he is quite the hippie. He
rides around in his bus full of blouses, and soon, the married Pearl
is joining him. Pearl's psychic mother-in-law(Tovah Feldshuh) knows
about her little outings with the blouse man and urges her to stop it
for her family's sake.  Meanwhile, the teenage Alison is coping with
her first boyfriend, and her first period.  She is also going through
an experimental hippie phase, and it is not long before she catches
her mom at Woodstock with the blouse man. Pearl's mother-in-law
finally calls up her son and forces him to get up to the Catskills
immediately to try to fix up the whole mess.
There is nothing especially groundbreaking about the story or the
technique, but the story is told in such down-to-earth fashion that
you can't help feeling intrigued by the coming-of-age of Pearl and
Alison. Mortensen's Walker is never more than a caricature though, and
the story is by-the-numbers, but the film does manage to capture the
whirlwind of turmoil in the Kantrowitz family. Diane Lane is very
good, and Academy Award winner Anna Paquin gives her character as much
life as possible. All in all, Tony(grandson of Samuel) Goldwyn's A
WALK ON THE MOON doesn't offer much insight into the lively 60's, but
it does present us with a nice little slice of life that is sure to
charm most viewers. No matter how much Miramax has sold out, the
company still knows how to put out good movies year-round.
review by Akiva Gottlieb, the Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
rated R
starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jude Law, Willem Dafoe, Ian Holm, Don
McKellar, Callum Keith
Rennie, Sarah Polley, Christopher Eccleston, Willem Dafoe
written and directed by David Cronenberg
I find it a bit ironic that while THE MATRIX is racking in huge
numbers at the box office, David Cronenberg's similar, astonishing
EXISTENZ can't even crack the top 10. But even if EXISTENZ disappears
into obscurity, it is not a film that I will easily forget.
To give away too much of EXISTENZ' plot would be a sin, but I will
provide for you the initial setup. Jennifer Jason Leigh makes her big
screen return, after a 2-year hiatus(does anyone remember A THOUSAND
ACRES? I didn't think so), as Allegra Geller, who, sometime in the
near future, is the world's most distinguished virtual reality game
designer. A group of people have been gathered into a room to test her
newest adventure, called eXistenZ. The meeting turns into chaos, and
Allegra is forced to flee with her bodyguard(Jude Law).
The game of eXistenZ is not the normal virtual reality game that you
would find in stores today. In eXistenZ, you are living the game, and
at times your mind begins to lose grasp on the difference between the
game and reality. THE MATRIX made a similar point in a more
complicated way, that sometimes the lines of reality are
blurred. EXISTENZ ends up playing like an indie version of THE MATRIX
that spends more time on smarts than on violence.
While EXISTENZ is not as showy as THE MATRIX, its ending is much more
thought-provoking.  1999 is turning out to be the year that sci/fi
makes its big return. I am definitely not a sci/fi buff, but with
EXISTENZ and THE MATRIX being released even before the new STAR WARS,
this year looks to be the year of science-fiction.
EXISTENZ not only marks the return of Jennifer Jason Leigh, but it is
also the first film that David Cronenberg has made since 1996's erotic
car crash thriller(?) CRASH. The Canadian filmmaker is known for his
unique visual sense, and his ability to create new worlds.  EXISTENZ
is one of his very best films. Also, Ian Holm and Sarah Polley(both of
THE SWEET HEREAFTER) have small roles, proving that when you put those
two in a movie together, good things happen. EXISTENZ is not a perfect
film, but it will be remembered by me as one of the year's best.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Crna macka, beli macor (1998)
On the way home from a recent movie screening, a friend of mine was
telling me about the sorry state of modern cinema. I remarked that I'm
looking forward to so many different movies this autumn. He replied
that the only flick he was looking forward to was "Black Cat, White
Cat", from the director of "the all-time greatest film", "Time Of The
Gypsies".
His recommendation and the film's title intrigued me, so I rented
myself a copy of Emir Kusturica's "Gypsies". It took a while for the
film to grab me, but once it did I was mesmerized beyond belief.  The
film, about a young man who rebels against his Gypsy ways in order to
make a fortune, was both funny and powerful. Once the end credits
finished rolling, and I was still glued to my chair, Kusturica had
worked his way into the "favorite directors" section of my mind.
In 1995, Emir Kusturica won the Palme D'Or at Cannes for his overlong
epic "Underground", which told the tale of 50 war-torn years in his
native Yugoslavia. However, when he was attacked by the French press
for being not sufficiently anti-Serb, he publicly vowed to give up
filmmaking. But luckily, a couple of years later he was convinced to
embark on a documentary about Gypsy musicians, and that documentary
has turned into the fictional "Black Cat, White Cat".
Like all of Kusturica's films, this one is centered around a quirky
wedding ceremony. A man named Matko (Bajram Severdzan) has engineered
a failed train robbery, and to repay his debt to the wealthy Dadan
(Srdan Todorovic, from "Underground"), he must force his unwilling
son, Zare (Florijan Ajdini) to marry Dadan's tiny sister. The result
is the uneven, rollicking Gypsy fun that has become Kusturica's
trademark.
All his films have complicated plotlines, but the story is never the
point.  Kusturica's films are about culture, and the ironic effects it
has on our daily life. Music is always a big part of Gypsy culture,
and these tunes in "Black Cat, White Cat" do not disappoint.
Because "Black Cat, White Cat" features less drama than Kusturica's
other productions, I was expecting to be disappointed. But this film
is a spirit-lifter; one that will entertain you with its farcical
comic sensibility.
In the end, this wild party is a bit long, but I was sad to leave this
world of Gypsies, mobsters and overall quirkiness. "Black Cat, White
Cat" is a fine, joyous work, and a wonderful slice of Gypsy life. But
before you rush out to see it, rent "Time Of The Gypsies", and let me
know what you think.
note: Emir Kusturica won the Silver Lion Award for Best Director at
the 1998 Venice Film Festival.  That award is well deserved.


Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
During the making of his film-biography of jazz musician Charlie
Parker, BIRD, Clint Eastwood said that America has produced only two
original artforms. Western movies and jazz. Everyone knew that Clint
had and would continue to make his mark on the former (DIRTY HARRY,
UNFORGIVEN), and with BIRD, he unforgettably touched upon the
latter. After reflecting upon the two original American artforms, what
was Eastwood to do? After UNFORGIVEN, the quality of his work
decreased bit by bit as he decided not to take as many risks as he
once did. His latest, TRUE CRIME, doesn't offer much in the way of
originality, but it still provides the viewer with a solid, satisfying
drama.
TRUE CRIME tells the story of Steve Everett (Eastwood), a journalist
for the Oakland Tribune. Ev, as he is known to his friends, is an
unscrupulous, womanizing former drunkard who's colleague (Mary
McCormack) is killed in a car crash just moments after having a drink
with him. In the aftermath, Ev is told by his editor (Denis Leary),
with whose wife he is sleeping, that he must take his colleague's
place covering the story of a convicted murderer named Frank Beachum
(Isaiah Wasington), who is set to be executed that night. Ev's boss
(James Woods), with whose wife he also claims to be sleeping, explains
to him that this is merely a human interest story about life before
execution. But Ev finds something fishy in this case in which Beachum
was convicted of shooting a pregnant woman working a cash register in
a small market. After a meeting with Beachum and a key witness in the
trial, Ev is convinced that Beachum did not commit the murder. In the
hours leading up to Beachum's planned execution, Ev ends up losing his
job and his marriage, but never his composure.
For most of its 2-plus hour running time, TRUE CRIME is a cut above
the competition. It keeps the viewer engrossed, wanting to know every
detail about what's going on. But the last 15 minutes of the film keep
it from being the riveting thriller it wants to be. The ending of TRUE
CRIME is totally unconvincing, and makes you think that maybe this
isn't the leisurely paced drama you were watching for the past two
hours.  The film's ending happens to quickly to digest, and makes you
leave the theater unable to realize what point the film was trying to
make. Maybe part of the problem was the fact that TRUE CRIME used
three screenwriters to adapt Andrew Klavan's novel, and each writer
seems to want to take the film on a different trip. Eastwood uses
clever restraint throughout most of the film, but the ending seems to
be too much to handle.  But TRUE CRIME is a film definitely worth
seeing, especially for a great perfromance by Isaiah Washington, as an
accused man approaching death. I'm glad to see that Clint has decided
to give his own American touch to a conventional storyline, because
leaving this film in the hands of someone else would be a true crime.
review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic 
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Sean Connery, in his 68th role, plays Robert MacDougal, a well-known art
thief who matches
wits and falls for Gin Baker, an insurance agent played by Catherine
Zeta-Jones, fresh off her first
starring role in "The Mask of Zorro." The film is Jon Amiel's "Entrapment."
The comment is,
"Come on, Mr. Connery. I never thought I'd say this, but you're out of
you're league."
I'm a little tired, so I'll sum up "Entrapment's" plot rather vaguely. After
a Rembrandt is stolen from
a corporate building, Gin Baker(Zeta-Jones), an insurance agent, decides to
try to catch the
thief(Connery). Slowly, she starts to like the thief, and she ends up
playing both sides; helping him
steal, and helping to catch him.
Catherine Zeta-Jones is once again good in the heroine role she perfected in
"Zorro", but I'd like
to see her try something else(a romantic-comedy, perhaps?). Sean Connery is
also suave as ever.
But the film's plot doesn't always make sense and the movie is too glib for
its own good. Director
Jon Amiel wants "Entrapment" to a Bond-style crime caper, but the most it
provides is harmless
fun.
a (short) review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Wood, The (1999)
rated R
Paramount/MTV Films
107 minutes
starring Omar Epps, Sean Nelson, Taye Diggs, Trent Cameron, Richard T.
Jones, Duane Finley, Malinda Williams, De'aundre Bonds, Cynthia
Martells, Lisaraye, Tamala Jones
based on a story by Rick Famuyima and Todd Boyd
written and directed by Rick Famuyima
Inglewood, California, known to many of its inhabitants as "the wood",
is a small, middle-class urban community populated mostly by
African-Americans. Minutes away from the airport and (former) home of
the Los Angeles Lakers, the Wood represents L.A. like few places
can. Inglewood is also the setting for Rick Famuyima's wonderful debut
film, "The Wood". "The Wood" is the tale of three young men, Mike,
Roland and Slim, who reminisce about growing up in Inglewood, on the
day of Roland's wedding. The narrator is Mike(Omar Epps as an adult,
Sean Nelson as a teenager), a self-described peacemaker who moved to
the Wood when he was in the eighth grade. On his first day of school,
he meets Roland(Taye Diggs as an adult, Trent Cameron as a teenager)
and Slim(NFL wide-receiver Richard T. Jones as an adult, Duane Finley
as a teenager), and they instantly become friends when the naive Mike
accepts a bet in which he has to grab the "booty" of fellow classmate
Alicia(Malinda Williams), whom Mike has a crush on.
Alicia turns out to be quite a strong girl, and as well as punching
him, she gets her older brother, Stacey(De'aundre Bonds), a gang
member, to beat Mike up after school.  However, for the remainder of
the year, she takes a liking to him, and Mike reconciles with her
brother in an unconventional way. The relationship between Mike and
Alicia builds up through high school, as things become more serious.
Meanwhile, back in the present day, Roland is unable to be found and
it is up to Mike and Slim to locate him so that the wedding can
happen. They end up finding him at the house of an old flame(Tamala
Jones), drunk and wasted on the couch. The three once again think back
to when times were different, and they feel hidden sadness for the
friend that they are about to "lose".  However, the real coming-of-age
occurs as the Mike and Slim watch their friend take the first steps
towards a more stable life; steps that even he is having second
thoughts about.
Writer/director Rick Famuyima is telling the true story of his own
adolescence in the Wood, and it is another story of African-Americans
growing up in "the hood", but it doesn't involve racism or gang
warfare. USC-grad Famuyima, unlike other urban black talents such as
Spike Lee and John Singleton, chooses to give his characters a human
portrayal without resorting to violence. Rick Famuyima is a filmmaker
with a positive message.
The flashback scenes are usually more effective than the real-time
scenes, despite the latter's fine cast of actors. Sean Nelson gives an
excellent performance as young Mike, going through an "American
Pie"-like coming-of-age. Taye Diggs and Richard T. Jones also take a
backseat while Omar Epps shows a lighter side, unlike his character in
"The Mod Squad".
"The Wood" is the first MTV Film that I can actually recommend
(although "Election" was downright ambitious), helped in a large part
by its funky soundtrack. The film hasn't amounted to much at the box
office in this crowded summer, but hopefully it will find its niche
beyond its target audience. Rick Famuyima is someone to watch.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
The top rated program on television is called `Who
Wants To Be A Millionaire?' Think about it; millions
of viewers across the world tune in a couple times a
week to watch someone else try to make a million
dollars (which, sadly, isn't that much anymore). Why?
`Small Time Crooks', Woody Allen's latest charmer, is
about a money-obsessed New Yorker who realizes that
there's more to life than striving to make the big
buck. 
Playing the money-grubber is nothing new for Allen; a
filmmaker whose first movie was called `Take The Money
And Run'. In a recent discussion at UCLA, the comic
genius (who says he was a poor student) claimed that
after being denied a spot in the NYPD because of his
height, he planned to become a bank robber. However,
fate turned him into a comedian, and he decided to
live out his criminal fantasies through the language
of film. 
In `Small Time Crooks', Woody Allen is Ray Winkler, an
ex-con dishwasher who lives a stable Manhattan life
with his wife Frenchie (Tracey Ullman), a manicurist.
The only things missing from Ray's world are
excitement and lots of money. So he decides to call up
his dimwitted jail buddies (Michael Rapaport, Tony
Darrow, Jon Lovitz) and plot a bank robbery. 
The plan is to buy the flower shop next to the bank,
run a business as a false front, dig a hole under the
bank, take the money and run. Their business is a
cookie shop in which Frenchie is the only employee,
baking all the treats. Her baking is so good that the
shop soon becomes wildly popular, with patrons waiting
in line for hours just to buy one or two cookies.
Because of the store's newfound popularity, a cop
starts to notice the drilling sound that seems to
originate in the basement. When the bumbling criminals
attempt to break in to the bank, the cop catches them
and asks for a piece of the action. So the bank is
robbed, and the Winklers are millionaires. And this is
just the first segment of `Small Time Crooks'. 
In an unexpected, clever move, Woody turns the tables,
changing the film into a comic study of the newly
rich. Ray and Frenchie are now wealthy and notorious,
living a life that is beyond stable, and gradually
losing touch with their relationship. Frenchie hires a
devious, strikingly handsome Brit named David (Hugh
Grant) to give the couple lessons in affluent
citizenship, while Ray would like nothing more than an
average lifestyle in which he can eat cheeseburgers
without feeling guilty. `Small Time Crooks' is
enjoyable Allen fluff, a film that is more engaging in
its first half, but more insightful in its second.
Film critic Andrew Hicks once discussed Woody Allen's
films, saying that `he also has quite a catalogue of
low-key movies that are entertaining but not
particularly noteworthy; movies like Manhattan Murder
Mystery' that get three-star ratings in every movie
guide you check - no more, no less.' `Small Time
Crooks' is one of his aforementioned low-key movies,
and it gets three stars in my book. 
Even in his 60's, Woody Allen is the hardest working
filmmaker in America, putting out at least a film a
year. He has gained the respect of `cinephiles' and
critics all over the world (and lost the respect of
good-natured people with family values), but has never
achieved financial success. The funny thing is that
`Small Time Crooks', which I perceive to be Woody's
admittance that one can't have it all (especially at
the box office), is Allen's first film of a three-year
deal with Steven Spielberg's DreamWorks company, after
years of making his films with independent studios,
and is doing pretty good business in the U.S. 
`Small Time Crooks', while not as entertaining as
Woody's superior `Sweet and Lowdown', should be a
breath of fresh air for his fans. After a short acting
hiatus, he again casts himself in the lead role,
perfectly evoking the Manhattan nerviness, which he
portrays so well. The supporting cast, featuring the
multitalented Tracey Ullman, fares quite well, and in
the end, `Crooks' is like watching `Who Wants To Be A
Millionaire?', except its more truthful, educational,
and self-affirming. 

Title
Review for Splendor (1999)
Gregg Araki is best known as the writer/director of the `Teen
Apocalypse Trilogy'; three films (`The Living End', `The
Doom Generation' and `Nowhere') which predicted the end of
life as we know it. Araki, who usually lets his style undermine his
substance, quietly triumphs with `Splendor', an upbeat,
sparkling comedy about a woman trying to make her menage a trois
relationship work.
The plotline and mood of `Splendor' are a refreshing change from
the over the top nihilism of Araki's first few films, but it still
features his best asset: his colorful, inventive portrayal of Los
Angeles in the not too distant future.
Kathleen Robertson, a former `Beverly Hills, 90210' beauty who
was discovered by Araki for `Nowhere', plays the twenty-ish
Veronica with a perfect mixture of sweetness, vulnerability and
confidence. One Halloween night, she meets Abel (Johnathon Schaech), a
fun music critic, and Zed (Matt Keeslar), a sexy, dimwitted drummer.
Veronica begins to date both simultaneously, and is attracted to each
of them equally. She decides that it would be a good idea to let them
know the situation, and a metaphorical boxing match ensues.  But
slowly, through their love for Veronica, they relinquish their
selfishness and share her. Before long, both have moved in, and are
sharing a bed.
Meanwhile, Veronica, also a starving actress, lands a role in a
terrible TV movie, and the director, Ernest (Eric Mabius), starts to
put the moves on her. Veronica has no real feelings for him, but she
realizes that she craves financial stability. The next day, she learns
of her pregnancy, and she thinks about giving her child the life she
never had. Abel and Zed, who are each penniless, aren't too
surprised when she leaves them for Ernest. But conscience creeps up on
her, and she has to decide between a life of luxury and stability and
one of love and spontaneity.
Kathleen Robertson is amazing! As the lead character, she almost
singlehandedly carries the film, and evokes the splendor of the
title. Schaech and Keeslar are around mostly to look good and act
dumb, but they manage to make their characters quite charming.
Gregg Araki doesn't go for too much with this film, which is a
welcome relief and helps `Splendor' shine. His screenplay is
snappy, though not as good as James Toback's similarly themed
`Two Girls And A Guy'. `Splendor' is slight, instead of
edgy, and that making it quite a pleasant diversion.
`Splendor' has a brighter outlook on life than Araki's
previous work, which is surprising since it is his last film before
the new millennium. The quirky assurance that a three person
relationship could work may make this a hit with the indie crowd.
Araki has a knack for finding talented young actors. Famous faces such
as Ryan Phillippe, Heather Graham, Rose McGowan, Christina Applegate
and Mena Suvari all owe much to Araki's clever casting. His highly
entertaining, offbeat and emotionally hollow `Nowhere', for
example, features one of the best teenage casts I've ever seen.
Gregg Araki may be veering towards the mainstream, but
`Splendor' is his most accomplished work to date. More so, it is
the film that establishes Kathleen Robertson as a performer to watch.


Title
Review for Comedian Harmonists (1997)
rated R
starring Ulrich Noethen, Ben Becker, Meret Becker, Heino Ferch, Heinrich
Schafmeister, Max Tidof, Kai Wiesinger
in German with English subtitles
written by Klaus Richter and Jurgen Egger
based on the story by Jurgen Buscher
directed by Joseph Vilsmaier
We are now still at the beginning of a year packed full of films, and
we already have our first Holocaust comedy. That is what some people
will say after a first glance at Joseph Vilsmaier's wonderful THE
HARMONISTS, but actually they will find little to be offended by. THE
HARMONISTS, unlike the wildly popular Oscar winner LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL,
is a true story that just happens to occur during an untimely era. THE
HARMONISTS is the more than slightly fictionalized story of the rise
and fall of the Comedian Harmonists, a group that was so popular
worldwide(especially in Europe) that one member was quoted as saying
that they could have been as famous as the Beatles...had they not
broken up.
Yes, the story of the Comedian Harmonists is not an easy one to
tell. It starts with the dreams of a young Jewish man named Harry
Frommermann(Ulrich Noethen, who looks unmistakably like Roberto
Benigni) living in Berlin circa 1927. He is a talented musician, but
he is also a poor man who does not have money to even feed his
bird. He then posts a newspaper ad that says he wants to start a
singing group. The first lock for the group is a monk named Bob
Biberti, and the next 4 singers come rolling along. The 6 begin having
vigorous rehearsals in order to get everything perfect. Then, of
course, there are the cliches of members threatening to leave because
the group isn't any good, etc. And Harry soons begin to realize that
Erna, the girl of his dreams, has taken a liking to Bob, and
eventually moves in with him. But the real twist begins when slowly
the members of the group, 3 Jewish and 3 gentile, begin to realize the
overwhelming anti-semitism in Germany. Soon, it comes to the point
when they are being threatened to no longer be allowed to perform
together, by the same people who are supposed to be their fans.
THE HARMONISTS works very well for the most part, telling an
interesting story and getting great performances from all the
leads. The songs are also all very catchy and well done. Sometimes,
the film's subplots threaten to take away from the story, but the
characters are always interesting enough to follow. It is obvious that
THE HARMONISTS has taken the liberty of changing a few things from the
actual story, but it's hard to care since the film is so vividly
engrossing. THE HARMONISTS is made by Miramax, which is having a lot
of luck with it's other two foreign films, the similar LIFE IS
BEAUTIFUL and CHILDREN OF HEAVEN. I must say once again that Miramax
is still putting out better movies than any movie studio on the
planet.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
You know John Malkovich. He's the darkly compelling actor with
awkward features who graced the screen in films such as `Dangerous
Liaisons', `Of Mice And Men' and `In The Line Of Fire'.
Few would deny that he is one of America's most underappreciated
actors, yet even fewer would think him a good subject for a fictional
feature film. However, with the weird and wildly original `Being
John Malkovich', director Spike (`You Mean The Little Cubes You
Put In Hot Water To Make Soup?') Jonze and writer Charlie Kaufman
have proven to be part of that minority.
The word quirky doesn't even begin to describe the eccentricity
that is `Being John Malkovich'.  John Cusack plays Craig
Schwartz, an unemployed puppeteer who, after being urged by his homely
wife, Lottie (Cameron Diaz), gets a job as a filing clerk at a company
called LesterCorp.
You see, LesterCorp. is on the 7 1/2 floor of an office building in
New York City, which means that you can't stand up in your office,
and that it takes some precise planning to get there by elevator. On
the 7 1/2 floor, he meets Maxine (Catherine Keener), a beautiful woman
who isn't interested in him.  On the 7 1/2 floor, he meets Lester
(Orson Bean), his boss who claims to be over 100 years old.  And on
the 7 1/2 floor, he finds a portal that allows you to spend 15 minutes
in John Malkovich's brain before ejecting you into a ditch on the
New Jersey Turnpike. No joke.
`Being John Malkovich' may sound weird so far, but believe me,
things do get weirder. The `love triangle' involving Craig,
Lottie, Maxine and John Malkovich is perhaps the oddest relationship
ever put to film. And yes, Cameron Diaz does get locked up in a cage
with a monkey and scream `you're ruining my actualization as a
man!'
John Malkovich is a wonder. As himself, he gives one of his edgiest
performances to date, and certainly his most accurate. In the film, we
see a self deprecating Malkovich reading the Wall Street Journal,
notifying a cab driver that he never played an art thief, and trying
to seduce an obsessed fan.
Director Spike Jonze, who directed the video for Weezer's `Buddy
Holly' as well as starring in `Three Kings', has come out of
nowhere to help create the year's most original comedy. With a taut
and clever script by Charlie Kaufman, and a uniformly excellent
ensemble cast, `Being John Malkovich' stands out as a distinct
work of modern art.
It's hard to write a coherent review about a film this
dazzling. `Being John Malkovich' is a mind boggling head trip
that proves that independent spirit still exists in the world of
mainstream filmmaking. Without giving away anything more about it, let
me say that this film is truly one to seek out. A dark comedy classic.


Title
Review for Steal This Movie (2000)
Despite the best efforts of campaigns like Rock The
Vote, most of today's 18+ youth demographic choose not
to vote in presidential elections.  Who can blame
them?  Since the demise of the hippies in the 1970's,
anarchists have become less and less visible, and
youths are, for the most part, disillusioned from the
future of their country.  A film like Steal This
Movie, however, is inspirational enough to make youths
politically aware, proving that protest can be a means
to make change.
Steal This Movie retells the true story of Abbie
Hoffman (Vincent D'Onofrio), the outspoken anti-war
revolutionary who took to the streets and helped shape
the bustling American "make love not war"
counterculture of the late 1960's.  Hoffman had a true
passion for social justice.
We first meet Abbie in the late 1970's.  He has been
hiding (for reasons that are later disclosed) from the
government for many years, but is allowing a
journalist to interview him about his life as an
activist.  Through a series of flashbacks, a light is
shone on one of America's most outspoken historical
figures.
Steal This Movie focuses mainly on two aspects of
Hoffman's life.  The first is the infamous riot at the
Chicago Democratic Convention and the trial that
followed.  Hoffman was a member of the "Chicago 8",
along with men like Jerry Rubin (Kevin Corrigan) and
Tom Hayden (Troy Garity, Hayden's son).  Some have
referred to it as the true "trial of the century."
The film is also about Hoffman's relationship with his
wife, Anita (Janeane Garofalo), and the interesting
predicament they find themselves in when Abbie is
forced to go into hiding.  Anita stays unbelievably
faithful to her husband, even after he moves in with a
new girlfriend (Jeanne Tripplehorn).
In many ways, Steal This Movie is hampered by a low
budget.  In a few opening scenes, a boom mic is
clearly visible at the top of the screen, and often
the flashback scenes seem a bit awkward because of the
lack of period detail.  But the real Anita Hoffman
told director Robert Greenwald that a truthful film
about her husband couldn't be made under the studio
system, and after watching this compelling, inspiring
biopic, it's hard not to agree.
Steal This Movie is being released in Los Angeles a
day after the 2000 Democratic Convention.  This is
unfortunate, because, had the film been released a
couple weeks earlier, I think we'd see a few more
rebels eager to take to the streets and fight for a
cause. 
-Akiva Gottlieb 
http://www.pictureshow.8m.com

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
rated PG-13
starring Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley, Clint Howard, Adam Goldberg
written by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel
based on the screenplay for LOUIS 19, LE ROI DES ONDES by Emile
Gaudreault and Sylvie Bouchard
directed by Ron Howard
Would you ever want a camera crew following you around 24 hours a day,
filming everything you do? If you gave any thought at all to it, my
guess is you'd say no. But Ed Kearney (Matthew McConaughey) in Ron
Howard's comedy EDtv doesn't give that much thought to anything.
Ed is a thirtysomething video store clerk who gets pushed into the
national spotlight when he agrees to star in a show called TrueTV, in
which a film crew would follow him around 24 hours a day. His brother,
Ray (Woody Harrelson, who could pass for McConaughey's brother in real
life), loves the idea because he can get free publicity for his new
gym. Ray's girlfriend Shari (a very good Jenna Elfman) finds out that
Ray is cheating on her when Ed and his cameras go to visit him, and
she realizes that it was Ed she wanted all along. But camera-shy Shari
can't stand all the attention she's getting and comes across as a
bitch on the show (according to 71% of USA Today readers).  Along with
Ed, we also find out hidden secrets about his family. And when Shari
ditches Ed and the cameras and moves away, the dimwitted Ed realizes
that the show has turned his life into a claustrophobic mess. One show
executive (Ellen DeGeneres) decides then to give the show some
excitement by sending out a woman (Elizabeth Hurley) to seduce Ed. By
then, Ed is a national phenomenon, and a few thousand people wait
outside the woman's apartment to cheer Ed on. When the night turns
into a mess, Ed finally confronts head studio executive (Rob Reiner)
and demands to be set free. But then the executive reminds him of the
contract he signed that says that he can be filmed for as long as the
studio would like to film him. Then the film takes a funny satirical
twist as Ed tries to get his simple life back to normal.
EDtv is not nearly as significant as the film that it will be compared
to time and time again, THE TRUMAN SHOW. In the few times that I saw
THE TRUMAN SHOW, I actually dismissed it as another overrated
Hollywood attempt at greatness.  But EDtv actually made me see what
made THE TRUMAN SHOW so special. It had a social significance and
portrayed Truman's world so satirically well. I'm not saying, though,
that EDtv is a bad movie. Infact, I may have enjoyed it more than THE
TRUMAN SHOW. It is funny, smart and entertaining, and it doesn't leave
as many unanswered questions as THE TRUMAN SHOW. But sometimes the
film gets lost, often forgetting what it's there to do. To prove (like
THE TRUMAN SHOW) that television, above all, is just a bunch of crap.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Metroland (1997)
"You should be able to have affairs. It will be good for our
marriage. And don't worry, I'll still do your laundry and wash the
dishes." In Philip Saville's METROLAND, those are the lines spoken to
Chris(Christian Bale), by his wife Marion(Emily Watson), in a
recurring dream of his.
Chris and Marion live in 1970's Eastwood, a small town in England in
an area dubbed Metroland.  They are young, married and have a small
child. One early morning, Chris recieves an unexpected phone call from
a rebellious, despicable old friend named Toni(Lee Ross).  Toni
invites himself over for lunch, and he seems amazed at the change that
Chris has gone through.  "You're living your parents' life," he tells
Chris. It is then that Chris remembers the past through flashbacks.
It turns out that Chris lived in the Metroland area as a child, only
to leave to Paris to further his career in photography. While working
at a diner, he meets Annick(Elsa Zylberstein), a beautiful young
French woman(who speaks English) and begins a lusty, sex-filled
relationship with her. But while taking photos in the park, he meets
Marion for the first time, and begins seeing her often(but just as
friends). But when Chris lets Annick know about Marion, his
woman-friend, she freaks out and moves out, and Chris and Marion take
their relationship to the next level.
But as the film skips back to the present, we see how Toni is pushing
Chris to be a wild child again and cheat on his wife. But Chris is a
very trustworthy man, and monogamy is one thing that he is very
careful about. The marital dilemmas between Chris and Marion are the
core of METROLAND, and the best thing about it. Chris is conflicted
whether his stable life in Metroland makes him happy, or merely
content.
For the most part, METROLAND is a slow, weak film, saved only by
occasional good dialogue and acting. But as Chris and Marion's
marriage is questioned, the film becomes much more fascinating,
perhaps because of Bale and Watson. Those expecting to see a lot of
the great Emily Watson will be disappointed, but METROLAND gives her a
chance to restrain herself, as she plays a character not nearly as
animated as her previous ones. VELVET GOLDMINE's Bale similarly holds
his own, but one can only leave METROLAND wishing someone had given
both actors a better movie. Nonetheless, some parts of METROLAND are
better than others, but don't expect another Oscar nomination for
Watson; at least not yet.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Hideous Kinky (1998)
Congratulations to Kate Winslet for defying the odds, by choosing to
play the lead role in the small, but beautiful HIDEOUS KINKY as a
follow-up to her Oscar nominated turn in TITANIC, the highest grossing
and most expensive film of all time. But was this really such a
surprise? Not at all, once you look at the wide range of films that
the British actress appeared in before TITANIC. She showed incredible
talent at a young age in such films as JUDE, HEAVENLY CREATURES and
SENSE AND SENSIBILITY(for which she recieved her first Oscar
nomination).  Her latest, HIDEOUS KINKY, is an exotic odyssey that is
much more than a star vehicle.
HIDEOUS KINKY is not a plot driven movie, but it tells the tale of a
hippie named Julia(Kate Winslet) who has brought her two young
girls(Bella Riza and Carrie Mullan) to Morocco to find peace, love,
and faith in the early 70's. While in London, the children's father
thrives as a poet, Julia has no money.
It is then that she meets Bilal(Said Taghmaoui), a Moroccan ex-con who
is hiding from his past. He wins the affection of Julia and her
children and he becomes like a father to them. Bilal seems to be a
nice man, but he often vanishes at times when he is needed.
For all the wonder of HIDEOUS KINKY, the real pleasure comes from
watching the two little girls onscreen. They both run around screaming
wild phrases like "hideous kinky!"  and each character is a presence
on her own. It is rare for children to dominate a film, especially
when matched up against Kate Winslet, who gives one of her better
performances.
HIDEOUS KINKY reminded me a little of this year's A WALK ON THE MOON,
because both are similar tales of a woman trying to find herself
during the same time period. HIDEOUS KINKY's wondrous soundtrack
combines Moroccan music with 60's hits, and John de Borman's luscious
cinematography makes the film what it is.
Director Gillies MacKinnon(REGENERATION, A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE) has
crafted a spritual gem, scripted by brother Billy. MacKinnon lets Kate
Winslet show depth unseen in TITANIC, and he shows a talent for
working with young actors. As for the film's title; it's a bit
misleading, and I still haven't figured out what it means. But HIDEOUS
KINKY is an independent film that takes us to places we've never been.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST 


Title
Review for Payback (1999)
rated R
starring Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, Deborah Unger
written by Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes
based on the novel "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake(as Richard Stark)
directed by Brian Helgeland
In the past decade, filmmakers have decided that people want to see
movies that look "cool". And who could blame them? In today's society,
it's all about what's cool and what's not. For a long time, Mel Gibson
has been the poster boy of "cool".  So those executives down at
Paramount probably decided that they should take Mel Gibson and revive
a character known to many readers of crime fiction; a character named
Parker, from the bestselling series by Donald E. Westlake, and make it
into an early '99 movie.  And if that wasn't cool enough, they took
Academy Award winner Brian Helgeland, writer of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL(and,
sadly, CONSPIRACY THEORY) and asked him to direct his first feature
film. And then, just for the "cool" shock value, they decided to load
it up with gruesome action violence(including a scene where a
character's nosering gets ripped out), "cool" faux-Elmore Leonard
dialogue, and dark, silvery lighting. But in the midst of all this
coolness, there was the actual movie. And it's a shame to say that it
is not nearly the sum of its parts.
For one thing Mel Gibson's Porter character is mean, mean, and
mean. The film's tagline, "Get Ready to Root For the Bad Guy" isn't
even the half of it. The loose storyline is that Porter and his former
partner Val(Gregg Henry) worked on a heist in which they got $140,000
to share. Val then double-crosses Porter, and runs off with the cash
and his junkie wife(Deborah Unger), who ends up shooting him. After
"surgery", Porter is out to seek his 70,000 bucks, and he will waste
no time in butchering anyone who doesn't give him what he wants. The
people behind this movie probably thought that Porter was so "cool",
that they forgot that they're not the ones who're gonna be paying to
see the movie. I mean, are we supposed to like this guy? First-time
director Brian Helgeland slums once again with this lowly crime
thriller. Even comic turns from Kris Kristofferson and James Coburn
cannot keep PAYBACK from being nothing more than trash.  Every once in
a while there is a good line, but if you want to see a much better
better version of the same novel, see John Boorman's POINT
BLANK. Throughout PAYBACK, I couldn't help but think of OUT OF SIGHT,
far better and more richly styled than anything in this Mel Gibson
vehicle. I think audiences deserve a movie that earns its coolness.


Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
starring Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Molly
Shannon, John C.  Reilly, Leelee Sobieski
>From E.T. to THE WEDDING SINGER, Drew Barrymore always seems to
shine. That is probably the main reason why she was chosen to play the
lead role in Raja Gosnell's NEVER BEEN KISSED. Barrymore turns in a
fine comic performance and steals the show from a spectacular
supporting cast, proving that she deserves to play the protagonist
more often. It's too bad that Abby Kohn and Marc Silverstein couldn't
give her a better script to work with, because NEVER BEEN KISSED ends
up playing out as nothing more than contrived fun
Barrymore plays Josie Geller, a copy editor for the Chicago Sun-Times
who is picked to do her first piece as a reporter. She must go back to
high school and write a story about any specific problem she finds
within it. But her brother, Rob(David Arquette), reminds her of just
how bad her high school years were. She wore huge braces, never washed
her hair, was asked out to the prom as a joke, and was called "Josie
Grossie."  But she still decides to give high school a second
shot. But instead of hanging out with the kids who cause trouble worth
writing about, she befriends a nerdy mathematician(Leelee Sobieski)
and crushes on her English teacher(Michael Vartan).  When her
boss(John C. Reilly) demands that she somehow become popular so that
she can get her story, her brother enrolls in the school, becomes
popular in a day, and starts to hint to people that Josie does have a
cooler side.
NEVER BEEN KISSED has some very funny scenes(the prom theme is "Great
Couples in History" and two people dress up as the Doctor and Gonzo
from FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS), but the story seems forced, as
if a Fox executive demanded that the writers find some way to combine
Drew Barrymore with high school, so that everyone in the world will
want to see it. As I wrote earlier, Barrymore makes a great leading
lady, and makes it seem that the top-notch supporting cast was wasted.
But even a charming Drew can't change the fact that NEVER BEEN KISSED
is predictable and insignificant. But if you end up seeing the film,
stay for the credits, where every actor and crew member's high school
photo is shown.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
In the next book written about cinematic voyeurism, a chapter must be
dedicated to the most sickeningly self-indulgent plot point of them
all: meet your character on the worst day of his life. With `Wonder
Boys', writer Steve Kloves (`Fabulous Baker Boys') and
director Curtis Hanson (`L.A. Confidential') have used the
infamous setup as a platform for an offbeat, entertaining film that
features a wonderfully deadpan comic tone.
Our protagonist, Grady Tripp (Michael Douglas), is a drug-addled
Pittsburgh writing professor with a lot on his mind. Firstly,
there's his love life. His wife has just left him, and his affair
with the school chancellor (Frances McDormand) has turned into an
unwanted pregnancy. Now he finds himself pressured into the hardest
act for a middle-aged man: commitment.
Then, there's his literary life. It's been seven years since
Grady's masterpiece `The Arsonist's Daughter', and he
hasn't written a novel since. This turns out to be a crucial
problem since Grady's literary editor, the smarmy homosexual Terry
Crabtree (Robert Downey, Jr.), is in town for the university's
annual Word Fest. As we soon learn, Grady has used these past seven
years to work on an untitled, 2000+ page magnum opus, which involves
`horse genealogies' and `dental records' In other words,
things can't get much worse for Prof. Grady Tripp.
That evening, Prof. Tripp attends the Word Fest opening reception,
held at the home of Sara Gaskell, the aforementioned pregnant
chancellor. While the professor snoops upstairs, he is attacked by the
Gaskell's beloved blind dog, who is then shot to death by James
Leer (Tobey Maguire), a bizarre student of Prof. Tripp. A few minutes
later, Grady and James are fleeing the scene in a car with a dead dog
and a transvestite's tuba (don't ask).
Like `American Beauty', `Wonder Boys' is a black comedy
about a mid-life crisis, and the success of this kind of film often
rides on the viewer's belief in the protagonist's
suffering. Michael Douglas' role in the film is as difficult as
Kevin Spacey's role in the superb `Beauty'. Douglas'
character is so apathetic to suffering that, on paper, a few of his
responses would be truly unbelievable. But Douglas brings such soul to
the role that he makes Grady Tripp come alive; turning us on to his
character without adding sentiment. In `Wonder Boys', Michael
Douglas gives a performance that is likable and genuine, and in a
perfect world, where even February films could compete for the Oscars
(imagine that), he would be in the running for an acting award. After
years of playing nothing but slimy rich guys, Douglas has finally come
into his own.
`Wonder Boys' also features a superb supporting cast which
includes Katie Holmes (`Teaching Mrs. Tingle'), Academy Award
Winner Frances McDormand (`Fargo') and the incarcerated but
unstoppable Robert Downey Jr. (`Less Than Zero'). However, the
kudos must go to Tobey Maguire (young star of `The Cider House
Rules' and `Pleasantville'), who showcases some nice
chemistry with Michael Douglas.
Curtis Hanson's `Wonder Boys' is a worthy follow up to his
classic corrupt cop saga `L.A. Confidential'. The two films
couldn't be more different in tone and manner, yet Hanson's
swift hand gives each its own distinct flavor. Cinematographer Dante
Spinotti, who also worked on `L.A. Confidential' (as well as
`The Insider'), sometimes uses a hand-held camera, which gives
the picture a life-like quality. Bob Dylan has also recorded a new
song for the film; his first new music since his Grammy winning
`Time Out Of Mind' album.
`Wonder Boys' is, of course, not without its flaws. The dialogue
is often bogged down by intrusive voice-over narration, and a couple
awkward scenes towards the end fall flat. Also, the interesting title
is never explained, and I believe it was lost in the translation from
book to film.
But `Wonder Boys' real problem has nothing to do with the
film itself. It is Paramount's marketing strategy, which has been
noticeably weak for such a strong film. The poster and trailer are
each dull as dirt, not giving a clue as to what the film is about. So
`Wonder Boys', a well-written film about writers, will have to
get by on the sheer power of word-of-mouth. See `Wonder Boys',
enjoy it, pass it on.
B+ Akiva Gottlieb Critical66@yahoo.com http://pictureshow.8m.com

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
In Michael Corrente's "Outside Providence", the first image we see is
that of a boy on his bicycle.  Behind him, tied to his bike with a
rope, is a kid in a wheelchair, throwing newspapers to people's
houses. Tied to the wheelchair is a three-legged dog, limping for his
life.  We've seen this picture before, now haven't we? If "we" have
seen a film by Peter and Bobby Farrelly, then yes, we have.
But then again, the Farrelly brothers' three films("Dumb And Dumber",
"Kingpin" and "There's Something About Mary") all had something going
for them. A hilarious sense of humor and an aura of
unpredictabililty. "Outside Providence", which is based on the
"semi-autobiography" of Peter Farrelly, shares neither of these two
qualities, and doesn't have much to offer.
Peter Farrelly's alias in the film is Tim Dunphy(Shawn Hatosy), a
teenager who lives in 1970's Pawtucket, Rhode Island with his
wheelchair-bound little brother and his alcoholic, aggressive
father(Alec Baldwin), who refers to Tim as "Dildo". Tim lives a
somewhat bored existence in Pawtucket, where he spends his time going
to parties and getting high with his friends. However, when he
accidentally crashes into a parked police car, he is given no choice
but to spend his senior year at Cornwall Academy, a strict co-ed
private high school.
Tim makes a few new friends, and manages to break just about every
rule the school has. But it isn't until he meets Jane Weston(Amy
Smart), the best-looking and perhaps smartest girl in school, that he
begins let go and just try to have fun. And of course, through Jane,
Tim learns about real love, and starts to do better in school.
"Outside Providence" also relies on a small subplot which has Old Man
Dunphy(Alec Baldwin) and some of his buddies sitting around playing
cards. In one particular scene, a guy named Joey(George Wendt) admits
to being gay, and the guys kick him out of the house. This scene and
another awful subplot involving Tim's dead mother make up the dramatic
core of the film, which is not good news.
Not only is "Outside Providence" a story we seem to have seen before,
it is also a very poorly made film. It's predictable, corny, unfunny
and gratuitous. Why do I have a good feeling that the Farrelly
brothers were forced into adding a three-legged dog and a barfing
scene?  Maybe because I took a look at Miramax's marketing push behind
the movie.
The acting isn't very good either. Shawn Hatosy and Amy Smart are
one-dimensional as the leads, and even a "different" performance by
Alec Baldwin, who surprisingly takes a supporting role here, is only
marginally good. "Outside Providence", the book by Peter Farrelly, was
blasted by critics, so it doesn't surprise me that the Farrelly
brothers would be the ones adapting it for the screen.
Being a Farrelly Brothers movie, the movie obviously has some fun
scenes, but the film as a whole feels pointless, and without
direction, thanks in a large part to first-time director Michael
Corrente.  Miramax Films has made some very smart moves in the past
few years, and financing this piece of recycled trash was not one of
them.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com
this review is also featured at http://jump.to/moviepage 


Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
I am a movie critic; that much is obvious. But moreso, I consider
myself a movie lover.  Sometimes, in an awful movie, my friends will
beg me to leave the theatre halfway through the film. But I always
stay, hoping that a good ending can save the otherwise horrible
movie. But two-thirds of the way through the painfully bad The Mummy,
I realized there was no hope, and my more-than-willing friend and I
left the theatre then and there.
We walked through the campus of UCLA at midnight, and talked to the
fans waiting in line to get tickets to the new "Star Wars" movie. We
watched "L.A. Confidential" with them and waited for a cab. When we
got in the cab, the driver asked, "So, what did you do tonight?"  "We
saw a bad movie," I answered.  "The Mummy?" he asked. He explained
that the night before he had driven home people who felt as if they
witnessed a disaster by watching the movie. Enough said.
Brendan Fraser, whom I was just beginning to like, stars as Rick
O'Connell, a foreign soldier fighting in 1920's Egypt. He is fighting
for the lost city of Hammenabtra, known as the city of the dead. Many
years before, a man (Arnold Vosloo) had been mummified with a powerful
curse that would infect anyone who came into contact with him.
Anyway, Rick, a librarian named Evelyn (Rachel Weisz), and her
brother (John Hannah), go back to Hammenabtra to find ancient artifacts
worth millions. What they end up doing is waking the mummy, and trying
to stop him.
Going through all the problems of The Mummy would waste a lot of
precious time, so I'll just point out something that really pissed me
off. Director Stephen Sommers (Deep Rising) calls his film a "sweeping,
desert epic", and he is so visually derivative of The English Patient
in a couple scenes that I almost wanted to scream. If only Sommers
could have made his plot and characters a litle bit more like the
characters in The English Patient...
Universal Pictures is supposedly in need of a hit after notable flops
like Babe: Pig In The City, Meet Joe Black, and EdTV, but I think that
bad word of mouth will cut The Mummy off after a large opening
weekend. The film should do little to hamper Brendan Fraser's rising
stardom, but I'd like to see him choose more good roles like Gods and
Monsters or School Ties.
I feel as if I've wasted to much time on this review when I only need
to prove one point: The Mummy is crap on a reel.


Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
It may take a second viewing to see if `Fight Club' makes any
sense at all, but first-time writer Jim Uhls (adapting Chuck
Palahniuk's novel) has fashioned a sardonic, darkly funny script,
and David Fincher keeps the film involving at every turn.
Another reason why `Fight Club' works so well is the forceful
performance of Edward Norton. He first caught the public's eye as a
schizophrenic choirboy in `Primal Fear', and garnered his second
Oscar nomination last year for the powerful `American History
X'. Norton can carry a film with the best of them, and `Fight
Club' might just make him a star.
Brad Pitt is charismatic in as Tyler, showing that he belongs in
Fincher's films (he starred in `Seven') rather than in
melodramatic trash like `Seven Years In Tibet' and `Meet Joe
Black'. Helena (`Wings Of The Dove') Bonham Carter's
faux-American accent wasn't believable, but the choice to cast her
was an interesting one.
The opinions on `Fight Club' will differ from person to person,
but my conclusion is that the film is an unsettling, freakish
experience, but it will reward those who choose to accept it. It'll
be interesting to watch `Fight Club' in 30 years and see how it
stands the test of time, because it brings up issues that may be
important sooner than we think. To quote the tagline for this
year's `Minus Man', `conversation usually follows.'


Title
Review for Amantes del Círculo Polar, Los (1998)
rated R
Fine Line Features
in Spanish with English subtitles
starring Najwa Nimri, Fele Martinez, Nacho Novo, Maru Valdivieso, Kristel
Diaz, Victor Hugo Oliveira, Sara Valiente, Peru Medem, Jaroslav Bielski, 
Rosa Morales
written and directed by Julio Medem
Julio Medem's poignant, unconventional "Lovers Of The Arctic Circle"
is a film that shows the viewer the earthshaking power of destiny. The
film stars Najwa Nimri and Fele Martinez(both of whom starred in this
year's other Spanish import "Open Your Eyes") as Ana and Otto, two
people with palindromic names who are destined to be lovers. We learn
of their destinies through a series of coincidences; coincidences that
Ana says, through voice-over, make up her entire life.
When Ana meets Otto, her father has just died, and she believes that
his soul has crossed over to this boy. Fate then works in mysterious
ways, making her mom and Otto's dad fall in love. While she is still a
child, she only looks up to Otto in a paternal way.
Otto, however, is love-stricken from the first time he sees Ana. His
parents have just gotten a divorce and he is going through problems of
his own. Otto and Ana bond together in their time of loss, creating a
kinship based on empathy.
As they become teenagers, their relationship becomes sexual, and they
must try to hide their affairs from their very naive parents. As they
get older, though, they begin to drift apart. The inevitable tragedy,
foreshadowed in the film's first scene, draws nearer.
Writer/director Julio Medem crafts a highly poetic love story; one
that spans the circle of life.  "Lovers Of The Arctic Circle" gives an
entirely new spin on the age-old tale of tragic romance.  The camera
work is wondrous and the characters are vivid. "Lovers Of The Arctic
Circle" gets my full recommendation.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Some movies, while not totally bad, just piss me off. Roger Kumble's lame
excuse for a drama CRUEL INTENTIONS fits perfectly into this category.
Loosely based on the famous novel "Les Liaisons Dangereuses", "Intentions"
tells the story of Sebastian and Kathryn Valmont, two wealthy New York
step-siblings who are the cause of lots of damage. Sebastian(Ryan Phillippe)
has a reputation of promising women the world to get them in bed, and then
dumping them. Kathryn(Sarah Michelle Gellar), equally evil but more
inconspicuous, is also manipulative, in the way that she helps out with
Sebastian's games. In the first of many plot contrivations, Kathryn bets her
brother that he cannot devirginize Annette(Reese Witherspoon, Phillippe's
real-life girlfriend), daughter of their new school headmaster and
self-proclaimed virgin till marriage. If Kathryn wins, then she gets
Sebastian's car, and if Sebastian wins, he gets to bed Kathryn, the one
woman whom he supposedly can't have. Well, anyway, although Sebastian is
cruel to the fullest sense of the word, Annette can't help but fall for him.
I mean, damn, this guy is manipulative! From that point the film just spins
way out of control, juggling a subplot featuring a teenager(Selma Blair)
also getting involved in their schemes. The movie then goes for cheap
melodrama and any cliche it can think of. None of the film's characters are
at all real, and none of them make any decisions that a normal human would
make. Although many sexual cliches are added in just so that teens will have
a little fun, this film is another case where the trailer is more fun than
the movie. I mean, with a cast like this, the producers did not need to make
a good film in order to ensure that every teenager in the world will see it.
But I wish they at least tried.


Title
Review for Bacheha-Ye aseman (1997)
Please post the following review to the newsgroup.
rated PG
in Persian with English subtitles
starring Mohammad Amir Naji, Fereshte Sarabandi, Karnal Mirkarimi
written and directed by Majid Majidi
Once in a very long while, a film comes along that doesn't need an
epic story in order to grasp the viewer and tell a simple story in an
epic way. Majid Majidi's CHILDREN OF HEAVEN is such a film. Over the
years, Iranian directors have shown skill in telling a simple but
subtle BICYCLE THIEFesque story. The reason for this is that in a
country like Iran, where there is no freedom of speech, you cannot
degrade the country in any way, especially on film. So the filmmakers
had to be able to express art with subtlety, as to not generate
controversy.
CHILDREN OF HEAVEN tells the story of a small, impoverished Iranian
boy who goes to the marketplace and gets his sister's shoes stolen by
accident. The boy promises his sister that she will get the shoes
back, as long as she doesn't tell their parents. The children must
then share one pair of sneakers, to be traded back and forth between
the time they go to school(she goes in the morning, while he goes in
the afternoon). The children try some clever schemes in order to get
the shoes back, but none of them seem to work. That is really the
film's entire plot, but it moves rather swiftly and never becomes
dull(in Iran, it was a huge hit among children). But during the film,
if you pay close attention, you can tell that Majidi is actually
crafting a brilliant study on the different wealth classes of Iran. In
short, CHILDREN OF HEAVEN deserves it's Oscar nomination for Best
Foreign Language Film just as much or even more than any of the other
nominees, and it makes you wish that Miramax spent just as much money
promoting this film as it did LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL or SHAKESPEARE IN
LOVE.  


Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
Time Code ***1/2
rated R
97 minutes
Screen Gems
starring Xander Berkeley, Golden Brooks, Saffron
Burrows, Viveka Davis, Richard Edson, Aimee Graham,
Salma Hayek, Glenne Headly, Andrew Heckler, Holly
Hunter, Danny Huston, Daphna Kastner, Patrick Kearney,
Elizabeth Low, Kyle MacLachlan, Mia Maestro, Leslie
Mann, Suzy Nakamura, Alessandro Nivola, Zuleikha
Robinson, Julian Sands, Stellan Skarsgard, Jeanne
Tripplehorn, Steven Weber
written and directed by Mike Figgis
The tagline for `Time Code' asks the viewer: `Who will
you want to watch?' Considering my expectations going
in to the film, a better question would be `Why will
you want to watch?' After he triumphed with the jazzy,
low-budget hit `Leaving Las Vegas', filmmaker Mike
Figgis directed three dreadful films: `One Night
Stand', `Miss Julie', and of course, `The Loss Of
Sexual Innocence', one of the most pretentious art
films I have ever seen. To add salt to an oozing flesh
wound, his latest film, `Time Code', is shot on
digital video and features a screen split into
quadrants for the duration of its running time. In
other words, I was expecting a `Blair Witch' headache
to the fourth power, as directed by an elitist
egomaniac. But the cinema often defies our
expectations. 
Films are rarely as provocative as `Time Code' is.
Figgis gives us four pairs of eyes to witness a story
told in real-time, on digital video, without edits and
quick cuts. The plotline isn't half as fascinating as
the project itself, and the best thing is that it's
hard to care. `Time Code' tells a generic L.A. tale of
sex, drugs, murder, greed and excess, but it's a tale
that the viewer puts together in his own head, which
makes the film a transcendent experience for some, a
vomit-inducing mind-trip for others.
I chose to watch `Time Code' as a glimpse into the
future of experimental cinema. This is the film that
the Danish `purist' movement Dogma 95 has wanted for
years. Figgis' film is structured in such a way that
it's impossible for the viewer not to become engrossed
in the storyline, no matter how phony the improvised
dialogue and rehashed storyline may seem.
He is also blessed with a cast that feels up to the
challenge. Few roles are as tough as the ones Figgis
provides his actors with in this landmark production.
In this film, the performances must be spot-on. No
cuts, no editing, no bullsh*t. Stellan Skarsgard plays
a movie mogul, Saffron Burrows (Figgis' wife) is his
wife and Salma Hayek is his mistress who is engaged in
a relationship with a woman played by Jeanne
Tripplehorn.
The film revolves around one day in the office of Red
Mullet Productions; the site of auditions for a new
Hollywood film. It is a day shaken more by jealousy
and revenge than by the earthquakes that occur every
half-hour. The four-camera structure brings voyeurism
to new heights, giving us a surveillance camera view
into the personal crises of a group of wealthy,
disconnected adults.
Is the quadruple screen tactic annoying? At times,
yes. But it also makes `Time Code' an endlessly
engrossing picture, because if one part of the screen
is boring you, chances are that in another quadrant,
something interesting is occurring. Figgis allows his
viewers to pick and choose, making the film as close
to interactive as possible.
I thought it would be hard for Mike Figgis to regain
my respect, but he does so with one simple line,
spoken in the film by Stellan Skarsgard. A young
Russian filmmaker has come into the Red Mullet office
to explain her next feature film, which sounds a lot
like the basis of `Time Code'. Four cameras will
follow different people and tell the same story.
Skarsgard laughs out loud, proclaiming: `That's the
most pretentious crap I've ever heard!' It's a bravura
moment of self-loathing that single-handedly
apologizes for most of Figgis' career.
The most contrived plot element of `Time Code' is the
earthquake, which was also used in Robert Altman's
similar `Short Cuts' to tie the characters together.
But in `Time Code', the earthquake seems like a
metaphor. With `Time Code', Mike Figgis breaks new
cinematic ground, and hopefully the aftershocks will
be just as powerful.

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
95 minutes
Sony Pictures Classics
starring Sean Penn, Samantha Morton, Uma Thurman, Brian Markinson, Anthony
LaPaglia, Gretchen Mol, Vincent Guastafero, John Waters, James Urbaniak
Few filmmakers have the courage and honesty to openly portray their
psyche, flawed as it may be, in their films.  Woody Allen, among other
things, is one of these filmmakers.  In each one of his brilliant
character studies, there is more than a bit of self-deprecation; never
too subtle to recognize.
And watching `Sweet And Lowdown', his wonderful new film,
it's not hard to see why subtlety isn't his main priority.  What
makes his films so entertaining is that he is the poster-boy for
modern American, middle-aged (and dare I say Jewish) neurosis, and not
the least bit ashamed of it.  `Sweet And Lowdown', Allen's
32nd feature film, is highly enjoyable, funny and unpredictable.
It is his first movie which characterizes his well-publicized
infatuation with jazz music.
In the film, Woody's alter ego is Emmet Ray (Sean Penn); `the
second greatest guitarist in the world,' and quite proud of it.
Emmet's story is told `mockumentary' style; narrated by Woody
Allen and other noted jazz aficionados.  He is a fine musician, but a
flawed character; one so self-involved that his only companionship is
found in a mute woman named Hattie (Samantha Morton, in a dazzling
performance), who listens but never retorts.
This amusing relationship makes up the core of the film, and it works
very well thanks in part to Sean Penn's over-the-top antics.  But
it is Samantha Morton, who has appeared in a few British productions,
who steals the show with her silent vulnerability.  She utters not a
single line, yet she is a shoo-in (at least in my book) for a handful
of awards.
`Sweet And Lowdown' is otherwise an entertaining series of
occurrences in Emmet Ray's lifetime, which includes living out his
favorite pastime (shooting rats at a garbage dump), and a chance
meeting with Django Reinhardt (the greatest guitarist in the world,
according to Emmet).  The film's light tone is more like `Radio
Days' than `Crimes And Misdemeanors'.
Many will say that `Sweet And Lowdown' is too slight to be a
comic triumph, but I enjoyed every minute, which was probably the
filmmakers' intention.  The superb supporting cast includes Uma
Thurman, Anthony LaPaglia, Gretchen Mol and James Urbaniak (from
`Henry Fool', which was indeed a comic triumph), all of whom
shine in small roles.
Woody Allen is back at peak form, doing what he does best without
offending anybody.  With so many `edgy' films being made as a
new wave of filmmaking approaches, it's nice to see that some still
`make em like they used to.'
It's also interesting to point out that Woody Allen may be the
hardest working artist in film today.  I'd be hard-pressed to name
another who puts out a film every year.  But Woody does it, and he
does it well.  What makes Allen one of the most talented filmmakers of
the century is that he realizes, as others should, that true
inspiration can only be found within oneself.


Title
Review for Tian yu (1998)
"Xiu Xiu", the astonishing debut film from Chinese actress Joan Chen,
has been banned in its native country because of "inappropriate"
political and sexual content. This ban is expected, since Chen's film
is so bold and provocative, and because its target is the corrupt
Chinese government. The beautiful Lu Lu stars as Xiu Xiu(no more
confusion), a young girl who is "sent down" out of her city in a
program called Educated Youth. The Chinese government believes that
this is a way to keep lower-class families out of their cities. Xiu
Xiu ends up as an apprentice to an older man named Lao Jin, learning
how to herd horses. She is told that after six months she will be able
to return to her home. But as those months pass, she learns that the
only way to have any chance of returning is to let the men at
headquarters have sex with her. This leads to a tragic, cathartic
outcome which reflects the sad truth. Xiu Xiu learns that her fate is
indeed in her hands. The scenes involving Lao Jin and Xiu Xiu are done
with a subtle grace requiring little dialogue. Although "Xiu Xiu"
clocks in at 99 minutes, it is indeed an epic; a tale of fate,
corruption and heartbreak.  The performances are excellent, and Joan
Chen shows depth far surpassing any other first filmmaker I've seen in
ages. The film's heartbreaking score adds to the drama, but "Xiu Xiu"
would be fine even without it. Daring and breathtaking, "Xiu Xiu" is
one of the year's very best offerings.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
rated R
Touchstone Pictures
141 minutes
starring John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito, Ben
Gazzara, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Mike Starr, John Savage
written by Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli and Spike Lee
directed by Spike Lee
I'm not a big Spike Lee fan. He has continuously made racist remarks
on the Holocaust, and the characters in his films are often racist
caricatures. I don't know Spike Lee personally, so I don't want to
call him a racist, but what, exactly, does he stand for? Not for
racial tolerance, certainly not for African-Americans, and not really
for himself either. Lee, while being quite inconsistent, has made some
fine films("Do The Right Thing", "Malcolm X"), but none of the
messages have been too similar. "Do The Right Thing" ends in a race
riot, but is followed by anti-violence quotes from Martin Luther King
and Malcolm X. Spike Lee may not be a hypocrite, and his films may not
be morally ambiguous, but he needs to get his messages clear, because
I just don't recognize them.
The latest Spike Lee Joint, entitled "Summer Of Sam", seems like a
departure from his usual social commentary on race relations. There is
not a single black main role, as Lee has chosen to infiltrate the cast
with poorly conceived Italian-American characters. But in later
scenes, Lee also shows a cross-section of African-Americans; all
uneducated.
"Summer Of Sam" is referring to the summer of '77, when serial killer
David Berkowitz(a.k.a. Son Of Sam) commited close to 10 murders of
young New York City couples; targeting those with shoulder-length
brown hair. As journalist Jimmy Breslin tells us, it's just one of the
millions of stories that happen in NYC every day.
John Leguizamo plays Vinny, a married man who hasn't been too faithful
to his innocent wife, Dionna(Mira Sorvino). One night, while cheating
on his wife, he catches a peek at the Son Of Sam after he has just
commited a murder, and he becomes paranoid that the .44 killer will
strike him next.  His best friend, Ritchie(Adrien Brody), is a NYC
punk complete with mohawk and British accent, and is the town's first
Son Of Sam suspect.
When a mob boss(Ben Gazzara) decides that the cops aren't doing a good
job on the case, he decides to give out a larger reward for whoever
can get him the Son Of Sam.  Then, a heat wave knocks out all power,
and the hunt for Son Of Sam is in overdrive.
Although Spike Lee has provided us with a very entertaining 141
minutes, he doesn't get to touch upon all of his ambitious subjects in
the film. At times, I was unsure of where "Summer Of Sam" was headed,
but Lee packs enough energy to make the film a dynamic powerhouse.
John Leguizamo and Adrien Brody are each terrific, while the other
actors take on supporting roles.
Spike Lee takes on Scorsese territory in this film, and he also
borrows a bit from Paul Thomas Anderson's "Boogie Nights". While
"Summer Of Sam" has all the components of a cool movie(the 70's, NYC,
punk rock, the Mob, serial killer), the formula doesn't always add
up. Also, Lee doesn't stop using excessive sex, violence and drug use;
a tactic that ruined "He Got Game", but fits in to the era here.
Despite the many flaws of "Summer Of Sam", what I liked most was the
improbable premise; that New York could be turned upside down because
of one lunatic. While I still don't like Spike Lee, I must say that I
recommend this film to any guy who likes "GoodFellas" or "Boogie
Nights". Overly ambitious, overwrought and in overdrive.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Sugar Town (1999)
rated R
USA Films
92 minutes
starring Jade Gordon, Michael Des Barres, John Taylor, Martin Kemp,
Larry Klein, John Doe, Lucinda Jenney, Ally Sheedy, Rosanna Arquette,
Jeffrey McDonald, Richmond Arquette, Lumi Cavazos, Vincent Berry,
Beverly D'Angelo
written and directed by Allison Anders and Kurt Voss
Good friends Allison Anders and Kurt Voss are each experienced
filmmakers.  They started out with their $50,000 collaboration on the
L.A. punk rock scene, "Border Radio", and have watched their work
evolve from edgy, alternative indie to mainstream, formulaic
Hollywood.  Anders had made three critically acclaimed films which
told stories from a woman's perspective, and Voss had directed a
handful of films which ended up either faltering on cable or delving
into obscurity. Either way, both decided it was time for a change.
Anders and Voss were looking to recapture that independent spirit
which was so evident in "Border Radio", and decided to conceive and
make a movie without any hassle. For their second collaborative
effort, they decided to once again visit the L.A. music scene, for a
behind the scenes look at the ambition and failure in the rock music
industry. In less than two weeks, they wrote "Sugar Town", and started
production less than a month later. Then, in January, the film
premiered at Sundance Film Festival '99, just six months after Allison
Anders and Kurt Voss put their pens to paper.
As a rabid supporter of the independent film scene, this act of daring
and unconventionality pleased me immensely. But sadly, "Sugar Town"
turns out to be a film that emphasizes the contraints of a low budget
rather than the creative freedom allowed by such an endeavor. "Sugar
Town" is an ensemble comedy in the "Short Cuts" vein that has its
moments, but never gets off its feet.
"Sugar Town" involves a cross section of individuals who are either
climbing the ladder of ambition or who are at 14:59 in their fame
clock. All are involved somehow in a hit or miss business, where a
sure thing today can be a has been tomorrow. There is Gwen (newcomer
Jade Gordon), a ruthlessly ambitious housemaid, Liz (Ally Sheedy), a
movie production designer who is taken advantage of at every turn, Eva
(Rosanna Arquette), an aging actress married to has been 80's rocker
Clive (John Taylor), who is trying to get his new band off the ground.
These people are unified only by their desire to be the next big
thing, despite their age, sex and class differences. But we, the
viewers, never see any developed, human characters.  Instead, we see
dull caricatures that are but pawns in a poorly conceived game. Every
once in a while, there is a clever gesture (the self deprecating rock
stars are played by members of once prominent 80's bands), but "Sugar
Town" ends up feeling more sour than sweet.
As an ensemble film, "Sugar Town" also falters. The few segments which
are most interesting are the ones paid least attention to (which gives
way to some painfully tacky subplots), and the way the characters are
tied together is a bland condescension. "Sugar Town" is short, but
feels long, and the script was not only written in a hurry, but it
feels that way too. The saving grace is the few women characters
(obviously written by Allison Anders), played by Jade Gordon, Rosanna
Arquette, and Ally Sheedy that hold our attention whenever on
screen. Gordon, who had a small role in Anders' "Grace Of My Heart",
shows potential in her role as the vicious Gwen.  Arquette and Sheedy
stay low-key, but are nevertheless effective.
Allison Anders is, in my opinion, a talent with strong views, but a
knack for inconsistency. Her best work is her first sole effort, "Gas
Food Lodging", a semi autobiographical story of a girl growing up in a
small New Mexico town. Her poorest work can be seen in her segment of
"Four Rooms", which was also co-directed by Quentin Tarantino, Robert
Rodriguez and Alexandre Rockwell.
"Sugar Town" has its moments, but it's lacking an edge found in so
many other studies of Hollywood industry. The film ultimately never
really ends, and doesn't provoke much thought. If "Sugar Town" was a
stronger film, it could have been a good argument for more independent
film funding.  However, like its title, "Sugar Town" ends up being
meaningless; a movie that is unprovocative and uncompromising, never
becoming what you want it to be.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com
this review is also featured at http://jump.to/moviepage 


Title
Review for Free Enterprise (1998)
rated R
Regent Entertainment
starring Eric McCormack, Rafer Weigel, William Shatner, Audie England,
Patrick Van Horn, Jennifer Sommerfield
written by Mark A. Altman and Robert Meyer Burnett
directed by Robert Meyer Burnett
Picture a Kevin Smith ("Clerks") movie with "Star Trek" enthusiasts
instead of "Star Wars" fans, and you'll have a pretty good idea of
what Robert Meyer Burnett's slightly amusing "Free Enterprise" is
like. "Free Enterprise" stars Eric McCormack and Rafer Weigel as Mark
and Robert, two L.A.  "trekkies" who are down on their luck as they
approach age 30. All that changes (for an instant) when they run into
their lifetime idol, "Star Trek's" William Shatner (mocking himself in
a brilliant performance), and their luck gradually changes (hey, the
plot is pretty thin). This even lower-budget version of "Swingers" has
its characters spouting out movie references in basically every line
of dialogue. While this is actually a lot of fun for a while, the
talkiness gradually wears thin by the end of the film (which is at
least 20 minutes too long). All in all, "Free Enterprise" is a nice
but overlong little indie flick that should make a decent rental. If
you're a trekkie in a rush to see William Shatner rapping, then check
"Free Enterprise" out in theatres, and don't expect too much.
Note: I know absolutely nothing about "Star Trek", so I have no idea
what this film's title means, and I have no idea of how this film is
from a trekkie perspective.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com (!!!!!!!new site address!!!!!!) 


Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
Not many notice it, but American cinema wouldn't be the same without
someone like John Sayles.  While many low-budget filmmakers do their
dirty work and move on to bigger things, Sayles sticks with his roots
and keeps on making films that are personal, important, very
independent, and most of all, extremely good.
John Sayles got his directing start in 1980 with "Return Of The
Secaucus 7", an ensemble piece that supposedly inspired "The Big
Chill". He then moved onward, past "City Of Hope" and "Eight Men Out",
to his classic, 1996's "Lone Star"; a tale of a soft-spoken sheriff
uncovering a dark past. Sayles followed that up with last year's
underrated Spanish-language drama "Men With Guns". The man's latest
work is "Limbo", a remarkable, if uneven, independent film that is too
unique to fit into any specific genre.
Like all John Sayles films, "Limbo" takes a while to get going, as we
meet the two protagonists living in Alaska; America's final
frontier. Donna De Angelo (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio) is a folksy
singer (a la Mare Winningham in "Georgia") whom we first see at a
wedding ceremony in which she is performing for the last time with her
ex-boyfriend (one of many, we are told). Donna's cynical,
self-mutilating daughter Noelle (Vanessa Martinez) is working as a
waitress for the caterer. Donna begs for a ride home with her
daughter's employer, a quiet, secretive man named Joe Gastineau (David
Strathairn).
Inevitably, a relationship begins, but just when you think things
couldn't get any simpler, a few complications arise. As it turns out,
Joe never used to be such a quiet man; that is until he let two of his
friends drown in a fishing accident a few years back. However, Joe has
started to fish again, just as his estranged half-brother, Bobby (Casey
Siemaszko), returns to Alaska. Bobby asks Joe to accompany him on a
"fishing trip", for reasons that he cannot disclose.  Mistakenly, he
asks Donna and Noelle to join them, their best laid plans go very
awry, and they end up in "limbo", called so because "It sure ain't
heaven and it's too cold to be hell."
David Strathairn, a character actor who made his debut in Sayles'
"Return Of The Secaucus 7" comes into his own here as the typical John
Sayles' antihero (a soft-spoken, simple-looking maze of a
man). Mastrantonio (who does all her own singing) is more showy, and
just as good. The action hits a little to quickly in "Limbo", and
there are bits of throwaway dialogue, but it is another great
achievement for Sayles.
It is the ending of "Limbo", however, that will cause the most
backlash. In a very daring move, John Sayles has given "Limbo" an open
ending. Those who read my "eXistenZ" review will know that I enjoy
open endings more than the average person, and in "Limbo", it works
wonders. The ending provoked a collective groan from the none-too-kind
audience, but I thought it to be a move of pure genius. By cutting out
one second of film, Sayles shows the audience the difference between a
Hollywood happy ending and a realistic, inevitable truth.
John Sayles, the most gifted of filmmakers, grips us to the story and
then makes us the characters.  Realism has never been more
thought-provoking. The groan of the audience just goes to show how
involved we are by the end of the film. A landmark moment for John
Sayles, the messenger of independent film.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Human Traffic (1999)
A Review by Akiva Gottlieb
At a screening of "Human Traffic" in the United Kingdom, writer/director 
Justin Kerrigan received a compliment that states exactly why his film 
is successful in so many different ways. A 65-year-old man left the 
screening, nearly in tears, proclaiming "God! I wish I was young again!" 
"Human Traffic" is not a great movie, but it taps into the zeitgeist of 
the many young people who try their hardest to truly "live".
That these people are heavily into hallucinogenic drugs is not a subject 
Kerrigan shies away from. "Human Traffic" will, without a doubt, be 
compared to the similarly fast-paced Scottish import "Trainspotting", a 
film which many believe to have glamorized heroin use. "Human Traffic", 
which is also becoming a cult-classic in the U.K., examines "the most 
dominant youth culture there's ever been in Britain, bigger than the 
rockers, the hippies, the Mods," according to Kerrigan. This is a 
culture where Ecstasy (or "E") is the drug of choice. Yes, I am talking 
about Rave.
"Human Traffic" focuses on the lives of a cross-section of Welsh 
twenty-somethings who use the weekend rave parties to find meaning in 
their aimless lives. They spend every hour of their dead-end jobs 
looking forward to the pleasures that the weekend promises. This film is 
about such a weekend, and the pleasures are as much the viewer's as they 
are the characters'.
Our guide is Jip (John Simm), an energetic type who is coming to grips 
with the fact that he is in love with his friend Lulu (Lorraine 
Pilkington), and that he suffers from an acute case of "sexual 
paranoia". His best friend Koop (Shaun Parkes) suspects that his 
faithful girlfriend Nina (Nicola Reynolds) is cheating on him with 
numerous partners, and his buddy Moff (Danny Dyer) is always looking to 
have fun to rebel against an upper-class upbringing.
Without following a visible plotline, "Human Traffic" goes through the 
motions of a weekend in Rave culture. Late Friday night, the group heads 
off to a rave where they dance, take drugs, and search for the meaning 
of life. After the rave there is a party where they dance, take drugs 
and discuss how "Star Wars" is a dissection of life as a junkie. 
Cleverly, Kerrigan's inventive and stylish film also portrays the 
uncomfortable aftermath of any Rave weekend: the comedown. By showing 
the consequences of such a weekend, Kerrigan proves to not be 
glamorizing the culture, or drugs itself.
Justin Kerrigan claims that he made "Human Traffic" because this culture 
is the one he grew up on, and he felt qualified to make a film based on 
his experience. In the film, he doesn't try to make excuses for why 
today's youth are hooked on drugs, or paint negative stereotypes of such 
youth. Instead, he is trying to provide a Woody Allen-type insight into 
a generation that takes drugs, but doesn't resort to violence. Drugs are 
just a part of their weekend routine.
"Human Traffic" is hardly groundbreaking (infact, last year's "Go" and 
this year's upcoming "Groove" both focus on similar topics in the same 
culture), but it is an excellent movie because it really understands how 
much fun life can be. Kerrigan's characters are the type who just say 
"yes!". They know that mixing a bit of fantasy into their reality may be 
illegal, but to them, its also a risk worth taking.

Title
Review for Castle, The (1997/I)
rated R
released by Miramax Films
starring Michael Caton, Anne Tenney, Stephen Curry, Anthony Simcoe,
Sophie Lee, Wayne Hope, Tiriel Mora, Eric Bana, Charles 'Bud'
Tingwell, Costas Kilias
written and conceived by Santo Cilauro, Tom Gleisner, Jane Kennedy, Rob
Stich
directed by Rob Stich
Over the past few years, there have been only a few notable Australian
imports (Shine, Kiss or Kill), but after watching Rob Stich's The
Castle, which was the highest-grossing Australian film of last year,
their future is looking brighter. At the screening of The Castle which
I attended, two of the film's stars (both very nice) were in
attendance, surely trying to help spread word-of-mouth and make the
film a Full Monty-sized hit. And while The Castle is a funny,
heartwarming movie, it is not as poignant as The Full Monty, the film
to which The Castle has been often compared.
At the beginning of The Castle, Dale Kerrigan (Stephen Curry), a
scraggly teenager, introduces us to the members of his oddball
family. Darryl (Michael Caton), the father, is the backbone of the
family. He is a constantly cheerful man; always trying to keep the
family happy. If Darryl is the backbone, then Sal (Anne Tenney), the
mother, is the other bones. She does the cooking and errands around
the house.
Steve (Anthony Simcoe), Dale's older brother, is what Darryl calls an
"ideas man". He also spends most of his time looking through the
classifieds for useless things to buy and sell. Then there is
Tracy (Sophie Lee), a hairdresser who has just gotten married. And
lastly, there is Wayne (Wayne Hope), the son whom Darryl says "got
stuck with the wrong crowd", and commited a robbery.  He is locked up
in prison, but Dale visits him weekly.
What keeps the family together is their home, which Darryl calls his
"castle". It is situated right next to the airport runway, and
sometimes, says Darryl, you think the planes are going to land right
on top of you. The conflict of the film comes when a man informs them
that the goverment is planning an airport expansion, and their house
will be taken over by a compulsory acquisition.  Darryl then hires
small-time lawyer Dennis Denuto (Tiriel Mora), to try anything he can
to fight the government.
The Castle used four writers, was shot on a shoestring budget over an
11-day period, and for the most part, works very well. The film is a
light, British-style comedy, and is very funny at times. It is
essentially a feel-good movie, and I can't think of a single character
that was unlikable (although I hear that all Aussies are nicer than any
American). Many films need to take a lesson from movies like The
Castle, that prove that nice guys finish first.
Michael Caton gives a fine comic performance, reminiscent of early
John Cleese, and the film, while somewhat short, is very entertaining
the whole way through. The Castle sometimes borderlines on being too
cheerful, but too much of a good thing isn't all that bad.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
rated PG
20th Century Fox
starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ian McDiarmid, Ahmed Best, Ray Park
written and directed by George Lucas
So..."Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace" has arrived, and as
we all know, it is less a movie than a national phenomenon. Over the
past two decades, we have grown to love the characters that George
Lucas created in his trilogy; the films entitled "Star Wars", "The
Empire Strikes Back", and "Return Of The Jedi". These movies have
changed pop culture as no other movies ever have, creating a mass
following of people whose love for "Star Wars" can be best described
as...religious.
I have to admit that I rented the "Star Wars" trilogy last week, and
it was the first time that I had seen a couple of the films in their
entirety. In other words, I have never been much of a "Star Wars"
fan. But seeing the films, I realized that this cultural phenomenon
began because a film had finally taken the time to transport viewers
into a new, entirely different world. When watching "Star Wars", time
stops, and the viewer learns the lessons of the characters. "Star
Wars" is about the conflicts between good and evil, and how good will
always prevail eventually.
The films in the "Star Wars" trilogy were episodes 4, 5 and 6, and
they told the story of Luke Skywalker's rise to Jedi stardom. The
latest entry into the collection, "The Phantom Menace", is episode I,
and it takes place a long time before the Dark Side of the Force
transformed Anakin Skywalker into the lord of evil, Darth Vader.
A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away...special effects were much
more developed and everything looked a lot cooler.
I'm not going to give away much plot, since everyone in the world will
no doubt see this movie. It is the tale of how two Jedi knights, a
young boy, a queen, a couple of droids and a sea monkey attempt to
save the galaxy.
Is the film any good? Well, it is definitely "Star Wars", as any fan
will be able to tell. The special effects are absolutely incredible,
but it's too bad the plot isn't. The film feels like merely an
introduction to bigger things, hopefully setting us up for a
mind-blowing Episode II. It's a lot of fun, but it lacks many of those
quiet "Star Wars moments", despite the fact that we get a glimpse at a
lot of familiar characters, such as a younger Yoda, a half-built
C-3PO, and a newer R2-D2.  A lot of characters are left
underdeveloped, and Darth Maul, the hyped villain who was supposed to
have had such a large role, is merely a secondary player. Also,
Obi-Wan Kenobi comes off as uninteresting, quiet and selfish.
Most of the performances, however, are top-notch. Liam Neeson as the
swashbuckling Qui-Gon Jinn and Natalie Portman as the Queen Amidala
are both playing their roles with typical "Star Wars" vigor. It is
Jake Lloyd, though, the young boy who plays Anakin Skywalker(Darth
Vader as a child) who grabbed my attention the most. Lloyd, who
appeared in "Jingle All The Way" and "Unhook The Stars" has a long
career ahead of him.
"The Phantom Menace" is by far the most anticipated film of all time,
and despite not being nearly as good as the other "Star Wars" films,
it is not in any way disappointing.  The cash is rolling in in large
numbers, and hopefully George Lucas will use it to craft an amazing
Episode II. Despite huge production costs, "The Phantom Menace" is
actually an independent film, since Lucas raised all the money on his
own and made the film without a major studio(Fox then stepped in to
distribute the film). "The Phantom Menace" is nothing great, but it is
another solid entry into an ongoing saga that has changed the world as
we once knew it.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
It is so very rare to see a film that is so involving that you're
afraid to look away from the screen for a second. Such a film would
make time stop; it would be an experience that would feel so lifelike
that you'd never look at a movie the same way again. Such a film would
finally show you why movies are made. Not for the benefit of the
filmmaker; but for the benefit of the viewer. Tom Tykwer's "Run Lola
Run" is such a film. It is a film so frenetically fast-paced and
involving that it makes "Go" seem like a Theo Angelopolous melodrama.
"Run Lola Run" starts off with the sounds of a techno beat that
doesn't cease until the movie is through. The film is the product of
music videos, comic books, video games and pure genius. The title
character is first shown as a cartoon in the blistering opening credit
sequence.
Red-haired Lola(Franka Potente) has just recieved a call from her
boyfriend, Manni(Moritz Bleibtreu). Through tears, he tells her that
because she didn't come to pick him up, he owes 100,000dm to a
"friend". The money that he was supposed to deliver was accidentally
left on a subway and stolen by a homeless man. Manni has 20 minutes to
get the money, or he will be killed.
Lola explains that her motorbike was stolen, and she couldn't come to
pick him up. She tells him to wait in the phone booth and somehow she
will get ahold of 100,000dm and get it to him. Full speed ahead, Lola
starts running in whichever direction she can in order to get the
money. Her quest leads her to find out some incriminating family
secrets; and for every person whom she bumps into, a little sequence
is flashed showing what happened to that person afterwards.
This plot, of Lola running to get the money, is repeated three times,
making up the entirety of the film.  Each one of her attempts has a
different, meaningful outcome, but she always can get another
chance(at the beginning of the film, a quote is shown that says "The
end of the game is the beginning of the game").
It's almost impossible to describe in words what a masterpiece "Run
Lola Run" is. The end of the millenium is a perfect time to release
the film in the U.S., because the film is the debut of a whole new
style of film. A film, that is 80 minutes long, stylish, continuously
fast-paced, and impossible not to enjoy. In my book, writer-director
Tom Tykwer has just become the next master of suspense.
Looking back at 1999's films, I noticed that "Run Lola Run" is far
better than anything that has been released. You could combine "The
Matrix" and "Go" and still not come close to the energy that this film
produces. "Run Lola Run" is purely cinematic in its form, and it
pushes the medium of film to its limit. This German gem may just be
this year's foreign film that will become a runaway hit. In essence,
"Run Lola Run" is perfect both in style and in substance.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
Note: While this review does not have spoilers, I
do discuss much of the film's plot. I suggest that
those who like to enter a film with an open mind view
the film before reading this review. However, reading
this review will not spoil the film.
That the sun rises daily is itself a miracle, one of
many that most people take for granted. As many
viewers inferred from the recent `American Beauty',
life is only worth living when one can take time to
appreciate the small things, like the miracle of
sunshine. Istvan Szabo's `Sunshine' is a film that
earns the cliché `an epic of intimate proportions,'
because it is a big, bold, sweeping three-hour triumph
that is, at heart, about the smaller things in life,
and the ways in which these things shape our destiny. 
`Sunshine' is a film of dazzling richness; the fully
developed story of 3 pivotal generations in the
Sonnenschein (which translates as `sunshine') family
of 20th century Hungary. Szabo's vision is ambitious,
as he tries to tell the story of a century, a country,
a family and their plight for assimilation in a world
that may not accept them for what they are. The
Sonnenschein family is Jewish, and one of the film's
major themes involves the way in which the family
slowly breaks away from their ancient heritage. 
Ralph Fiennes ambitiously and successfully plays three
members of the Sonnenschein family in different time
periods. The family patriarch is Emmanuel (David de
Keyser), who, in the late 1800's, creates a successful
business by peddling the family treasure, `Sunshine
Tonic'. He marries the temperamental Rose (Miriam
Margolyes) and raises two daringly different young
boys, Ignatz (Ralph Fiennes) and Gustave (James
Frain), and his orphaned niece, Valerie (Jennifer
Ehle). 
As young adults, Ignatz, a government official who
fervently supports the Emperor, and Valerie, a
beautiful photographer, begin a forbidden, incestuous
affair. Gustave, a wild Communist revolutionary,
disapproves of his brother's actions, both politically
and sexually. According to the film's press notes, the
Germans and Jews were each highly assimilated, and did
not regard themselves as a separate group. Therefore,
it is all the more disconcerting that in order to
become a judge, Ignatz must, with his siblings, change
the family name to the Hungarian-sounding Sors. When
telling her parents of the name change, Valerie
promises to never abandon her Jewish faith. Easy for
her to say 
At the beginning of the twentieth century, Adam Sors
(Ralph Fiennes, in his second role), the younger son
of Ignatz and Valerie, emerges as a world-class
fencer. Taught by his brother Istvan (Mark Strong),
Adam becomes the top fencer in his club, and aims to
be an Olympian. However, times being the way they are,
Adam has little chance of fulfilling his goals if he
continues as a Jew. Because his life's motivation is
to succeed as an athlete, he converts to Catholicism,
breaking ties with his family's strong Jewish
background. At the conversion, he meets Hannah (Molly
Parker), a woman who is also desperately trying to fit
in to the ever-changing society. Adam becomes an
Olympian, winning the gold for his country. But even
that cannot shield him from the upcoming war, and its
effects. 
The first 120 minutes of `Sunshine' is some of the
best filmmaking I have seen this century, combining
remarkable, intricate elements of romance and
political intrigue that blend together seamlessly. But
the third act, the story of Ivan Sors, who turns to
Communism in order to avenge the gruesome effects of
the Holocaust (which are shown in one particularly
wrenching scene), is noticeably weak (until the final
minutes, in which Szabo's vision becomes clear). 
`Sunshine' is remarkable because director Istvan Szabo
uses the powers of cinema to their fullest extent. The
film is a welcome reminder of how any filmmaker with a
strong vision can tell a compelling story under the
constraints of a low budget. `Sunshine' pays close
attention to period detail, transporting the viewer
through the twentieth century with keen
characterizations that pack a real punch. 
Flawed as it is, `Sunshine' is a life-affirming tale
of family ties; grandly intimate filmmaking that can
only be categorized as `epic'. A unique combination of
flamboyance and detail, featuring a dazzling display
of acting prowess by the incomparable Ralph Fiennes,
Istvan Szabo's `Sunshine' is a film event not to be
missed. 

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
rated R
Touchstone Pictures
96 minutes
starring Loren Dean, Hope Davis, Jason Lee, Alfre Woodard, Mary
McDonnell, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Zooey Deschanel, Martin Short, David
Paymer, Jane Adams, Dana Ivey, Kevin Tighe, Ted Danson, Jason Ritter,
Elizabeth Moss
written and directed by Lawrence Kasdan
"Mumford", a hit and miss ensemble comedy from Lawrence Kasdan ("The
Big Chill"), is more weird than quirky, and more quirky than
funny. Which, as you can tell, isn't saying very much.  Newcomer Loren
Dean plays Dr. Mumford, a man who in four months has become the most
popular psychologist in a town called...Mumford. His unorthodox
approach gains him a new friend, lonely skateboarding billionaire Skip
Skipperton (Jason Lee). Mumford tells Skip a secret which he has
successfully hidden in his four months in town. He isn't, nor has he
ever been, a psychologist. In a scarily odd flashback sequence,
Mumford confesses about his former life as an I.R.S. investigator.  A
life filled with drugs, adultery and paranoia. But the Doc seems to be
helping people get back on their feet; most notably Sofie (Hope
Davis), a woman suffering from chronic fatigue syndrome and quickly
becoming the object of Mumford's affection. The cross-section of his
individual patients include Mary McDonnell, Zooey Deschanel, Ted
Danson, David Paymer, and a very un-"Heavy" Pruitt Taylor Vince. But a
district attorney (Martin Short) can't help digging up dirt on
Mumford, and soon he finds himself caught in quite a dilemma. As a
film, I wish "Mumford" could have stuck exclusively to the scenes with
Jason Lee. In all his films, he shows his own brand of cynicism laden
humor which never tires. Hope Davis is also good in her role, but the
romance between her and the Doc is not very believable. "Mumford"
often drags and feels much longer than its short running time, but at
times it is effective, if not at all funny. If Loren Dean, as the
lead, was a better actor with more charisma, "Mumford" could have
worked. He has a bland appearance and no real guile. If you're looking
for a light, almost enjoyable but downright weird "comedy", then
"Mumford" is for you. If not, stay far, far away.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Guinevere (1999)
The seamstress down the hall has seen it several times before. A young
girl, usually in her early twenties, walks into the room of the 50
year old man. Before long, she has brought her belongings and moved
in. In a few weeks, she emerges screaming, frustrated, angry. We never
see all these women come and go, but in `Guinevere', Audrey
Wells' transfixing directorial debut, we know it all from one look
at the seamstress, an inconsequential character without a single line.
The 50 year old man is Connie Fitzpatrick (Stephen Rea), an Irish
photographer who is hired to document a wedding for an upscale family
of San Franciscan lawyers. During the proceedings, he meets Harper
Sloane (Sarah Polley), a family member who has been accepted to
Harvard Law, but has neither the self esteem nor the will to attend.
Later in the week, Harper goes to Connie's apartment/development
lab to pick up the wedding photos, and she falls deeply under the
spell of this seductive older man.  Harper, who is admittedly
camera-shy, is admitted to Connie's exclusive school for young
women, in which he shares his wisdom and art in exchange for
love. Harper is a naive nymphet, and she moves in with him.
As we learn through Harper's voice-over, Connie was the worst and
the greatest man she ever knew. For reasons which she doesn't know,
Connie refers to her as Guinevere.
However, when Harper visits with an old friend of Connie's, she
realizes that she isn't the only Guinevere who was drawn in to this
world of romance and photography, and she begins to fear the
mysterious older man. But Connie's seductive charms lure her back,
and this Lolita romance continues on. There is a scene, later in the
film, when Harper's affluent mother (Jean Smart) finds out about
the improper relationship, and she addresses the two with blunt
honesty. It is one of the more powerful scenes of `Guinevere',
and it is from that point that the romance, and the film itself,
begins to wind down.
Audrey Wells, who wrote `The Truth About Cats a nd Dogs', has
crafted a beautiful, clever film that manages an entirely new spin on
a May-December relationship. However, `Guinevere's' final
third is amateurish, and the conlusion is unsatisying compared to what
has preceeded it.
With `Guinevere', Sarah Polley finally has the leading role she
deserves, after star-making turns in Atom Egoyan's `The Sweet
Hereafter' and Doug Liman's `Go'. To Harper, she brings
the right mix of naivete and experience, and her character grows to
become three dimensional. Stephen Rea is eerily good as Connie, and
Jean Smart has a small but vital role as Harper's mother.
Despite being excellent for most of its running time,
`Guinevere's' wildly uneven conclusion is weird and
depressing. Wells doesn't know when to end the film, and the result
is like a bad dream.
However, Audrey Wells instills enough chemistry between Polley and Rea
to make `Guinevere' is still a very pleasant surprise. To me,
Sarah Polley is one of the leaders of a group of young actresses
destined for superstardom (Chloe Sevigny is another one). She has the
range to be choosy, and she can bring depth to any role.
In `Guinevere', subtlety plays the biggest role, and maybe on a
second viewing, I can see more through the seamstress' eyes. In the
end, `Guinevere' does falter, but it does so beautifully.


Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
rated G
Walt Disney Pictures
88 minutes
starring the voices of Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Nigel
Hawthorne, Alex D. Linz, Rosie O'Donnell, Wayne Knight
based on the story "Tarzan Of The Apes" by Edgar Rice Burroughs
written by Tab Murphy, Bob Tzudiker and Noni White
directed by Chris Buck and Kevin Lima
Although many movie studios have taken the animation genre to
unexpected heights in the past five years, the films carrying the
Disney logo are still the most memorable.  "Tarzan", Disney's latest,
is no exception. Using the original story by Edgar Rice Burroughs,
"Tarzan" breaks little new ground, but it is still an entertaining
treat. "Tarzan" features Tony Goldwyn(director of "A Walk On The
Moon") as the title character, and Minnie Driver as Jane, his love
interest. The story is the oft-told one about the boy who is raised as
a gorilla and uses his animal instincts to woo a woman who is studying
the gorillas. At times, "Tarzan" is very derivative of "The Lion
King", and the characters aren't nearly as well developed as those in
that film. But "Tarzan" is an animated film that people of all ages
should enjoy.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
You know how sometimes you don't realize how great, or beautiful, a
moment is until it has completely passed you by? You know how we all
strive and push ourselves to live out those moments and becomes
overwhelmed by them? Is personal beauty so unattainable that we can
spend our whole lives just searching for a perfect facade of it?
In the unforgettable "American Beauty", the first film from acclaimed
stage director Sam Mendes, these statements and questions are
presented with such honesty and skill that the concept of filmmaking
is almost reinvented. We are there to witness the downfall of a
seemingly normal American family, and we are there to try to learn
from their mistakes.
Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) isn't a bad guy. But as we learn through
his opening narration, he lives in a nice house in a small town, and
within a year he will be dead.  His marriage to real estate agent
Carolyn (Annette Bening) is almost nonexistent, and his rebellious
teenage daughter, Jane, (Thora Birch) hates him. One day, after
resolving to spend more time with Jane, he meets her ambitious, sexpot
best friend, Angela (Mena Suvari). As Lester puts it, after seeing her
he felt like he had just awoke from a long coma.
In fact, Lester begins to rebel against his "perfect" suburban
society, and starts to make a lot of changes. He quits his boring job,
threatening to blackmail his boss about a fling with a prostitute, if
he doesn't get a year's worth of pay. He smokes dope with Ricky (Wes
Bentley), a teenager who just moved in next door. And he finally
starts speaking his mind, about everything from his marriage to his
masturbation to his lust for his daughter's best friend.
Meanwhile, Carolyn is doing some rebellion of her own. An obsessive
workaholic, she starts sleeping with her competition (Peter
Gallagher), the king of real estate.  She, however, lets her urge to
"not be a victim" take control of her (and eventually her husband's)
life.
But it is Ricky, the aforementioned boy next door, who takes control
of the film. He is a drug dealer who carries his videocamera with him
wherever he goes. When he moves onto the block, he films the Burnham's
darkest secrets, and is fascinated by them. Meanwhile, Jane takes a
liking to him. His abusive father (Chris Cooper), a General in the
Marines, once locked him up in a mental hospital because of his dope
habit, and doesn't know what is son is up to.
Ricky likes Jane because she isn't ordinary. He tries to show her that
the world is full of beauty that we tend to turn away from. Angela,
Jane's friend, wants to be a model because she believes that she is
beautiful, but Jane realizes what the audience has known all
along. She is a seductive bitch. As "American Beauty" builds up to its
final climax, we realize just how well drawn each character is.
"American Beauty" so completely blew me away, that it's hard to
coherently put into words just what the film is like. It is a flawless
black comedy in which you are afraid to laugh. The film explores
themes that have been studied in "Blue Velvet", "The Ice Storm" and
"Pleasantville", but first time director Sam Mendes and first time
writer Alan Ball are trying to show us something we may have seen, but
never really opened our eyes to.
The hardest part of dissecting "American Beauty" is picking out the
best performance. Kevin Spacey and Annette Bening have never been
better, while Thora Birch and Mena Suvari are incredible as the most
fully realized teenage characters in years. Chris Cooper is amazing in
yet another choice role for one of America's finest character actors,
but even he is not the best. Wes Bentley, whose only previous role was
a line or two in "Beloved", is captivating and mesmerizing. He brings
such life and knowledge to his role that a Best Supporting Actor Oscar
nod should not be far off.
"American Beauty", distributed by DreamWorks SKG, is far and away the
best film of the year, and definitely one of the finest films of the
decade. After seeing this film (and you must do so as soon as
possible) you may wonder how two first time filmmakers could handle
such a project. Well, I think that like Lester Burnham, these two were
free to realize their own respective creative visions, rather than
worrying if the film would be better than their last.
"American Beauty" is a film about lust, dysfunction, voyeurism and
murder.  However, the title is all the more pertinent every time I
think about it. I've been waiting a long time for a film like this to
totally sweep me away. Not a frame of film is wasted in this
triumphant classic; a film you must see to truly believe.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
rated PG-13
Dimension Films
96 minutes
starring Helen Mirren, Katie Holmes, Barry Watson, Marisa Coughlan,
Liz Stauber, Jeffrey Tambor, Michael McKean, Molly Ringwald, Lesley
Ann Warren, Vivica A. Fox
written and directed by Kevin Williamson
We've all had her before; the teacher that seems to hate us for no
apparent reason, other than the fact that she's jealous of our
future. Such is the title character of "Teaching Mrs. Tingle", a
flawed but fun dark comedy. Mrs. Tingle, played by Helen Mirren, is
kidnapped by three of her students(Katie Holmes, Barry Watson, and
Marisa Coughlan) after she catches them cheating for her final
test. The three students tie her to a bed in her home, and take turns
watching her, while she plays mindgames and tries to make them free
her. Despite a lame script and unfocused direction by "Scream"-scribe
Kevin Williamson, "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" is devilishly entertaining,
and almost becomes the high school satire that "Jawbreaker" tried to
be. The best thing about "Tingle" are the performances of Helen Mirren
and newcomer Marisa Coughlan. Mirren commands the screen and never
loses her edge, while Coughlan always entertains(especially in an
improvised "Exorcist" performance). Katie Holmes and Barry Watson(TV's
"7th Heaven") are merely competent and don't hold the viewer's
attention. I enjoyed Williamson's scripts for "Scream" and "The
Faculty", but a good screenplay here could have made for quite a
surprising film. "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" is his first directing foray,
and he seems to be derivative of anyone with whom he's ever
worked. But the film moves along at a good pace and is a breath of
fresh air from the thankfully forgotten teen horror genre. Teens will
like this film, but wait to rent it on video.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
rated R
starring Claire Danes, Omar Epps, Giovanni Ribisi, Dennis Farina, Josh
Brolin, Steve Harris, Michael Lerner, Richard Jenkins
written by Stephen T. Kay, Scott Silver, and Kate Lanier
directed by Scott Silver 
About five minutes into Scott Silver's awful THE MOD SQUAD, I had
already made up my mind to leave the theater. But just as I was
getting out of my chair, a feeling hit me.  Maybe by the end of this
review, I'll know what that feeling was.
Now I know that in most of my reviews I reserve the second paragraph
to describe the plot, but I looked hard at THE MOD SQUAD and couldn't
find one. Those of you who watched the 60's TV series on which this
film is based know that the "mod squad" is a group of three young
criminals (Claire Danes, Omar Epps, Giovanni Ribisi) who are sent out
to become undercover cops. In this two hour long episode (hmm, maybe
the show wasn't this bad) they are sent out by their boss (Dennis
Farina) to execute some kind of drug bust. The funny thing is that
there is not one engaging plot twist to be found at all. For some
reason though, when I decided not to walk out, I became oddly drawn
towards the screen. In no way was I engrossed in the experience, but
there was something subtle in the film that begged me to like it even
the slightest bit. I mean, the film at least lookd great, thanks to
some great cinematography by Ellen Kuras and three very fresh-looking
young faces. Each one of these actors has shown incredible potential
in their prior film outings. Get Danes, Epps, and Ribisi together in a
film with a decent script and I'll be first in line to see it. And
somebody please give Giovanni Ribisi a good role! How come the brat
pack from SUBURBIA (Steve Zahn, Giovanni Ribisi, Parker Posey, Ajay
Naidu) is all of a sudden selling out. SUBURBIA's one of my favorite
movies for G-d's sake! As you can tell by now, I have gone off topic
in this very personal review of THE MOD SQUAD, but I have finally
figured out what made me sit through it. I ended up feeling sorry not
for any character in the film, but for the entire production itself.
review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie May 21, 8:05pm EST

